      "identifier" : [
         "8_06867_117"
      ],
      "text" : [
         "Trobième Année 13 27 M'21 ýh 1915 17 'rhird Year [IULLETIN MUN1C1PALý eCITY of MONTREAL De la CITE de MONTREAL PUBLISMI) EVERY SATIMI)AY PARAISSANT LE SAMEDI MATIN' MORNING Ukations relative to the Municipal Toute communication concernant la Bulletin *hOuld be addressed as follows: Municipal devra être adreI comme suit: MUNIcipAL BU LLETIN BULLETIN MUNICrPAL . .... CITY HALL BOTEL DE VILLE MONTREAL TELÉÉHONE MAIN 4M MONTREAL ELIBERATIONS BUREAU DE8 COMMISSAIRES BOARD OF COMM18810NERS te rendu de l'assemblée du 16 mars 1915, P-M Report of meeting held on the i6th Marcli igiS,,pm. worship the Mayor in the C Ommis- ,e'nneur le Maire, Président; MM. les Commissaires Éis hair, and C sioners Côté and Hébert. Osition de M. le Commissaire Côté, appuyée par' On motion Of Comrnissiorier Côté, second-ed by Coin- Missaire Hébert, il est iiiissioner lfébext, it was Qtte les minutes soient approuvées. Resolved. That the minutes be confirmed. de M. le Commissaire Hébert, appuyée A.-On motion of Commissioner, Hébert, seconded hy Conimissaire Côté, il est Commissioner Côté, it was ]ý\"aPProuver les. réquisitions suivantes: Resolved: To approve the following réquisitions: Y4. No il. Mount Royal Park: No. iiý \"Iqo l5ý Paymaster. No. j5. ciPiux. Nos 57, 58, 59, 6o, 61, Municipal Buildings: Nos. s8, sq, 6o, 61. Nos Commissioners: Nos. . 14, is. -lýOs 63, 65 66, 67.- Fire: Nos; 63, 65, 66, 67. Ire Municiý;l Nô, 4. Municipal Laboratory: NO. 4. 43. Police. No. 43. IncineratiI No.,4i. tagieuses Nos -û-, 21. Contagious Diseases: . Nos. 2o, 21, Road No. i o. 'Civique; \u003e NI x06ç\u003eýi0I,. Civie Library: , Nos. jo6q, loi. 94,.95, 96, 97, 99, 99, 100. Road (North Division). Nos. e\u002b 9ý5, e 97j k3ion Ouestý - 1( ), :17, Sewers (West Division) - Nos. x6, rý- 197, le z9g, 200., Water - Nos. i9ý, 198, iw\"2w. La Folitaine),.7 Nos _q5. Park , (La Fô taine rarki . Nos.: 54. 55:- OU\"t). Road eWest Dîvisiôn): N6. 31. Road (Eàet Divisýon): Nos. 31, ýtýe quatre sé :de: man\" , vérifiés par le Con- 2ý-subillittcd four gerieâ of warranta. verified, 4,- City Con 'tor, awounting re\"eeý iteur de la Cité, au montant respectif de, ýJ iptrollër and Atid, 4,,$508-94. $1,984,55, suivant listes cprtifiées. $5o8.94, $1,984SI5, a-1ý Pef -e Côté, il est 1[jý e= et'Q ge içý paie",
         "-BULLETIN MUNICIPAL DE MONTREAL M MUNICIPAL BULLETIN OF MONTR MM. les Commissaires Ainey et McDonald prennent leur Commissioners Ainey and McDonald took theit siège. 3.-Sôufhi$, un rapport de l'Ingénieur en. Chef, concernant 3.-SL--bmitted a reportfrom the -Chief'Enginýeere, l'enlèvement de la neige des trottoirs. cerningthe r-emovàl of snow from sidewalks. Sur proposition de M. le Commissaire Côté, appuyée par -On motion of Comrni.qsioner Côté. seconded, bYý', M. le Commissaire Hébert, il est rnissioner Hébert, it was Résolu: De référer au Département en Loi pour savý)ir Resolved: That the same bc referred to the 1--a' s'il peut être donné suite au rapport de l'Ingénieur en Chef, partrnent, in order to ascertain if the Chief Engine quant à ce qui concerne la somme prévue,' pour l'enlèvement Port Can bc carried into effect as regards the aino Ae la neigé:des trottoirs. quired for the renioval of snow from sidewalks. .-( 779) Soumise une communication, concernant l'ex-' nt -5 4-(25779) Submitted a communication anent t Propriation de la propriété de M. joseph Horner, située sur propriation of the property of Mr. joseph Hornet la rue, Saint-André, et dans la ligne du Boulevard Saint-Jo- ed on St. André street, and on the line of St. JS,ýWý seph. levard. Sur propositioii de M. le Commissaire Hébert, appuyée par On motion of Commissioner Hébert, seconded hYl, M. le Commissaire Côté, il est missioner Côté, it was Résolu: De référer au Département en Loi -(M. Jarry) Resolved: To refer the same ta the Law Dep pour rapport (Mr. Jarry) for a report. 5.-(25528) Soumis un rapport du Surintendant du Dé- 5-(25529) Subýnittcd a report from tbe SuPe partement de I'Rclairage,,en réponse à une interpellation de dent of the Light Department, in reply to a qUCst M. Péchevin Ward, au sujet de l'installation des fils électri- by Ald. Ward, anent the placing of clectric wires dàiïs leq, conduits souterrains, de la rue Sainte-Cathe- dereoùnd conduits, on St. Catherine 'Street. rine. Sur proposition de M. le Commissaire Côté, appuyée par On motion of Commissioner Côté, seconded by, M. le Commissaire Hébert. il est missioner Hébert, lit was Résolu: De transmettre ledit rapport au ConséiL Resolved: That said-report bc transmitted to 6.-25858) - Soumis un rapport du Département en Loi, re- 6.ý(ý25858) Submitted a report from, the Law -commandant le paiement des frais dus à Mtres Monty et Du- ment, recommending the payrnent of costs due to ranleau, avocatsAu demandeur dans la.cause No,.gs3 C.SJ _ ýnd Duranteaii,. in thé case No. 95 S. C. N. Blain vs La Cité. Etàin vs. tlïe.,City. Sur proposition de M. le Commissaire Hébert, appuyée par On motion of Commissioner Hébert. seconded bY M. le Commissaire Aihey, il jest missioner Ainey, it was Résolu: D autoriser le paiement desdits fiais, au montant Resolved. Ta authorize the payment of sàid de $43-95, ex-Fonds de Réserve-- amounting to $43.95, ex-Reserve -Fund, 7.-(23882) Soumis un rapport du Département en Loi, 7--(23882) ýubmÎtted a report from tbe Law recommandant d'autoriser Son Honneur le Maire et le Gref- ment, recommending that His Worship the MaYot', fier de la Cité à signer le plan de subdivision du lot No i7o the City Clerk be authorîzed to, Sign the subdiv1S10ý de % Paroisse de Montréal. of lot No. 170 of the Parish of Montréal. Sur proposition de M. le Commissaire Hébert, appuyée par On motion oÈ Cornmissionrr Hébert, seconded by', Mý le Comrnissaire Côté, il est missioner Ci5tý, it was Résolu ý IY ' autoriser Son Honneur le Maire et le Greffier Resolved: That HisWorabip the Mayor 'and th4, de la Cité à signer ledit plan. Cierk '_è authon'zed tù sgn se.id plan. \"Ï \u0026-(25872) 5mm'is un raPpor-t.du Surintendant des Mar- ý.-(25872-). Subniitted a report.from tne Supý ýçhë51 rccommanàant 0ýautor15er le transfert du bail de M. G. dent of Markets, recommending.to authorîze the ý Smith, locataire de Tétal No 9 du Marché eaint-jacques, of lease of Yrý (ýi. I-1, Smitb,, ýo*ùer of, stili No. à 34ý 1. Thibault Market, to Mr. L. l'hilbafflt Cammisseire Ainey, appuyée par On motion of Con=issionér Ainey, secondedbY', M. le Cou=,àssaiy,2ý -côté, il est missioner Côté. it-was Réso1uý calirctisti lk teafflfert dudit bait Resolv»_dý To authorize the traiisfer of saîd 1 _Qý-ý;25794) Soumis un rapport de YAechitecte de la'Ville, 9-(25794) Subrnitted a report froni til recommandant çraecorder ù M, Em, PýKkon, recoinmtnding th t. E Roc' d'occuper le lot pôrtant les Nos 'x6i et ï65, subd ' ý3 - 236 ' t;,6rized ta occuPy lots Nos, 62 and 61,, subd, 2à7, 14, z4, Iýý du quartier Saint-Denis, ýNv, ie34 me %ainý'- 2ý7-1 4_ý4_I,ý S,. Denis.Ward, No. 1234,St. Denis Denis) Pou£ Y ' recevoir, ernniagaeiner cf vendre des matériaux for thé purp^sé Of recelving','sto.ring and. se11iný n-te \u003e there^n. de constructicm, rials Sur proporsition de M. le Commissaire Ai»ey, *ppùyée pai On motion di Commissioner Ainey, seconded M. le Commissaire McDonald, il est ràîgsioner-MicD ald, it *as Résolu: D'accorder ]?dite Res[elved - cÔncuÉ in Said report. Io,-San Honneur le M-aire dépose sur 113 table un paguêt XQ- 18 Wdeship'the Mayor laid on the table de billets de pesée de la pierrt fournie pour les trg-vatixz dans oý 'ticket8 fo, t. lie Stofie Ètippliéà for t\u003ee, le quartierý Langue- Pointe, ainsi qu'un'état desdits billets cýerý ifi Lonçue Pointe Ward, as, well as a statement tifié vgî M,'J, P, Ricard, cOmmis-pomPtable de la. Div'îsion tîckets,-certified by Mr. J. P. Rioc-ard, Account\"f sont déposés au dossier de Yenquêto_ tan East Division, w.hmh sàid tir-kéts were filed of re soumim le dossier au sujet de l'expr,\"riatioii doct=elits anent the'' de -la pr riété située au coin de la rue DQrchestéý' et de glibmitted the Plt4tioi, of t.é prûýerty situatedait the comer chester 8treet and Union avetiûew Surproposition de e le Colialiûssaîre Hébert,. appuyé pax On motion of Cotnmissiotter Uébert, teconded missioner. Côté,, it was 1)e, déposer aux archives pour référence ultérieure.; 0lhat the i ga4Wbelled of record fo, cf efence. m-Le BuMu procède'à ýoum!SSionS poor- 12=7'ile toatd prbreedeeto open the ten 1 d'une plaque_ comtnéni6ra-ývi-, à PArmexê deý1.. ýýn3tallation of 4 rial table, in thr City S 1 ' i8siogi. it6alité yertës en Prèscýýé dîý The tenders were ôp\"ed in présence of tlW', intéressée, et parties.",
         "LETIN MUNICIPAL DE MONTREAL 317 MUNICIPAL BULLETIN OF MONTREAL Proposition de M le Commissaire Ainey, app:uyée par On motion of Commissioner Ainey, seconded bY COm' -ý9l#missaire Côté, il est missioner Côté, it was lu: De les référer à l'Architecte de la Ville et au Su- Resoived: That the same bc referred to the City Ar- ant des Edifices Municipaux, pour rapport, et de dé- cl-itect and the Stipe les Chèques de dépôt les accompagnant au Bureau du rintendent of Municipal Buildings, for a report, and that the cheques bc deposited with thi- cr de la Cité, savoir City Treastirer, ta wit: Plaque ýen marbre Bronze Dépôts Marble tablet Bronze Deposits Lepage, , Marble Works Ltd. $198.00 $398.oo $19.80-$39.8o h LI 1 bres Co. 275.00 400-00 27-50-- 40-00 è que by Mr. W. P. Bishop.) ..We Par M. W. P. Bishop.) ýùe-I-cete, Limited 375-00 37-50-- Mitchell Co., Ltd. 500.00 50,00 Çarth Company 525-00 52.50 SIBlith Marble \u0026 Construction Co. 350-00 450-00 35-00- 45-00 011lis... le Profil du Chemin Saint-Jean-Baptiste, entre 13-Submitted the profile of St. Jean-Baptiste Road, de fer Pare et de l'Ile et la rue Saint-Pascal. between the Park.\u0026 Island Road and St. Pascal street., -roplosition de M. le Commissaire Côté, appuyée var On motion of Commissioner Côté, seconded by Cor- ,,ý,,ýomnussaire Hébert, il est missioner Hébert, it was ' Dé réfé'rer au Département en -Loi, afin de sa,' Resolved: That the sarne bc referred ta the Law De- Serait Possible, de donner les niveaux nécessaires pour partment, in order ta know if it wou'd bc possible \u003eta give s cbnstructions à cet endroit, suivant ledit profil. the necessary levels for the various buildings in that 10- cality, according to saîd profile. le sur le service des tramways durant 14.-Submitied the report ou the Tramway service for e finissant le 6 mars igi5. the week ending, on the 6th March 1915. de M. le Commissaire Côté, appuyée- par 0« - '1ý,;j of Commissioner Côté, seconded by, Coin- 9ntrilissaïre Hébert, il est De déposer aux archives, iébert, it was Resclv-ed: That the saine bc filed of record. 18, un rapport de l'Ingénieur en, Chef-Suppléant 15.-Si;ýmitted a report from the Acting Chief. En- dRnt d'accepter l'offre de M. G. Willems, de céder ginéer, recommending the acceptance of the offer frorn gratuitement et s s conditions, les- parties de$ rues Mr. G. willems ta cede ta ý the City, gratuitously and un\" l'lette zilda et des ableg,. ainsi quedes avenues conditionally parts of Marie Antoinette, Azilda and des et sain' Claire avenues, tinted t - laire, montrées en couleur jaune sur le Erables strects and of Park and St. é audit rqepo yellow on the plan annexed ta said report. Position de . le ommissâire Côté, aPP1ýYée par On -motion of COMMissioner Côté, setonded by COM Missaire Hib.ert. il est. raissioner Hébert, it was -D'approuver ladite recor . ninandation, 'et de réité- Resblved: . Ta coricur in sa.-d recommendation and to rt, t e reaffirm thereport made io Côuncîl on thcyth Deccmber ià.i au Conseil, en date du 7. dkernbre i9r4. 1914... soumis un rapport du Département en, Ui 16.-(b5o56) Submitted a report froni the Law Départ-, e la demande de M. C, E. Beauchegne pour auto- meht, statinz that Mr. C. E. Beauchesne's requestfor au tiralisporter à M. B. Corbeil' un permis d'agrandir, thorizatiôn ta ttansfer ta Mr. B. Corbeil a permit ta en-. Peut être accordée. large a tall, May bc grailted., Sition de M. IÎ èom'missaire, Aincy, appuyée.par On motion of Commissioner Aýney, seconded by 'Coin- aire Côté, il est, iniss.ioner,, Côté, it was, Tyautôrier le Rese, horiz said tratisfer. dit transport. 'ved. Ta aut '.ýnu\"ý ile ir2nnnrt de IlArchitecte' dé la Vil- 7 5d03) Submitted a report froin the City Archi- dant de perintttre à M« T. ReMingt6n d'oc- tect, reConýMenditW ýhat Mr. J. T. Remington bc aIlotVed 'XQ qd, 440, quartier Saini-Jacqués, No 230 rue ta occupv'Càýd. lot Nb, 44oý St. James Ward, No. 23o Berri ýrÇCévcFir emmagasiner et vendre de la gazOIine,ý street, for the purpose of receiviiig, storing and selfit1g gasolîne in an underground tank. ifion de M. le Confmissaire, Kiiiey, appuyée par On Motion of' Commiisioner, Ainey, seconded ýjr comm: ibis'$aire C6té,ý B est, M-,ssoner Cote. it was W Permis :dtiifan.dé.ý Resolved Tn' 9r;an\u003etý the:perMjssý.oÉ Éought for. des nlanýàtsý. vérifiés par le Contrôleur etAti 18.-Submitted warranta, verified by' the ClitY' cýmPtroI--... Cté, au $ - 1 4,,i3ýjo suivant, liste lèr and Auditor, for the to*l- sura of $4;133.3Q,.as Pe C\" tifie'd list. tÎtiOn 'de M' le Èý îS3aire C4té, appuy ééý pax C*té,, tçon7dëd by' Com- iàaire Aire\" hiisgit)her- Ain ey', ic was_,, Resolved., 'rô,au rize ýutOr'iser le 4io '_rýýecîc à'la àë'l'enque e, au IÇ).-The Board procceded with the investigaêon a»5ýt li'vfai 0 lapierre danslequari - the delivery of Stone in longue l'ointe war ý Y soumet au -Bur\",eau imé denlwdè 'asked\u003e on ieVe4ti tiôný th a t he, éite préeentî b in 'saý i9ýV t\"étnter ýpZr téreste tp, 'bc rzçsýé1ý Wtrpat $Msi 0 consent -fan, Î#X iýfZe1 '141ýil, kùr îeý,a a th riL M, à",
         "13ULLETIN MUNICIPAL DE MONTREAL 848 MUNICIPAL BULLETIN OF MONTR d'être représentés à l'enquête par l'un des. leurs, et M. Alexan- they werc at libwty to choose o àe of their nernýbqr..'' dre Pellerin est admis dans la salle. present them at the investigation, and Mr,. î Pellerin was admitted-into the room. Les témoins suivants sont assermentés et examinés: The following witnesses were sworn and examin, Arthur Durand, en nouvel examen. Arthur Durand (further examined). Son Honneur le Maire laisse son siège, et M. le Commis- His Worship the Mayor left his seat and COMMÎ saine Hébert est appelé à présider. Hébert was called to the Chair. Exhibit No i. - Livre de temps de M. Durand. Exhibit No. i.-Time-book of Mr. Durand.. Exhibit No z. Billet de pesée, en date du 13 novembre Exhibit No. 2ý-Weight certificate, dated the i3th vember 1914. Exhibit No 3. photographie d'une charge de pierre. Exhibit No. 3.-Photo of a load of Stone. Exhibit No 4. - 8 ordres pour livraisons de pierre, portant Exhibit No. 4-8 orders for the delivery of sto11çý. lés Nos e194, 39-973, ,ý3-814, 42-204, 42-066, 44-868, 42-,15, ing NOs.'38I94, 39973, 43814, 42204, 42066, 448,68Y. 41-232, 41232, Alphonse Filion, en nouvel examen. Alph. Filion, (further, examined). Exhibit No 5. - Etat démontrant les différentes dimen- Exhibit No. S.-Statement showing the differe . 9t1ý sions des tombereaux qui ont servi au transport de la pierre. mensions of tumbrels used for the carting of said w iam Bélec, en.nouvel examen. William Bélec (further examined.) Pellerin, en -nouvel examen. Alexandre Pellerin (further e:ýamined). oseph, P-àulhuSý Joseph Paulhus, François Zoël Tardif. ýFra11çois Zôêl Tardif. M. Tremblay, avocat, demande l'autorisation pour son Mr. Tremblay, -advocate; asked that his client, client, M. Gordl;, d'être présent -à l'enquête, attendu quil don, bc admitted inte the Room during the exa, mi à été mis en cause, laquelle autorisation' est accordée. of witnessesi as lie was \"mis en cause\", which said was granted. Pierre Lefebvre. Pierre Lefebvre. Exhibit No 6. - Livre de temps. Exhil\u003eit No. 6.-Time book. Exhîliit No 7. Livre de temps. Exhibit NO. 1-Time bOOL -a--Sur proposition de M, le appuyée. 2o.-On motion of Commissioner Ainey, secaft par M. le Commissaire CÔté. il est, Commissioner Côté, FAjoint aux personnes mentio innées dans la, liste ci-après The persons narned in the list hereinafter rneil de ýompara!tre devant le Buxeau des Commissaires de la Cité were. ordered to appear before the Board of, Cc de Montréal, à II-lôtel-de-Ville de la Citê de Montréal, ven- sioners of the City of Montréal, at the City Hall al dredi, le ig du courant à 2 hrs p.m., dans la salle des réunions trýaý, on Friday, the Igth instant ' at 2 ptn., in thdr du Bureau des Commissaires, pour, rendre témoignage, dans missioners, meeting ý_Oom, to évidence cor) raffaire 'concernant la livraison de la pierre dans le quartier the delivery of Stone in Longufpvlllinté Ward, to Longue-pointe, savoir: M. Alla rd, coin Sévign y et Hector; Mr. Allard, corner Sévigno, and Hector. ýM. Omer Dufreee, tueNotre-Dame; Mr. Ouier Dufresne, Notre Dame Street. M. 06ries Meese, rue Notre-Dame. Mr. Charles Meese, Notre Dame itreet. il ee The raid persans are ordered to bring ,1 wîth the personnes c . 1'apporter avec elles les notés notc-boloks and oChtr docuýneïits they thay have \"gtutýr-s doýttner1ts «elles; peuvent'avoir en cul possession, possession, in c1OnÉectioý with thè, deliveiy of S eh avec l'a ri-vraiequ de la pierre dans le quartier LoAý Longue Pointe Ward, the -wholÏ'under jhe penal blMe, le tmeý 3ogs toutes pnties que de droit. vided by lawý vertu des obligatioilà La' WSèwe a' This, Surunoils ig in virtue.of the provisi de rAÏtidà 21 t àýËh= , et Eîtî de Montréal. Art, 2iR of the Chartèr of the City of Montréal,, ý1.-sur M, Càté, \"âlýpityée on motion of Côrotnissionet Côté, sýcondëd bY-' par M. le AinËYý ýéM m'ssioner Aincy, it wm 'Ëësolu. Que la, ceiltinuationde réi1ýuèîe soit fixée à ven- ;csolvedý That the invéstiotiot bc resurnied dredi pro;chain, le tg courant à -'l hre \u003e et ne la siance 4ay ne.\"t, jh, 19th in$týàUt, at 2 :Ja', aud that the réeière \"du Bureau soit ajournée au 17ýi .9 of the Board be adjourned until the, ýý7, L N. SENEC Cam te rendu de rassemblée niarw miS, \u0026M P-éPOrt of nîéýtin9 held ri the, zýth March MK les 'Conimissâins Ainey, Héberto Côté. Coinmis4loners Airey, Hébert and Côté... En l'absence de Soli Honneur le Maire, M. le Cominissai e ie Owing to the absence of His Worship thé. Me Ainty est appelé à présider.' c inissiontr'Aiticy was ealled to the Cham iý-sur proposition de M. le Commissaire CÔté,. appuyée 1,-On motion of Commissionti Côté, seéý), par M. le Commissaire Hébert, il est côté, Fnioint à M. 3OseP4'Matcil, 484 rue DOti0n,.,de comparai- Mr- 103tPh MaTcil,' 484 DOriOn street, wag or tre devant le Bureau des CAmmissairps de la Cité*de Mont- APPëar before the Board of of rîr-ôtet-de-Ville de la Cité de Montréal, vendredi, le Montreal, at- the Çity Han 01 Montréal, on ý('p courant, à 2 hrs pin,, dans la salle de réunion du tureau, ý9th instaint ut 2 p'm, iti the uard Rooti ef' \u0026e ColtmijSsaires, pour rendre témoignage dans raffaire con missioners, ý0 eýve 'eymeue cO:nceMingý cëfJ\u003e0aý la livraison de la pierre dans le quartier Lwigue- stone in",
         "*\"-ULi£TIN MUNICIPAL DE MONTREAL 340 MUNICIPAL BULLETIN Oli MONTIýËAI. The above mentioned person is ordered to bring with \u0026inL à la personne ci-dessus mentionnée d'apporter avec him the note-bo . oks and otlier documents lie rnay have in 1 notes et autres documents qu'elle peut avoir en sa his possession, in connection with the delivery of stoue s9loni en rapport avec la livraison (le la pierre dans le in Longue Pointe Ward, the whole under the penalty pro- 1-Ongue-Pointe, le tout sous toutes peines que de vided by law- ésente assignation est donnée en vertu des dispositions This summons is given in virtue of the provisions of hicle 21 R de la Charte de la Cité de Montréal. Art. 2iR of the Charter of the City of Montreal. Ur kropusitwn de M. le Commissaire Côté, appuyée 2-ci, n-ýptioii of Commissioner Côté, seconded by LOulmissaire Hébert, il est Commissiolier Hébert, it was Que la séance soit ajournée à 2.3o hrs p.m., ce Resolved: That the meeting bc adjourned until 2.30 p.m. this day. L. N. SENECAL, L. N. SENECAL. Secrétaire. Secretary. Pte rendu de passemblée du 17 mars igi5, p.m. Report of meeting held on the 17th Match igi5, p.in. les Commissaires Hébert, Côté, Aii-ieyý Messrs. Hébert, Côté and Ainey, Commissioners. -rabselce de Son Honneur le Mai the absence of His Worship the Mayor, Coni- ire, M. le Commissaire Owing te est appelé à présider. missioner Hébert was called to the Chwr. proposition de M, le Commissaire Côté, appuyée i.-On motion of Commissioner Côté, seconded bY le Commissaire Ainey, il est 1 - Commissioner Ainey, it was 'De faire ;une enquête dans les Départements de Res'olved: To hold an investigation in the departinents itT et Arnoldi, au sujet de la disparition (les do- of Messrs. Pelletier and Arnoldi, arient the disappearance 11-11 I!af faire de la Commission Scolaire de St-Gré- of documents in te the Board of School Conimissioners Thaumaturge, de demander à chacun des employés, of St. Grégoire le Thaumaturge, to ask each of the eni- t désignés par les chefs desdits départements, de ployees te be ýdesignated by the Chiefs of said depart- sous serment ce qu'ils connaissent au sujet de la dis- ments, to state under oath what they.know as regards de Ces documents, en vue de découvrir comment il se the disappearance of said documents, with a view of as-ý lesdits documents.sont disparus, ladite enquête devant certainine how it is that said documents have disappear- le 2à courant, à ii lits a.m. ed, said inveatigation. to bc held. on the.iýoth instant, at i i a.m. proposition de M. le Commissaire Côté, appuyée, 2.-On motion of Commissioner Côté, seconded by Commissaire Ainey, il est Commissioner Ainey, itwas . e la résolution du 12 mars courant, au sujet du Resolved- Thut the rèsolutiori adopted on the i2th t d'làliè hypothèque, à M. J. H. Paquin, soit amendée Match instant, anent the payment qf a mortgage to Mr. t, à la fin de ladite résolution, les mots suivants: J. H. Paquin, be amended by adding, at the end of said instructions au Notaire de la Ville de préparer resolution, the following words; \"That instructions bc ce à cet ef fet.\" given ta the City.Notary to pre pare a discharge te that effect\". 7) Soumise une résolution du Conseil, à l'effet 3ý-(25847) Submitted à resolution of Council, request- 'r Ru Bureau des Commissaires de faire applica- ing the Board of Commissioners to take the necessary. ýrèý\u0026 des auiorités, provinciales, pour obtenir l'accès steps in order to olitain from the Provincial authorities 4ux livres et registres du Bureau d'Enrégistrement de free access,.to the books and registers of the Registry Montréal. Office of the City of Montreal. de.M. le-Commissaire Côté, appuyée par On motion of Commissioner Côté, seconded by CPni- issaire Ainey, il est missioner Aincy, it was De transmettre copie de ladite résolution à j'Ho- Resoi ied: That a copy of said *resolution bc -trans- Mier-Mitiistre, avec prière de faire droità la de- mitted te the Honorable ]Prime Minister, and that he be asked te accede to the request thereiii contained. 1) Soumise une demande du Consul-Général du 4-Q5870 Submitted a communication from the Ge- à l'effet d'obteffir l'appui finahçièr de la Ville neral Consulate of Montenegro, asking for th.e. fiftancial tù:. f4veur du Fonds ýde Secours Monténégrin. aid of the City of Montreal in favor of the Montepegrû .1 . Relief Fund. ýition 'de M. le Commissaire Côté, a puyée par On motion of Commissioner Côté, so-conded by-Coin- ssaire Ainey, il en missioner Aincy, it was be ëd te eé Direictor 'De réïêrer -au% DirectetW VAssistance Munici- Resôlved-., That . the sainae rejerr ,r ý1rt, et au Contrôleur et Auditeur pour -s 1 avoir iof Municipal Assistance for a report =\u0026 te the Comp- ;ýn ds disponibles pour cette 'fit]. troller and Atiditor In order.tô kiîow' if thère: are any fund vailable for àaïd perpost. ») t -(25899) on Pu se une ni ërpellatim do, M. l'échevin 5ý ltted ýà questi t by MËI. 'Dut-ewg,. ailet du paiement. du tm\"ât dà expropriations an- anènt the cost of annual expropriatioInsl. aecording tc thé \u0026 là loi' adoptée à la. dernière session Act adcpted at tbe last stýsioa of the Leléslatart. âOn de M par On mQtion of Commissioner Côté, secolided wl, le Commissaire Côté, appuyée isîaire Ainëy, il cg: missioner Aýney,' it was De réfërer au Resolved,- That ilat saule bc reféfred to, We Déptntpment en Loi pour direfflon, piartmient for à, repet- ýý 1s rapport ýAu, Dýpartemeiitmn tùi, au, 6, ý25ýj,9) Submitýed a reP L dý répartition ýdu coî1t, égout dans la-tut the,,ýp 01, e",
         "13ULLETIN MUNICIPAL -CE MOIY'I'REAL' MUNICIPAL BULLETIN OF MONTR Sur proposition de M. le Commissaire Côté, appuyée Par On motion of Commissioner Côté, seconded by M. le Commissaire Ainey, il est missioner Aincy, it was Résolu,: De référer au Département des Egouts pour sa- Resolved: That thé saine bc referred te the S' voit' éomment il se fait que ce rôle a été préparé, alors que Department, in order te know how it îs that said ron ' l'égout nýétait pas construit, et d'annuler ledit rffle, S'il y a prepared when the sewer had net yet been laid. and, lieu. said roll bc annulled if the same was irregularly il, 7-(25744) Soumis un rapport de l'Architecte -de la Vil- 7-Subrnitted a report froin the City Architeczt le, recommandant de permettre à M. G. M., Chandler d'occu- mending that Mr. G. M. Chandler bc allowed te Pér le lot No cad. r684, quartier 'Saint-André, situé en arrière- Cad. lot No. 1684, St. Andrew Ward, situated in r du NO 458 rue Gny, pour y installer un réservoir souterrain, NO- 458 Guv street, for the purpose of receiving, S p our y recevoir, emmagasiner et vendre de la gazoline. and seiling gasoline thereon. Sur proposition de K le Commissaire Aincyi appuyée par On motion oï Commissioner Ainey, seconded IY M. le Commissaire Côté, il cst missioner Côté, it was Résolu: 1)ýàccorder lé permis demandé. Resolved: Te grant the permission sought fo \u0026-Soumis un rapport de l'Architecte de la Vile, recom- S.-Submitted a report froin the City Architect,111 r mandant de permettre à M. Geo. A. Slater, d'occuper lé lot mending that Mr. Geo. Aý Slater bc allowed te No cad. 1745, subd. Ne P,4o, quartier Saint-André, en arrière -Cad. lot No. 1745, subd. No. P. 40, St. Andrew Ward, in du No 31 avenue Ontario, pour y installer un réservoir sou- NO- 31 Ontario avenue, te install an underground.ta terrain, peur y recevoir et emmagasiner de la gazoline. rective and store gasoline thereon. Sur proposition dé M, le Commissaire Ainey, appuyée par On motion of Commissioner Ainey, -seconded by, M., le Commissaire Côté, il est missioner Côté, it was Ré8ý1u:' D'accorder le Resolved: Te grant the permission sought for. Soumis un rapport de l'Architecte de la Ville, 9.-Submitted a report from the City Architect, ri' recommandant la remise dun dépôt de $3,500, à M. L. Lange- mendinFthat Mr. L. Langevin bc refunded a dee0s' vin, en rapport avec la construction, du Bain Emüd et,'Saint- $3,500 made in connection with his contract fer the,', Paut tien of the Emard and St.- Paul Bath. Sur proposition de M. le Commissaire Aincy, àppuyée par On motion of Commissioner Ainey, seconded 1,ý M. le Commissaire Côté, il est missioner Côté, it'w\" Résolu.- D'autoriser, la remise dudit dépôt. Resolved, Te authorize the refund of said dePQ,,, Io.-(25546) Soumise une résolution du Conseil à l'ef fet io.ý-(25ý46) Submitteà a résolution adopted by CO ..de référer au Bureau des Commissaires un ràbpoýt du Dé- referring te the Board of Commissioners a report purteffient en Loi, au sujet d'un appeLd'une décision de la the LawDépartrnent re appeal from an oýder of the Commission des Chemins de Fer, concernant l'installation de of Railway Commissioners, concerning the laying voies additionnelles, à travers les rues Stadacùna et Marlbo-, dîtional tracks àcross Stadacona and Marlborough, rough,. Sur proposition de M. le Commissaire Côté, appuyée par On motion of Commissioner 'Côté, seconded by l 'M. le Commissaire Ainey, il est iiiss loner Ainey, it was Résolu, De référer au Département en Loi pour direc- Resolved: That the same bc referred te the Law, tien. partment for advice. Il.-(2,894) Soumis un extrait, du procès-verbal dune Il.-(25894) Subinitted an extract from the w4iu séance du Conseil, ýtenue le 15 'courant, question de l'écheviii a meeting of Council held on the 15th instant, Chartraid, au sujet de J'amélioration du tunnel de la rue On- put by Ald. Chartrand, anent the improvementà.ý to tarie. Ontario street tunnel. sur Prcqý6s1titn de M. le Commissaire Côté, àppuyée pai On motion of Commissioner Côté, secondedd \u0026V' M. le Cmmissaire Aircyý il est miesioncr Aîney, it':was Râôlu! Dýinimmer le Conseil lie, cette question est à Resolved: Thut the Couneil bc informed thaat ýl'étudëý'et £IWÉlle sera -tégolUe bient9t,ý question is beifig considered and that it will St,=iS' un rapport did lIffibiim ëb Charge, Submitted a report from. the Éngî;n dec Chemins de Fer,.sur la deniap4e de la Compagnie deï, charge, 01 kàilways, on the application from the Tram-Yý4Ys; de cO11ýtrfflre rite Aylw in, pour It Ways . Co. for permissioh te lay tracks on Aý1wii1 transport dq mý\" 0,ndiseg de \"Thé W. Jý Poupore Coý11 to connect with the factory of the W J. Pou'ore, 8ur pr6positi 1 ai YéQ Par 09 mot, -on- de -M. le Ci\u003eminiu re côté, of Commissioner Côté..second d :V 'M, le. Commissaire Ainey, il est' Ziissioner Aineyf it, -vmW' ti-, bc référer au Dé MOI partenient en Loi ni Resolved: That said report bc referréd te thella', ..W perràis. peut être les.disposl«ons -du Rè- Partffient, in order te know if:sw permission gimew ;210. granted, accofding te the provisions of. Bylawý;2 J3_ýý(2589F3) Soumis un: raPpôrt.de l'ArchýWte de Ià vil- Stibmitted a rep\u0026t froTh the -CitYý' le, au suie dela rklamation deM, L. Langéviii., entrrpre- tect,..'ýnent the, claÎm fràm Mr. L, Langeyin, ffin. au \" Emard et sl'irit-Pàtil. 'liàr'thë tmard and St., Paul Bath. ur - gropo sition puyée par On motion 01 dé M. le Coiunii\"rë ap Commissibuer bf- IL le nimissaire. -Côté, il \"t missioner ic6té,-,. WýDlu: DQ,:\"ýrer' au Départernictit. cri Loi pour direc- d te the' Reàolved. Týàt theýem p h lent. for ad-vice.- e 'bc referx Ç art I4z--ýLýSur PT'\"Ogit-fOh de M. le appuyée X4,ýýn r4ýýtion ol\"commiisioýfter côté, \u0026ecoo par M, le-CoMinissaire Ainéy, il, c*. Aifte, it was Résolu: ý_Dýapprouvcr les réquisitiolis, suivantes: thé followln:g. requl judnération ý No 42.ý Inéirl ration: NO. 42. Assistance -M'211iriValeý Nbe fO4ý 1p,%ý Murt6pal Assistance: Yôg.. 104, 1Q5ý. Inspeciioli déà A1i-eft9ý, Food Inspection: No. 6 Police Nos-44, 45, 46- Police: Nos. 44, 45, '46. ý,Jecendies: Nos 68, 6ý, 68, ýý_1i1ýpres3iSâ et papeteries.,, Np 16. 1:\u003erîntinIZ and StatiôtirrYý: Nt\u003e. t6. Aec-duc; Nim ýiûj, ez Wiâer,- 'Nos. ý2ci,",
         "'ETIN MUNICIPAL DE MONTREAL 351 MUNICIPAL BULLETIN OF MONTREAL M*niciPaux: No 62. Municipal Buildings: No. 62. Nos 56, 57, 58, 59, 60. Parks (St. Helen's Island): Nos. 56, 58, 59, 6o. urtlise une offre de la \"Robert \\ý'hite Co., Ltd.\", de i5.-Subrnitted an offer from the a Cité le Bain Laureritian. Ltd., to rent to the City the Laurelitian Bath. de M. le Commissaire Aiiey, appuyée par On motion of Commiss;oner Aincy, seconded by Com- .,=re Côté, il est inissiolier Côté, it was : De référer au Surintendant des Edifices Muni- Resolved: That the matter be referred to the Super- Pour rapport. intendent of Municipal Buildings for a report. 5226) SOumiý le rapport de l'Ingéliieur en Charges 16,-(25226) Submitted a report from the Etigineer in 1ning de Fer p6ur continuer son travail, charge of Tramways, anent the proposed raising of the Grand Trunk Railway tracks. de m. le Commissaire Côté, appuyée par On motion of Co-mmiss'oner Côté, seconded by Com- \" 0'm1ýni8saire Ainey, il est missioner Ainey, it was u* Qý1e les documents se rattachant à cette affaire Resolved: That the documents in connection with this- Yés à l'Ingénieur en Charges des Chemins de Fer iriatter be referred to the Erigineer in charge of Railways Puisse continuer ce travail. so that he may proceed with his work. (23»4) Soumis -un rapport de l'Ingénieur en Chef, 17.-(23994) Submitted a report from the Chief En- de,$ changements à faire à l'égout-collecteur \"West gineer, anent the alterations to be made to the West Y11ý Broadwav main sewer. PrOIP'bsitiün de M le Commissaire Côté, appuyée par On motion of Commissioner Côté. seconded by Com- C'ýn=i\u0026saire Aineý est missioner Airiey, it was D'approuver ledit rapport, et de prier Son Hon- Resolved: That said report be approved and that His eaire et le Greffier de la Cité à signer le contrat no- Worshil) the Mayor and the City Clerk be requested to, sign the notarial deed to bc entered -into. 2%go) Soumis un rapport de l'Architecte Surinten- 18,-(25590ý Submitted a report from the Architect Su- àtiSses, recommandant de permettre à la \"Harris perîýiter1dent of Buildings, recommending that the Harris CýOý, Ltd,\" de, construire une plateforme à la voie Abattoir Co.. Ltd., be allowed to construct a platform. at ,Àux cOUrs- de l'avenue Atwater de la Compagnie du No. 8.track, in the yards of the Grand Trunk Railway Co., on Atwater avenue. Osition de M. le Commissaire Ainey, appuyée par On motion of Commissioner Aincy, seconded, by Com- itissaire,.c6té, il est missioner Côté, it was De faire rapport au Conseil, recommandant d'ap- Resolved: That a report be made to Council, recorn- Plans conformément au paragraphe mending that the plans be approvcd, in accordance with p -law 26ô. ýg1ement 260. paragraph 2 of section 2o of By 1 ) S9umis un compte de $6,745 de MM. Picard, 19-(25639) Submitted an account of $6,745 frOm le; Pour changements faits à la station de feu et de Messrs. Picard \u0026 Valin Co., for alterations made at the er Bordeaux. Fire and Police Stàtion in Bordeaux Wârd. siticà, de M.Ae Commissaire Ainey, appuyée par On motion of Cominissioner Ainey, seconded by Com- Inissaire Côté, il est missioner Côté, it was De r-éférer, au Département en Loi, à l'Architecte Resolved: That the same be referred to the Law De- 'et à l'Architecte Reeves, pour rapport, partment, the City Architect and Mr. Reeves, archîte-êt,' for a report. 2o.-(2523') Subrnitted a letter from Mr 15239) Soumise une lettre de M. C. A. Reeves, àr- 9 - C. A. Reeves,, rapport avec le paiement de ses honoraires, pour architect, in connection wýth the payment of his fees, for des plans pour la construction du poste du the reparation of plans for the erection of a station in Borblau.c. Ward. Osition de M le Commissaire Ainey, appuyée par, On motion of Commissioner Ainey, seconded by Com- ýsaire côté, il est missioner Côté, it was De référer à l'Architecte de la Ville our rapport Resolved: That the same be referred to the City Ar- chitect for a report. M42j Soumis un, rapport de de la Vil- 21.-(25842) Submitted a report frora the Cît Archi- de Fi ion de la liste des Salaires Raison- tect, aiient the printing of the fair wage scheàlý'. tion de M. le Commissaire Ai=ý, appuyée par On motion. of dommissioner Ainey, secorided by, Comi- sý3airë Rté, il est missioner Côté, it was De réf\u0026er au Surintendant des 1 1 mpressions et de' Reso.ved, That the same be referred' to the SUPeritl7 Pour 'rapport sur le coût appfoximatif de ce tendent of Printing and Stationery Departinent for a Ée- port on the âpproy-imate cost of said.work. gmnà% Un ra rt7de fArchitecte de la Vil- 22.-(25843) from the Ciùy Archi- l'impression d avis, en tapport avec là Mau- the'printing of notices, in connection'kïtlt. the on des échafaudages. \u003c defective construction of scaffo1dingsý ition dc M. '1ý Commissaire Ainey, appuyée 1 par on motion of Commissioner Ainey, tecoâded -by Con, % à%eire Côt4 ..îl est.: . .. . 1 Il - initsiciner Côté, it w1ai référer.au Département en Loi pour rédaction Resolved: That the same be riefet-red touje Law De- au Sulintendoàt des Impressions pour estimé , partment, with instructions to dnff gaid uôfÎces and -to, ession, uperintendent of' Prilitirig, foÈ âh è%timatt Qî the cost of printing the sanie. ý3-(2084%»ý Submitted a lettC ffôm Sburni4c une lettre d M. Médétic. Dupuis, Mr main-lev,6z d'hypothèque; garantissant la ba- puis, aýnlett the çanccllatýon of a mürtgage, eu, \u0026achat 4t certains lots.. acquis par ledit M. the balance ý of the purchase Price -of certaýn 0t$,làý by the said Mi, Dupuisý Oli Tnotion, of Com Won de X 'le ç0mmifflire Çùtéý appùeét'par =ssiôner cêtk, st àmire Ainey, il est tni\"ioner Aitiey, 1ý wu Y téf\u0026er Élu Xetaire de m Viileý RegoWed- That, ec -ume býc \"Ïhî\" eltk NO--,",
         "13ULLËriN MUNICIPAL DE MONrPgAL 869 MUNICIPAL ttJLI-19'rlN OF M01WrIZ ?5.-(2589r) Soumis un rapport -de l'Ingénieur en Chef 24.-(.25891) Submitted a report from th, Atngý, Suppléant, au sujet du nivellement et du macadarnisage des Engineer, anent the levelling and macadainizilig rues dans la propiiété de la \"Northmouiit Land Ce.\" streets on the Northmouiit Land Co. propertyý Sur proposition de M. le Commissaire Côté, appuyée par On motion of Commissioner Côté, seconded by\",. M. le Commissaire Ainéy, il est 1 . inissioner Ainey, it was ý 1, Résolu: Que les 33 propriétaires de lots soient -avertis Resolved: That the 33. proprietors of saidýlots.,b, qu'en vertu de la Règle i23 du Conseil, qui s'applique au Bu- formed that in virtue of rule 123 of Council -whiý reau des Commissaires, on ne peut procéder à ces travaux à aid moins qu'ils ne signent J'engagement mentionné dans plies te the Board of Corrimissioners, the s 'id Règle T23. ladite Dot bc ýroceeded with unless they sign the agre mentioried in said rule 123. Soumis un rapport du Surintendant du Dé- 2ý.-(258O7) 25,ý-(258O7) Submitted a report fýom the Sup partement de l'Eclairage, recommandant de retenir les ser- dent of the Light Departinent, recommending vices dun ingénieur-électricien pour rassister dans la direc- [ cý.i engincer-electrician bc ertgaged te aid him in pl ci, tien des travaux de llins'tallaticn des fils électriques, des Cà- clectrie fires, cables, etc., in the underground c bles, etc,, dans les conduits souterrains, Pour Vinstallation du for the lighting system or St. Catherine and système d'éclaireée dans les rues Sainte-Cathérine et Bleury,: streets, etc. etc. Sur proposition de M. le Commissaire Côté, appuyée par On motion Df Commissîcmer Côté, seconded Y M. le Commissaire Ailley, il est missioner Ainey, it was -Résolu. Çge. M.- Pý. Sý Gregory soit engagé, à raison de Resolved. That Mr. P. S. Gregory bc, 'a ed- par semaine, pour. aider le Surintendant de l'Eclairage à e gý 45. rate Of $45 pet week te help the Superinte.d,,t l'installation des lampadaires et nouveaux luminaires dans Light Departinent te instail lamp-posts and new les rues Sainte-Catheriné et Bleury, le montant. -nécessaire de- on St. Catherine and Bleury streets, the amount r vant être imputé sur le crédit voté à ménie le f ds dýcm_ t pour l'installation de ces lampadaires et lu ci, ý 1 te be charged against the appropriation voted prun minaires. Fund, for the installation of said lamp-pests and e-(255P) Soumis un rapport dé l'1ngénieurýSUppléànt 26.-(2555r). Subraitted a report from the Act - 'le en, Charge du Dépaitement des Egouts, recommandant eac- intendent of the Sewer Departinent, recommendin cepter la proposition de MM. Laurit -\u0026 Leitch, qui consentent the off-ýr from Messrs. Laurin \u0026 Leitch te do thé à faire les travaux relatifs à la mise en place d'un sypholi in conneètîon with the placing of a syphon under 1 canai Lachine, au. prix de iocc -du priz ous é des ttavaux, Châle Canal, for the price of io% of the cest of saià plus une somme de $1,700 Peur loyer desýmachineries. :r Y, b Plus a surh Of $1,700 for the rental. of machiné c M. le Commissaire Côté, ceptéd. Sur proposition d apPuyée par on ý . 1 M le Commissaire Ainey, il est missio motion of Comm:ss,*oner Côté, seconded by' ner Ainey, it was Résolu. De faire rapport au Conseil, recommandant le vp- Resoived: ' That 1 a report bc made te Council, te d'une somme additionnelle de $r,7oo pour les fins men- mendinq diat an add:tional su Of $1,700 bc vOted tionnées audit rapport. 'd te m ,,, - * Plitpose meiltioned in sa, port (57 18) Soumis un . extrait du procès-verbal. d'une 27.-(25n8) Subftiitied an extract from the Mi seance du Conseil tenue le r5 mars courant à l'effet de te- ndant'dopérer le vire-m a meeting of Couricil held on the 15th Match 19 jeter up rapport du Bureau, recomma yectinz a report from the Board,, recamending thatý', ment d'une SOMMÉ de $300 pour être appliquée à la construcý- ruct 0 f $300 be, varied and aDDlied te the ronstrulc, tion de kiosqueý (Division Nord). kiosks (Northe_,fl-l D1visiý'n), Sur proposition.,.de M. le Commissaire Côté, appuyée Pa', ýOn motion Of'commi asioner Côté. seconded U leCemmis8aire Aýney,, il est missioner Ainey, it wa-s Résolu., De donner iiistruétions-.à rIngénieur-Surintendant ýde la voiîîe de' sU$ýend'_re le, nettpyage ët: le peintirrage des Resolved: That instructions bc given 1 te tlit 0échere Superintendent of the Road Department to thé Cleaning and paintingof the kioeks en cabstâ, 2sr-Sowhii; un rapport de1'l1'pgýàiieur eý Chef, au sujet.de :2à.-S,,btnittd a report from- the'Chief E 1 iigàt là dt=nde de MM. A- Ror-hon et li. Jýutler pOur être ails thë'Pé.titions froin Mesgrà.ýA,ý Rochbil and ýH. Ril' retraite et jouir des privilèges du le la ing thàt thç-- bc s4perannuated. fonds' de pension Sur proposition de M. le Comâiissz4ire 'Ço On motion of itOnirai-\u0026Ioner çôtë, seconded M. le CoiumiâAaire Aincy, ilý est Missiolier Aîý it wao Résolu: De demander au Contrôleur et Auditeur - si cesý of ey', ved: That the éomptroller' and Auditor- deux employés remplissent des, fonctions, -pour lesquelles il- if these vwb eMployecS hold positions for which, a été voté annuellement par le budget un salaire fixe, et de ,,al salary bas been fixed in the budget and that référer le dossier au Directeur de Bureau Municipal 4eÎfy-' rnellts be referred to the Medical Hcalth OfficW giène pour faire subir un examen;,mê . dical à ces deux cm- sttucticýýs to examin e the sàid emp loytes as te pltiyâ, Of the'ir hcalth. 29--(23529-24563-2449) Sou-ig:un ÈàPport du Dépàxte- 4-\"(23529-24563-244og) Subnlit'-ted a 'report A=tt en, Loi, ï4diquant les pouvoirs conférés a4 la Ville# en Law Departinent, indicàting the powers confLzý,ý. 'vertà des derniers amendements à là Charte, concern'ant l'\u0026 týe CitY, in virtue of the last ainendments to gôut de l'avenue Westm-ount de la rue Létlang.et dr-.1a me . anent tl.e Westmount avenue sewer, from rennan strect S' ut Pfopo!ýÈion de M. lie Commissaire Côté, .:. appul . é . e par. On motion of Cmýmist . iencr CUé, ut=4ed X. le Commitsaire Ainey, il est . , . . . :11- 1 mesioner, Ai-hey, iiýwai ... Résoluý De référer a Ylngénieur-Stipp]6ant en thârge d'à Rescilved:, nat the 1 S . ame bc referred . to DéDutemeiTt d2s Egouts, et de donner 'instructions à M. Friii- _Engineer inýýcharg-d of the.Sewer Departrnent, tier, daarÉé de la pFéparation des r6les de prendre ceUe ques- Instruttions be given te Mr. Fruitier who tie en i=iiig et de reCevoiz la direction du Département en with the, réparation ai rolls te attend to this der tbc d\u0026ection of the ýLaw Department. Wý-sud proposition de M, le Çàounlssalre Côté, appuyée.., 3o,--ýL,0n motion of Commissioner Cât6, par M . le Comrnissairé Aineyý il est £Ommiesioner Ainty, it was,. Résolu: Que ' là iléànce '.,.Oit aj()df\"e au. l's coUrantY à-il Rf3OlVedý Th-U thWý=eetÏng bc adjourtied hri eftý Sth lnfi=t,'at il ja.m, 4 N.-' SENEtAL,",
         "MUNICIPAL BULLETIN OF MONTREAL li'MUNICIPAL:DF- MONTREAL Pte r endu de l'assemblée du iS mars 1915, a.m. Report of meeting held on the i8th March igi5, a.ni- MM. les Commissaires Ailiey, Côté, Hébert, Mc- Présent: Messrs. Ainey, Côté, Hébert and McDonald, Commissioners. missioner Côté, seconded bY Com- ýb'r0Position de M. le Commissaire Côté, appuyée par On - motion of Coin Ainey, il est missioner Ainey, it was Hébert be called to the u Que M. le Commissaire - Hébert préside. Resoivedr That Cominissioner Chair. I'Echevin Turcot présente devant le Bureau une dé- i,--Ald, Turcot introduced to the Board a delegation des résidents du quartier Laurier et dépose des re- of résidents of Laurier Ward and slibinitted petitions sign- 'ieté('s par plus de douze cents résidents qui deman- i ed by over twelve hundred résidents, asking that the striP exproPrÎatiol, de la lisière de terrain de 4 et 6 pieds of al-, d 4 by 6 feet wide and situated on St. Lawrence r et située sur le.Boulevard Saint-Laurent, du tun- ývard, from the tunnel to Isabeau street, be expro- !'U'-'Isabeau, la reconstruction du post e de pompiers pBroliuàlteed; that the fire and police station be constructed on l'ce sur le site actuel situé au coin du Boulevard St t h, _ esent site, corner of St. Lawrence Boulevard 'and et de la rue Beaubien et la construction d'un m Beý Prien street, and that a market be erected for the le no - ar: aub rd de la Ville. -no rEchevin Turcot, thern end of the City Robichon, Clialifoux, Guenette, le Z.. Turcot, Messrs. Robichon, Chalifoux, Guenette, e Pr,)ulx et le Dr Foulin adressent la parole à l'appui Proulx, Notaryý and Dr. poulin addressed the Board in réquête, suppoit of the pétition. ,,le -I)r- Poulin demandé en outre la construction d'un Dr. Poulin, furthermore, asked that a subway or bridge i0u dýuue Passerelle à la rue Baby, pour permettre de be erected at Baby street, in order to allow the citizens quer a vec le quartier situé l'autre côté de l'avenue to communicate with the ward situated on the other side- of Park avenue. e Commissioners Hébert, tications sont données par MM. les Commissaires Explanations'were given by oté, Aincy et McDonald. Côté, Ainev and McDonald. - 'ec P0ýitiot1 de M. le Commissaire Côté, appuyée par On motion of Commissioner Côté, seconded by Com- McDonald, il est missioner McDonald. it was De donner instruction à J'Ingénieur en Chef (M. Re3olved: That instructions be given to the Chief En- d, préparer un plan démontrant la lisière de terrain gineer (Mr. Barlow) to prépare a plan showing the striP ce ýà l'expropriation pour la construction des trottoirs of land required re expropriation for the laying of Bide- \"ýc1ulevard Saint-Laurent, du tunnel à la rue Isabeau, et walks, from the subway to Isâbeau sýreet, and giving the 14, s\"Perficie du terrain à exproprier. area of the land to be expropriate\u0026 ý'rQPOition de M. le Commissaire Côté, appuyée par on motion of Conimissioner Côté, seconded by. Corn- 9nInlissaîre McDonald, il est missioner McDonald, it was De donner instruction à l'Ingénieur en Chef, (M. Resolved: That instructions bc given to the -Chief En- depréparer un estimé du, coût de la construction de gineer (Mr. Barlow) to prépare an Jestimate of the c6st en einent et de trottoirs en asphalte, sur le Bou- of the laying of cement and asphalt sidewalks on St. Law- du tunnel à la rue Isabeau.- rence Boulevard, frorn the subWay to Isabeau street. proposition de M. le Commissaire Côté, appuyée 2.-On motion of CoMmissioner Côté, seconded by Commissaire McDonald, il est Cjmmîssioner McDonald, it was ne donner instructions à l'Ingénieuf en Charge Resolved: Thai instructions be given to the F-ngineer ýns de Fer d'allerý,visiter la rue Baby et ses envi- in cl1arýe of Railways to go and visit Baby street and the ide faire rapport sur ropportunité de demander à la the advisability of applying qurroundings, and report on oil des Chemins de Fer la permission de copstruire to the Board of Railway Commissioners for permission l'a traverse de ladite rue sur les voies du C. to establish a crossing On the ýC. P. R. tracks. des mandats au montant de $157,196.69 suivant 3.-Submitted warrants, amounting tO $15:7,196.69, as e Par. le Contrôleur et Auditeur de la Cité. per the list certified by-the City Comptroller and Audttor. sition de K le Commissaire McDonald, appuyée oli motion of Commission« McDonald, sèconded 1\u003e7 Commissaire Ainey, il est Commissioner Aney, it was '1ýen autoriser le paiement. Resülve4l To authorize, the paYmeÙt thcregf,- -i'gsaire Côté laisse son siège. Corniaissiotier côté leit his seat. ý5ý Soumis un rapport du Directeur dé l'Assis- 'tted a report frOin the Directdr of 4. ýaj65) Subrni Illâle, déclarant que les changemente à faire pour M-unicîpa Assistante, stating that the changés to be Inade les Commissaires des Incendies, dans TAnnexe m order to ,rovide quarters for. the Fke Commissionere -Ville et -de transporter les bureaux de son d\u0026 transfer'the Gfýccs Of hl$ Ref lige Meurlin -9 , était 4t $475 au lieu de $890, in the ,ity Hall Annex, and tO uld cosf $475 in- Tecon=andéý ý3tead. of $B9oý as previously, recomtaended. 'itian dý Mý le Cominissaire MeDonald, appuYée issioner McDonald#' secýmded by ôn shotim of Comni rnmissaire Abwy,. ii. est Ai\"y, ýt was rý,éitérê, le rapport . au. (jnteil, mais en chan- Resoived: Toý reaffirra the report triade to couilcil àf. de $Sgo par $47s, telque déjà recommandé, tr ubstitujing the sum--of $4ý5 for that of ý$890i coin evin Püi%ýsànt se pràentý devant le Bureau -Ald, Poissant appeued býJore the Board, 'im qdun accident en survenu nle4'rtheM tha-t an aecident occiltired 'ceâ, mf la rue Sherbrooke for, lZ4 9est produit en-dtsàilus du axe vis-àýVi5 îtreet OJI,4,-eat the gmund sank down u»dgr met OP, de M. le Commissaire Aitiey, appuyée par re XvDonald, il est t wa» W ànder à rIngétýr en chef BatIbW) t1w, chîé'ý a,\" imniédiatemeilt sur lu catise, de cet àçéfdent, eeRt,îýd- 1,w 4-ýewt c 'e îe 1'U",
         "BULLTINMUNIIIPL DEMONPRAL 354 MUNIIPA BULETI OFMN;R 6ses !Sr *rpstoTeM eC m isieM D nlapyé- O oin o o msinr M D nlscL pe .1× C imsar iei s o msinrAýe ,i a Réol- *e trnmtr ei apr uDrcerd 's eovd ot Th s *eor be trnmt s\u0026ia ce'Muncip le our sa ouve ne. re tor of uniipa Assàta ce or is uid nce 7.7(29o) ou isun apor d Sritedan ds ar 7-ý59o) ub iteda eprt ro te upritr ché, urladeane e H Orotdesine lebal xitat f arkts o te eqes frm.H.Obon, orau pou létl o 8H d nsleMarhéSantLa Mn, t ctele- ZaiO t Sgnth eisin lesefo sal N . 81.Î.* men aunmd M×.Rsned\u0026H bot arneMrenwi haeo ess . fed\u0026H bot S rp o oio *e *.l o msar icap y ep r O oin o o msinrA ny eo d d b M. *eC m isieM D nli stmsinrM D nli Réou D arue leiraprsjtàrprbto du R s ve:'ocnu insi reot u ett h Déprte e× sn o.poa fteL w D prnet ×-u prpsto ,eM eC m isieM Dnla- 8- n oino o msinrM D nlsc' Pué *a .l o msar iei s yC m isoe iei a *éou u asac ot\u0026oré Y .. eju. R sle-T a h etn 'b dore , z",
         "MUNICIPAL DE MONTREAL 355 BULLETIN OF MONTREAL' COMMI381ONS SPECIAILES SPECIAL COMMITTEES on Spéciale au sujet de certains virements de Spécial Committee \"re\" certain variations of appropria- crédits ýýre\" construction d'égouts tions concerning the laying of sewers InPbe rendu de 1 'assemblée du 18 . mars 1915, a.in. Report of ineeting held on the i8th March 1915, zi.m. gents MM. les échevins L. A. Lapointe, Char- Présent: Ald. L. A, Lapointe, Cha-rtrand, Pauzé,, Van- auxé, Vantelac et Ménard. delac and Ménard. 'é et lue copie de la résolution du Conseil, en date Submitted and read a copy of the résolution of Council 'R)zf,8 courant, constituant cette Commission. adopted on the 15th March instant, appointing this Coin- 'I', ý '. ý m ittee. Isé- aux archives, Filed of record. Pé,'llevin Lapointe est nommé président. Ald. L. A. Lapoitite Was elected Chairrnan.- uýiS et lu le rapport -du Bureau des Commissaires i.-Submitted and read the report from the Board of cette Commission et recomniandant certains vire- Commissioners. submitted to this Committee and recoin- relativement à la construction, d'égouts. rnending certain variations of appropriations in connec- tion with the layiiig of sewers. ipcussion, After discussion, it was FOPFùsition de M. l'échevin L. A. Lapointe, il est On motion of Ald. L. A. Lapointe, it was QUe M. Alexandre Martin, du Département des Resolved' That Mr. Klexandre Martin, of the Sewers lreç,olve instruction de soumettre à cette Commission, Department, be instructed to submit to this Conimittee, ;,)rochain, 2o du courant, un état démontrant; by Saturdav next, the 2oth instant, a statement showing: utsneantenus dans le rapport du Bureau des i' The sewers mentioned in the report.of the Board en date du 27 février igi5, qui ont été ter- of Commissioners, dated the 27th February 1915, which ýÉ1ýx qui ne l'ont pas encore été; were completed and those which havé not yet beeh coin- pleted; a date OÙ ces égouts ont été commencés et celle où 2' The date when said sewers were cornmenced and' -ý6tý -.cQrjqplétés; that upon which they were compýeted; e- cause de la balance restant disponible dans certains 3 on why there still remains an available ba- lance in certain cases; cause du défaut de fonds dans certains autres; Why funds are lacking in certain other cases; estimeý -préparés 'dans -chaque cas par le Départe- 5' The 'estimates prepared -in each case by the Public Travaux Publics. Works Departinent. \"ýtat devant'indiquer de plus si les crédits demandés S.aid statement, furthermore, to show whether the ap- ''àý,LnmP]étion de certains égouts seront suffisants pour propriations asked for the completion of certain sewers ces ýtr\u0026vaux; si les tiravauxont été suspendus, dans will be suffiýÀent to comblete said works; whether the '6Ü l'oil dernàýàe dès- crédits supplémentaires ou si works were suspended, in cases-where additional appro- ndÈ ces crédits en *prévision du manqué dý fonds priations are asked for, or, if such appropriations are ýCerý lesdits :travaux, si les estimés sont maintenant asked for in anticipation of lack of funds to complete seld uneýf -ing prepared in a inore on plus exacte; si,,deg sondages sont faits works; if the estimates are now be -que -1 if borings are now made before the es- ui avant que les estimés, ne soient préparés; et accurate manner it ýrié de donner tous autres renseignements timates are prepared; and that Mr. Martin be requèsted Es de renseigner la Commission. to ail other information calculated to enlighten the CoLllettee. 'ý'Pt0P0Sition de M J'échevin L. A. Lapointe, il est On motion of Ald. I_ A..Iapointe, it was also De Prier le Contrôleur et Auditeur de la Cité de Rcsolved- That the City Comptroller and Auditer bc. à la iýOmmWion d'ici samedi prochain, 2o du cou- requested to subrait to this Committm by SaWr\"ý: nélxtj at démontrant - 20th instant, a statement showing. çýédits votés pour. chacu n-, des égouts contimus dans« i* The appropriations voted for tâch of the : stwe\" 4u lýureaudçs CommksWres, en, date du 27 f\u0026 mentioned in the report of the Board,ôf C014eigene.Ési dated the 27th Februaryigi5; ...\",différents comptes £égouts_,qlai sont soutirés et 2' The différent over-dra= accounts for se»'O$ #4: qont soutirés;,: since when said accounts were over-drawn; \"différen 1 tg égouts dont là construction est terminée .3' The different:seWers the laying of whichý,ieý', ce4\u003eih- de la'cotttplàiý.n dç. n which saidworks *ere cotaplote\u0026, pleted and the date et f 1 er à la And thut said official be al\" 1requestedý ta exPl to otict ionrfaire soit âusýýi Pm exp iqu comment et pourquoi certàffis câmptes sont ainsi the Conimittec how and why certain accc\u003eU»ts ýdë'donner tous aufres'iéàseignémentà '$Ùicepfibids c-iver-draw-n, and tu glye -,a such other '9S et' ladite commission.,, may értlighten Said Committee, ttec then adjourned undi MOuduYý ÜM \"JI' awrî î.1un« M du courant. à £lie Commi o'cloçk affi.",
         "BULLETIN MUNICIPAL«DE MONTREAL 8w MUNICIPAL BULLETIN, OF MONT SPecial Committee \"te\" purchase of J. I-1. Pagell' Commission SPéciale \"te\" achat propriété J. \u0026 H. Pagé. perty Compte rendu de l'assemblée du 18 mars 1915, a.m. Report of meeting field on the igth March igl,5o.::: Sont Drésents: MM, les écIýevins Ménard, Rochoii, St- Were present: Aldernwn'Ménard, Rochon, St-Pier Pierre, Groux et Pauzé. roux and Pauzé. 'Soumise et lue la iésoltition du Conseil constituant cette Submitted and read a resolution of Couiicil appointi Commission. Committee. Déposée aux archives. Filed of record. M. l'échevin Ménard est iwmmé président. Alderman Ménard was appointed Chairman. i.-Soumis et lu le rapport du Bureau des Commissaires, i,.-Submitted and read a report f rom tife Board transmis à cette Commission et recommandant l'achat, au prix missioners, transmitted to this Committee and reco, de $ioooo de la eeprîété de.MM. joseph et Hormisdas Pagé, the purchase. for the price of $ioooo, of the pro pour les fins de 1 expropriation du chemin de la Côte-des-Nei- Messrs.. joseph and Hormisdas Pagé, for the exprOP of Côte des Neiges Road. Aere délibération, il est Aîter discussion, it was lksolu: De recommander au Conseil d'adopter ledit rap- Resolved: That a report be made to Council, recoo Port ing that said report be adopted. Ai rnçment. ou Adjottrbed. J. E. GAÙTHIER, J. E. GAUTNIERýý Secrétaire. secte Commimion Spéciale au sujet de cortai\" virements de 8,pecial. Cd\u003en=ittet \"te\" certain variations of alp) crédits relativement à la. construction de pavages tions in connection with the laying of paviu9ý', Compte rendu de'l'assemblée du ig mars igi5, a.m. Report of meeting held on the i8th Match 1915, 'Éffl fýýents:, MM. les échevins L A. Lapointe, Charý Present: Ald. L. A. Lapointe, Chartrand., Pauzé',, trand, Pauzé, Vandelac et Mérar\u0026 - ý delac and Ménard. souwi\"', et lue la résolution du Conseil en date du 15 mars Subrnitted and read a resolution of Couneil date4'ý cWant,ý rzonstituant,îcétte Commissioný 15th Match instant, appointing this Committee. DéV.osýée, aux archives,: Filed of record. Al Lapàtnte eit nommé président. Ald. L. A. Lawîntê uppointed Chairman., I.-Souriiw et 11; le Yapport du Burëau des CSnMi\"airýs -subrnitted and týad a report from the BOar, tresmmi çette reeýezmnaudant le vi ut Commi5sioners iranstnitie4 to this Committee en\u0026 de certains créýdits- pcnit I.ý pavages per=nents. commëndine the varýatiôn of certain approeia.ti the laying ofpermaneut pavings Après 4i8cuW0i1ý Aftes Sur la X.,Véchý_ýk L, ý,',up0inte, il'est On inotion -of AIdý I. A. Lapointe, it was; al Résolu: Que le Dépàiltèment des Travaux Publics soit prié Resolved: 'Fhat the Public Works Déearýleilt c0mMisýiw, d'iciýJe,20 di, q1legted tO submit tô tjÉis:Cijn=iittec, bjr the 2moth état, démontrant tl a igtatemeiu showins . le La date oÙ les pavages, contenus dans. rapport du i* Thé date on which tho Iavtng% =entioneý4 Bureaý des Commissaires en date du 16 février igTS, ont été report of the Bdardof CiDtntùlsàionerg, dated the,ý-, commencée et celle oùils ont été complétés- Februarv 1915, wcrebequn and thé date on whi welle ÇqMpleted; 2â La cause à laquellz'deit être attnbliée la balance de 2':- The reàson yhy îhere is a balance, a app ctéât.* restant disponible dans.certams avafiable in certam éjse 3 'e ý,La cause (41.,défaut de fonds dans çert-ain.s.gutrés cas; 3' The reas-on why ther.e were. not ag#éfent certain othci cases; qui ont été: et ceux qui ý4' The pavingîý which were, laidb3ý. d ont those that were laid, by tontract;: S' Celm \u0026s crédîtf\u003e demandés qui doivent pariaîre là soin- 5\" Thç appropriation$ aâed for 'to make . up the, me req11iýe 'pour, la e=PlétiOn des Pavages:et lýètL't Qui dci- te, complete the Pàiýn9à and those which velât scrvir à Fam les sommes d ' ucs à d'Cs eutrëPt=eurs; bé applied. to the payaient of the sums due to coft e Là nattire des réclamýàtions 'des entrepreneure (bh'al1ce 6\" The nature of the contractors, claims (bu de prix de wnttate, reen-ue, iut6rêt ou autre)ý; contract price,,percentagt retained, intexest, etc. 7 Le-, estimés pfléparés pour chacun des pavages cofiý 7ç1 The ceimatez prëpared., for each of , theýý' tenus dan$ le rapport du Bureau des Cenumsgairés. in the report Of'the Board of Comrà! Et que !ýdi t téparterne nt soit aumi . prt , ë de fournit à là 'And that sai ' d dép artmentý býe , also rdrquested- 1 ýtý 1 ',ComiotuijDn tot1g autres 17cnseignemènts s-ePtibIeý- de fýën- thfs Committu' 'Wtth' eny information whiçh n1;ýy",
         "TIN MUNICIPAL DE MONTREAL 357 MUNICIPAL BULLETIN OF MONTRP-A la Commission et de dire si des mesures ont été prises te Cottattee, and t tate if an maures h ae b 'u,à J'avenir, les estimés pour pavages soient fis cae mo averteetm tsm di uue nam r c lpropositio acte M. r'écevin L A. Lapointe, il est On motion of Ald. L. A. Lapointe, it was also u: -Que le Contrôleur et Auditeur soit prié de fournir Rsle:Ta h oprl radAdtrb e ótMission, d'ici sanmedi prochain, 2o du courant, un état qetdt upyti omte yStra et h 20rantat taenn soig e''S crédits votés pour dhacun des pavages contenus l h rporain oe o aho h aig erapport du Bureau des Commissaires en date du 16 mnindi h eoto h or fCmisoes esdif férents comptesade pavages' qui sont soutirés et 2.Tedféntacusfopvigwhhhvebn quand ces comptes Sont soutirs;oedanadsnewnthsiehvebn ve Qessont les crédit demndés qidoient servir à oWa r h prpitin hc aebe se balances dues à des entrpeeurs comme baladice fo opyteaunsdeocnrcosasblcef dlcontrats, retenues, intérêt, etc.; otatpie rcng eand nees t.; 1-a1iture des réclamations des entrepreneurs et la ma- 4'Mentrofhectatrs lishemnr ees réclamations sont certifiées et contrôlées. adcimarcetfdanvrfe. \"'u e f.onctionnaire soit aussi prié d'informer la Con- Adta adofca ealorqetdt nor h Sdans le cas où tes travaux sont faits à l'entrepnise, omtewhhrtecs fpaiglidbcntat dsPavages a excédé les estimes préparés par le Dé-e- des Travaux Publics; et, dans le cas où les travaux eatnt;ndwhhrteco fpviglidbdy fts à la journée, si le coùt des pavages a excédé le lbrecee h rorto h edr uiitdo . de la soumission faite, au nomn de la \\Ville, par M:bl hl fte'iyb \"\"éier en Chef de la Ville; et que ce fonctionnaire Ciy .JnCheEgncrote \u0026 donner tous autres renseignements susceptibles iier la Commission.An htsiofiilb ute qetdt gean Ro e d: Thor at the Comptrolfer and the A ud itorn t nmisions'aoure aorsà lndi le22 u cu quesàThed tomsuppl ths Comitee by Stur Moyte2d ac instant, ai satenntsowg datedare thee6t Feruay 1y5 2* Te dffernt ccouts r pamgswhic haeel",
         "BULLF-týiN M\"(WCIPAL DE MONTREAL 358 MUNICIPAL BULLETIN Oeý MONTg BUREAU DE8 COMMISSAIRES BOARD OF GOMM1881ONERS. Compte rendu de l'assemblée du 18 mars 1915, p.m. Report of meeting held on the 18th! March MM. les Commissaires Hébert, Aincy, McDonald. Messrs. Hébert, Ainey and McDonald, Comnoss... En l'absence de Son Honneur le Maire,,M. le Commissaire, In the absence of His Worahip,.the Mayo.r,, Hébert est appelé à présider. sioner Hébert was called'to the i7hîàir. I.-Sur proposition. de M. le Commissaire McDonald, ap- X.-On mofion of Commissioner McDq!ýald puyée par M« le Commissaire Ainey, il est bY Commissioner Ainey, itYàs Résolu: Que les minutes soient approuvées. Resolved: That the m*41'uýtes' be aýprovied.. 2.-Sur proposition, de M, le Commissaire Ainey, appuyée 2-On motion of Commissioner;Aîney, secondo.d\" Paý M. le. Commissaire McDonalà, il est Commissioner McDonald, it was J Résýlu De faire rapport au Canseâ: Pesolvéd-.' Toiréport td Councilý_ 9Ûafin d!arriver à unie solution de la question de la Mu Thai in order to solve the question of the mu nicipalisation ýdu Service des Bâteaux Traversiers, le Bureau ization of fhe f rry service, the 13àard had a spe fait faire une étude spécialedý problème Qar M. A.-Ang- cf this eoblem. made'by Mr. A. Angstrorn, NP\" .5trciný Architecte Naval et Ingénieur de Marine Consultant. -tect and Consulting Marine Erigineer. Le repport Je M.-Angstrom a été soumis à votre BiireaÙ, Mt. Angsirorn's report was- submitted to t e ar' et -les conclusions sont qu'avec deux bâteaux traversiers mo- the con'-,Itisions were that with two modern fer dtr es, la Ville pourrait donner un service parfait de traverse the Citv could givea perfect ferry service betweé'nýý ù ilile Sainte-Hélèiie- Le coût de ces bâteaux s.'élèverait ap- CitY and St. Helen's Island. Th cost ôf saidbQats proximativemelit à $610oo chacun ' et lé coût du service est amourit approximately. to esooo each, and th ço éValüé à $22,71,;.20 par 52iSon, Il y aurait aussi une dépense de said service !S estimated at 42,715.20 per sease quel4tie;miflicegde dollars à faire pour améliorer les ter- oný minus de la traver5ý. A few thousand dollars wouldalso have ta bc cd in ordèr to Împrove the ferry terminals.. Votre Bureau doit déclarer que, pour le moment, il\u003ene croit Your Board beg to state that, for the time being, pas devoir décider définitivement si la traverse sera complète- do not deem it advisable to décide definitely wheth ment gratuite, ou bien si un montant minimum sera chargé aux ferry service will bc completely free, or whether a -'adultes. Il est cependant bien entendu que les femmes et les 'Il bc charged ta adults. enfants ýcront transportés gratuitement. It is, however, well understood that women'and, dren will bc carried free. Votre Bureau. après avoir fait le travail nécessaire afin Your Board after having donc the necessar w de: se corf ormer au désir - exprimé par. le Conseil à dif fértntes order to comýly to the désire expressed hy L C retuises \u0026mandant là municipalisation de la traverse de PIle at différent times, as well as by a great number of a lequel désir, d aillçursý était celui d'un grand tions, and the publie generally, that the St« Helen's yiombre d'asscciations, et même on pourrait dire de toute la ferrY ýervice:ýbe rnwiicipalized, were prevented froin c rpula'ti-ckn 4-, ýcctte ýVille, a été empêché de mettre ce projet out said project, owilfg to the ilnpossibility, of talci exécil 9, eâuýe 'de l'impossibilité de prenore sur le of the Loan Fund tbe sums required for.thelp.urch 'Fonds eE unt leý \u0026ommes requises pour l'aéhat de bâ- boats and.thle, wharves andlandîngs,', et la c6uýtitýîon de et dýbarcadèrÜ; 'A la sessionde b L4gimatit\" Rni vitlit de se 14 At the lait session of thé Législature the ç 4ýité a -olD4enu -je pcýu-Yoir de pttnee jur k Fqiýd8 E -pcwer ta take out 1DE the Loan un À les arelis -mais ýýprutJt gmfttecl the Irýz comme n est trop arnotinl requiredfor such purpose, but as it Wtoo tard ffwlnte=t potir rouïmilte'un bàteau pour ýajre le ser- -now to, build a ferry boat for the next season, te vice de la tra-ver,ý,e durant lap-roçhaine iàison,,des soumissions should be called for immediately-for thé..ferry pri doivent ètre demandées pourle privilèýc de untif the Citis ferry-boits have pjeen cons tructed, a1z'il latrevtrse crici à et que les bÙteaux tràversiersýdc la Cité ready to bc, operated. Said tenders shall. be aient été (ýOnstruits et Mis M service. Cte s0umisslans tër*.nt thtce alternatives, viz-: demadUes avec trôýis ?Jternatives, à savoir:. .1 Travèrsée gratuite' ýDw tôut le monde; .10 Freé titspcmt2ttion for the publk geÉeraJlý;r 2\" Traversée g.ràtuite poue les f emmes et lès enf ants;ý 9' Free trans ortatio-n for w.omen, aÉd ý childreti, , p l' Travèrsée aux conditions du ontrat, qui expire lé let 3' ýFree ttanSpottatioýU as per.the contract expire on the tst May lql5ý Chunt au prïvýlèze des rest=ants et d« amusements, des Ag ýto, the pf4-ý!1QKes of k-cepin. restaurants and ý;épa1,ées ýeX0nt demandées peikr rivilèges. ment a ces p ces, sepâxaté teuders bc called for thç votïi Blue\" recomtminde qu'tui crédit de,$6soS soit'vêté Your Roard recommend that of peur lai Permettre de demander des soumissions pour un hà- bt voted in order to enable thern to PIroliploi tendere, qui devra être mis en service d'ici à pas Plus fé:îý-btýat, rtady to bc 'operated bot laters than twoj de (feux arif,,e en outre, un, crëdit de 42oooo pour moo beý const irë heïnce, . id tÉat a further approprîaEah of $2co ýeý d\" 'quais etý,daarcà(fèr\" pour ladite traversé, cce montants cd for the construction of Wharvës and landings devant, être impâtés eur le Fonds d'Emprunt. iàid-. ferry, the said amoulit -geà- t S. to. be char againsýý Loan 1und. 31-(25909) Soumis un rapport du Greffier-Adiciint de la submitted a repart fr6w the Asd- recommandant de faire voter un crédit' au montànt de. tlerky iecommending tbat an'appropriation of $i; $1 1ýj,25, représejitant la quote-part payable ýar la Cité, polir representing the Ci'Ü,*â share of the cost of the 1w':ré;Jeio'ný de la 16te des électeurs parlementaires pour 1915. of ýthe narliaintntüy voter\u0026, list for 1915, be yot $* 1\u003eroposition de M. le Càmniis'ain Ainey, appuyée par, On motion of Côümflnioner, Ainey, second'ed 'UL le Co McDowddL ii WaJ3 ýýnmissaire McDoilàld. il estS",
         "LETIN MUNICIPAL DE MONTREAL 359 MUNICIPAL BULLETIN OF MONTREAI, De recommander au Conseil le vote de la somme Resolved: That a report bc made to Council, recom- Pour les fins mentionnées audit rapport. niendinL, that the stim above mentioned in said report bc voted. Soumise une communication deMM. J. 0. La- 4--(25902) Stibinitted a communication fTom M'essrs. Cie, demandant la remise d'un dépôt au montant J. 0. Labrecque \u0026 Cie, askilig for the refuiid of a deposit uniotinting to $3,000, -PrOPIDSition de M. le Commissaire Ainey, appuyée par On motion of Commissiolier Aiiiey, seconded by Coin- C'ommissaire McDonald, il est missioner McDonald, it was lu' De référer au Surintendant des Achats et des Resolved?. That the sanie bc referred to the Purchas- Pour Tapport. ing and Sales Agent for a report. 0 se une communication de M. Z. Corbeau, au sujet 5.-Submitted a communication from Mr. Z. Corbeau, Ination, au montant de 44,146, en rapport avec la aiient his claim amountifig to $24,146.oo, in connection il de la 5ième section de l'égout du quartier Notre- with th , construction of the 5th section of the sewer of de_ rAces. Notre-Dame de Grâces Ward. ýropositîon de M. le Commissaire Ainey, appuyée par Pn motion of Commissioner Ainey, seconded by Corn- ý-ý issaire McDonald, il est missionçr McDonald, it was 1)e référer à l'Ingénieur eii Chef pour rapport. Resolved: That the same be referred to the Chief En- gmeer for a report. Soumis le dossier concernant l'achat de la 6.-(2475,-) Subrnitted the document anent the.purchase dt M. Isaie Marsolais, en rappor t avec l'élargisse- of Mr. Isaïe Marsolais' property, in . connectioiý' with t he la rue de Montigny. îdening of de Montigny street. Prý0P05ition de M. le Commissaire Ainey, appuyée par On motion of Commissioner Ainey, seconded by Corn- ,,'ÇothtiýC'ssaire McDonald, il est missioner McDonald. it was De recommander au Conseil de voter un crédit Resolved: That a report be made to Council, recoin- taire 'au montant de $373.55,-Pour clore cette tran- mendinZ that a supplementary appropriation aniortnting to $373.55 bc voted, in order to close said transaction. (2ffl ) Soumis un rapport du Surintendant des Achats, 7ý(258M) S4binitted a report from the Purchasi ng and entes, recommandant de rembourser à M. 0. Filioril- Sa'es A-gent, red8rriménd.ng that Mr. 0.- Filion be refund- au montant de $2,8, cri rapport avec la démolition de ed his deposit amountin, tO $28, in cohnection with' the bâtisses sur les rues.Charnbord et des Carrières. démolition of certain buildings on Chambord and des Cairières streets. ,11rùPosition de M. le Commissaire McDotiald, appuyée On etion of 'Conimissioner McDonald, seconded by k Commissaire Ainey, il est Commissioner Ainey. it was D'autoriser la remise dudit dépôt. Resolved: That the refund of said deposit be authot-, ized. is dés mandats, vérifiés par le Contr ôleur et Audi- 8.-Submitted warrants, verified by the City Comptrol- au montant de $iio54-8o, suivant liste certifiée. ler and Auditor, amounting 10 $1I,054SO, as per certified ý1n0Position de. M. le Commissaire Ainey, appuyée parr. On motion of Commissioner Ainey, seconded by Corn- McDonald, il est missioner McDonald, it was D'en autoriser le paiement. Resolved: That payment of saine be authorized. 3) Soumis un rapport du Département en Loi, 9--(25883) Subtnitted a report froni the Law Départ- dant le règlement de la réclamation de M. Louis1ý ment, recommending that Mr. Louis Lemonnier's claim r, ýen payant au demandeur une somme de $45o en! be settled by paying to plaintîff a sum of $4_ýo in..éapital, -Oiterest and costs.'er-, térêt et f rai\u0026 position de M. le Commissaire Ainey, appuyée par On -motion of Commissioner Aincy, seconded by Com- missaire McDonald, il est missioner McDonûId, it was D'autoriser le règlement de Resolved.- That the settlement of said claÎm, bc au- ladite réclamation, le t requis àý être pris sur le Fonds de Réserve, thorized, the amount required to be charged against the Réserve Fund, mmissaire Çôté prend son siège. Î Commissioner Côté took his seat, )ý SoumW un rapport du Surintendant des Io. 1 (25W7) Submitfed a report from the Purchgsing -e dés Ventes, transmettant le résultat de là vente de and Sales Agent, transmitting the resuit of -a sàlé:,ý6i Or- Propriétés vendues aux ench\u0026es, le 26 f éviier der- Il twn pýoperties sotd by aulttion on the 26thýFebruàr el lcoïilý- sition le Commissaire Ainey, appuyée par On motion of Cominissioner Ainey, seeon(fid iesaké c6té, iltfit missioner côté, it was De ýéposéT aux archives, aprs en avoir transmis Resolved,- That the same be filed of reedi'd . after- côý,Y :t thereof has been transmitted te the City Treagarer. Sotinis rgW# 4ýiDépartement en Loi, Subrnitted a report . ftôm the . làw.'Dep à É tý de la loi àes pavagee ment ànent the palving law. 'tion de M ' le- cowinissaire Côté, appuyée :Par 0-111etion of Comrnissioner'Côté,: ieconded_ hy 1ý ebM- ire Ainey, il ut issîoner Ainey, it wis e..'De'eéférer ledit ra 1 pport au Commissaire en Char-. Resolved: That \"sae rep6n bé réf 1 erred . t .. b: tfiè,,. -éOrttinent des Finances, Po-Ur étudierý cette question rnissioner in charge of, the Finân ce DepaKment to Con- \"avec le CAnntrôleur et Auditeur et VAvocat en CW sider said question Wift the Comptroller and Aulditor and et wur faite sous le plus court déJai possible, les, t1je Chief City Attorney, aýid to niake within the shQetst croira devoir. sownettre.: possible delay the suggestion which they will thigit ýýe- Z Visable'in the matter. :Wk, $oümîgý un e4ttait -du -procès-verbal d'une Sublnitttd ali 'extraçt ftorp the rnie stit, tenue le 15 mars, au sujet des 14nitew du a meeting of Couricil held on the t,5thMàtcb, M, 'de Wk Cýmmissaire Ainey, appi On Motidil'of Comeissioner 'Ain !Paire Il est, Surintendant d'es Parcs p0uîiâpý \"RICýýivedi cla,",
         "BULLETIN MUNICIPAL DE MONTREAL sw MUNICIPAL:BULLÉTIN OF MONT 13 (25834) Soumise une communication de M. Maxwell 13--(258W Submitted a communication from. C-oldstein, au sujet des tag-dajrs. Maxwell Goldstein te tag-days. Sur proposition dé M. le Commissaire McDonald, appuyée On motion of Commissioner McDonàld, secon . de Par M. le Commissaire Aiiiey, il est Comnaissioner Ainey, it was Résolu: De référer au Surintendant de Police pour riap- *.Resolved. That the same be-referred to the SU porL tendent of Police for a report. 14--(25821) Soumis un rapport de 1'lngénieur en Charge 14.-(258zi) Subrnitted a report from. the Engillr du Département des Egonts, au sujet de l'avis signifié à la charge of the Sewer Department, anent a protest ý Cité,, d'avoir à retenir le montant de $428.85, sur le montant upon the Cityý to retain an amount of $428-85 cm dû à M. Tromas IF. Dwyer .(rêclamati - oh de \"The Herbert arnount due ta Mr. Thomas F. Dwyer (claim of thcý!'- Morris Crane \u0026 Hoist Co., Ltd.ý1). berý Morris Crane \u0026 Hoist Co. Ltd.). .-Sur proposition de M. le, Commissaire Côté, appuyée par On mot'on of Commissioner Côté, seconded by M. le Commissaire McDonald. il est missioner ':ýcDonaId. it was Résolu: Dé' référer au Contrôleur et Auditeur. Resolved: That the same bc referred ta the City tioller and Auditor. l-cý-(25877) Soumise une communication de M. William 15.-(25877) Submitted a communication from. Mt\", Davis, se plaignant du fait que l'.ûn cierce les chevaux sur liani Davis, complaining of tlýe fact that horses are 4 la rue Saint-Jacques (Upptý Lachine Road). ed On St. James street (Cpper Lachine Canal). Suvr appuyée 0' cosition, dé,M.,Ie ýCommîssaire McDonald, n motion of ConimissionerMcDonald, seecri 'Par Commissaire Ainey. il est Commissioner Ainey, it was .!Zéiroiu:. De référer au Su tendant de Police pour rap- Resolved: That the same bc referred ta the Departinent for a report. j6.-(25gii) Sournis un rapport dnSurintendant de Po-ý 16.-(259ýi) Subrnitted a report from the Chirf lice, recommandant de donner instructions au Département lice, recommending that instructions bc giv , des Achats et des Ventes,'de vendre de vieux matériaux pro- chasingand Sales Department ta sell old ý111.1t 101ia1h1,e, venant de l'ancien systme de patrquille du'pw.te de police du theold patrol system. of the St. Henry Ward Poli quartier Saint-Henri. tiq'n. Sur proposition de M. le Combissaire McDonald, appuyée On motion ý, of Commissioner McDonald, secon par M.. le Commissaire AineY, il est Commissictier Ak Mey, it. was Résolu: De réfëlrer ala Surintendant des Achats et dés lufiolvm. Tliatthë saine bc referred ta the Pu Ventes. ing and Sales Agent, i7.ýý(23684) Soumis un rapport du Département en, Loi, 17ý(23684 -Subinitted a. report from Law D il d rig the Law D au sujet des droits que possède la V le v construire destrot ment, anent the hts of the City ta lay wooden taira en bois dans les rues qui ne sont:pas sa propriété.. i . .., walks in strects which are not its property. Sut proposition de M. le Comlin siswre Côté, appuyée par On motion of Cornmissioner Côté, seconded bYý M.. le Commissaire Aincy, il ce missioner Ainey, it was Ë.êsoluý 1ýedéposer aux archives. Resolved: That the same bc filed of record. 1\u0026-Soumis ' un rapport de l'Ingénieur en Chef-Suppléant, Ig.-gubrnittçd a report ira. the Actin hief transmettant un état du coùt approximatif des améliorations gilleer, transmitting a statement of thé approxi de surface et souterraines sur une rue de 66 pieds de largeur, of the surfàce and undereoundliprov ts in a tu 'de un mille de longueur.. 66 £cet wide and a mile long Sur proposition-de M. le Commissaire-Côté, appuyée par On motion of Commissioxier Côté, se 'oded, y M. le Commissaire Ainey, il est missioner Ainey, ît was c ; 0 b ,QI De dëposer aux archives, après en avoir transmis That the sanie.be filed ofrecord . aft dés Membres du Bureau. ing transrnitted a zopy thtre of ta, each of the MSem the Board, soumis un rapportdu Département en LOý . 1qý-(25828) suhraitteà a reÉ;Qrt from, the Làw, D (k,çertaints rue-% cotnmgs..rtitS ..znent, aacnt the registration Df certain streets as 14-Je 0»ý appuyée par O'n, motion of Conirniàsi M, le Côirmbsàire,'Aiýey, il 1 loner Côýé, seconded by -migskorier Ainey,- it wag Rýsolu;- De 'r qgcý la, partie de, I;ý rue' Labélleýý en, =ý1 rièsolved: That rÉpnirt, bé Madèl. to Council, ràVetiUe ý raýý* que. éýW$ et de n'endinz thut that part of \"belle Street, betw\"rl de' ifi Xé le$ Boïtr, de la rite riniont an Prénoveau, à partir de la ýue-Catrfëre' jus 'qu'à environ 2,,;o d Bellechasse stretta; 01 Pacific averlu'', pieds au nord, de la rue Larwricière ýoicnt. ilisciýtescc\u003emme ween Labelle and Boyer streets, of prénoveau, rues publiques. 'fom Cati iýres ta about 25cÉ feet northwards, of ciète street, bc inscribed as public thoroughiares; :a-(25104) Soumis un rapport du Dépiartement en Loii concernant le compte de M. W. A. Wood, au montant de $99, .26-(25 144) Subinitted a répoit froni the LaW meTIt, anent thé accourit from W. W.. A. Wood, a)* YYesentant la valeur dýune, horloge qui aurait été achetée.par ta ýk» reprémenting the value afu clock purýh âgénlcür en Chef,. dans lé cours, de l'année 1913, intife Chief Engincer c1uribg thilyear lei, X le Commissaire Côté, appuyée Par 111. On motion of L Comtnî\u0026gioner Ailley, il est Côtéli missioner Ainey, it was Résolu Que conformément audit rapport; M. W. ýA Wood -Rscd 3ý ,d; As per said report thàt Mr. W. A. mé' qUt ta Ville n'elýtelid pas achetèr cette horloge;; kformed et de _bÎen 'vOÙlýir ýén reprendre possession sans délai. - that the City does not intend to purehà\"\" lock and to rc1nove it -%,Vithout delay. -21-(2ý714-ý Soumis un rapport de l\"Ingénieur en Chd- 21--(23714) Submitted a report froin the Act'111-ý' uný estimé du Coût des améliorations RýffinceT'ý frangmittibgail e timate of the c:ost Of i a faire, sur la ruellr, Contaut Me13t,ý tq bc made on Ccràtan-t lanc, Sur' prcpmhicmý de' M. W Commigsai Ôté, appuyée liar On motion of, c 1 Omiiiiiisièter le corfimis\"ire Aittty\u003el il M re missiôner ffineY, -t wàs Réeolu - De téf èrer aw Déffiutement en lai pour sivoif. el Resolved: 'Thal the same'ýerefér . 1. ed tu t ýp faisant Comint L c, _déclarer cette, ruelle rtl,- Publique, la Ville vartincrif. in order, trý 1mew 'if b haiiipz nid sera feýwe de faire ex\u0026 ed as puh1icý ïtreetý the Citv ,,b,,U v4 bel, to ýperf idans le raWrt de lIngénitur, en Ch0f-Supp14antý of thç,,'4-, Engineer.",
         "TIN\",MUNICIPAL DE MONTREAL MU141CIPAL BULLETIN OF MONTREAL ý25296) Soumise une interpellation de M. l'Echevin 22.-(25296) Submitted a- question put by Ald. Laver- e ýu sujet des travaux en cours d'exécution, dans le iýýe a.ent the works under way in Rosemont, Ward. r proposition de M le Commissaire McDo-nald, appuyée On motion of Commissione. McDonald, seconded b- le Commissaire Ainey, il est - Commissioner Ainey, it was De référer au Surintendant de Police. Resolved: That the sanie bc referred to the Chief of Police. QuMise le dossier concernant l'expropriation pour ý3--Submitted the documents coiriceriling the expro- ent du Chemin de la Côte-des-Neiges, de l'avenue priation re Výideiiiiig of Côte des Neiges Road, from Pline la rue Sherbrooke. avenue to Sherbrooke street. PrcPO$ition de M. le Commissaire CÔté, appuyée par otion of Commissioner Côté, seconded bv Com- ý0n1MiSsaire Ainey, il est missiolier Ainey, it was Pe référer au Président du Bureau des Estima- Resolved: That the same be referred to the Chairman savoir: of the Board of Assessors in order to know:1 serait le coùt approximatif de cette expropriation; What would be the approximate cost of said exPr priation; - a-voir s'il n'y aurait pas lieu d'en charger le coùt 2' Whether the cost thereof in whole or in part should Ouen partie aux propriétaires appelés à bénéficier de not be charged to the proprietors who would beneflt by said improvement; 'ý'Ïl'tur diterminer quels sei-ont les propriétaires qui de- 3' Who are the proprietors who woul-d be'called UPOn ý\"1ýýtTQaPPeliS à payer le coùt de telle expropriation, et to pay the cost of such expropriation ' \u003e and on receipt of lAu,ÇU.t rapport de référer le dossier'au Département said report, that all the documents be referred to the Law ; r rapport sur la procédure à suivre pour cette ex- Department for a report on the pro£çeding$ tol:)e taken 1ýp 1. . 1 1 . - for said expropriation. 1( e9) Soumis un rap 24-(25719) Subrnitted a rePoIrt frOm the Chie' of Po- port du Surintendant de Police, of, nt la pose d'enseignes au coin des rues Saint- lice, recommending that signs bc erected at the corner 4acques, poui en*,ÉýheT la circulation des voi- St. Gabi-iet and, St. James strects, in order to prevelit vc- hicular traffic. Sition de M. le Cortitniseaîte Mcl)onàild, àpMtyée On motion of Commissionet McDonald, seconded by Commissioner CÔté, it w-as hief of 'CQàn*iàsaire Côté, il est 'De doorier instructions au Surintendant de Police Resolved: That instructiens be given to theC ','préparer et installer le;senseigneg recommandées, le Police to bave said skris ntade and plaçed,-the Board tO tdicider S'il yz lieu de se dispenser du service decidewhether constablei can be.dispensed with, if Said les Sfil. esi établi que ces enieignes sont une pro- signs-,proye tobe an adequate prQýtection for the pàtw antç pour le public. 'ýý 1 Southis un rapport du Département en Loi, 25ý-(243o8) Submitted 'a report from the Law, Dçpartý ent of a claim f rom Mr. H. R. Lord- ent dýja. compte, de M. H. R, Lordly, au ment, anent the paYm f ýj,9oG for f ees due in -èonnedtion'*hit. the i,\" pour honoraires dus en rapport avec les ly. for a sura oý arial of-',the Aquèduèt. Aé Voaïes5ement du, Canal de l'Aqueduc. w-dening o4 the C ition de M. le Corrkwissaire Côté, appuyie PU on motion of Commissioner Côté. secon1ded lie eûzný ilstaire McDonald, il est missioner 11cDonald, it was recommander de nouveau au Conseil, le paie- Resolved: - To againrecommend to the Couricil the paynieint ef said. account. Soumis un rapport du Surintendant de Ilo- 26.-(25647) Subrnitted a report frorn the Chief of Po- ant une liste des proprielaires d'immeubles oc- lice, transmitting a list of proprietors of lodgings occupied e maisons de désordre notifiés par un agent de as disorderly houses, notTfled by a constable, in accord- formé-Ment aux dispositions du Code Criminel. ance w:th the provisions of the Criminal Code. ition de M. le Commissaire McDonald, appuyéeý On motion of Commissionizr McDonald, seconded by Commissioner Ainey, it Was De transinettre copie de ladite liste à l'eéchevin Resolved: Te transmit copy of said list fo ýAld. 13lu-.. menthal. S . ournis, 4c 1'Architecte de ta Vil- _27.--ý-1,j5876) Submitted a rëport-from the.Çity ArC41rý ent the,éonstraction of th \u003e Té \"deg travauk de cmýstr«c1ié11 de lucaserile de pomý tect, an e treaultvilllc Fltt on de M 1eý Co\" 'ssaire XcDk)*aldý- appuyée On motion of Commissioner ýAàieyîf.,î1 Commissioner, Aiv\", it was re 1 f ' Che j . e., Département ived. Týhat the sanie be ref erred t the Chief of %ýcr . au des rncen- RcW the Pire Department for a report. SI un' fappo, 1 ft.. du ChL4 du Département \u0026g In- e.---Submifted a report froni the Chief ëf the ire, -4t4et du r confÀmction en voie de Parts. ent ament thebuilding 1,\u003eI- which is be le CônntiieWee McDonald\u003e a\"uyée On motkm- Q£ý,CQM -M îsýaîre Airtey,, il est Oinvaissioner Aincy, e t)ý, mettr ; !ýejýQved,, The said 11,;, é ledit râpp,ý)rt au 'Coneeil poux ré- 1 - , ý1' for referen e te, lilé Legi4aticii; C M 1ýaV pinzt dû,,CIW du Détartemmt à\" In- 1:;\", »1_:ýý ftéd a tev«t fýeouý the les change dww la ýbriwt: ù=ant pariment on the changtsýMadc' iu the 4rç 491 ýçAp1ei:rfaz le L5ý MaTs cctufflt. tlye for1ýnight ending ()n the j5th 'Deonw by de M jç, Cornmýssaire, MtDqxýýl4,. apýuyéeý, -op mo4ý kaire Aiiý,e il est was 1\u003e aPProuver \u002bô àp 'Di ý1aid lesdits chaligeffients. sbeffif8 report' 0' aridant 1',uïito 4.",
         "BULLETIN MUNICIPAL DE MONTREAL 862 MUNICIPAL BULLETIN OF MONTREÀ., incombustibles apportées à l'incinérateur pour les faire vendre the Incinerator -sorted by his employées in Order- par le Département, des Achats et des Ventes. them sold by the Purchasing and Sales, Departmee, Sur proposition de K le Commissaire McDoilald, appuyée On fnotion of Commissioner McDonald, ssecondO par Commissaire Ainey, il est Commissioner Aincy, it was Résolu, IYapprouver ledit rapport. Resolved: To concur in sa-d report. 31.-(,-5111) Sur proposition de M. le Coiviiiîssaire Mc- 31ý(25I11) On motion of Commissioner McD,,,,_ Donald, appuyée par M. le Commissaire Côté, il est seconded by Commissioner Côté, it was Résolu: De réitérer au Conseil un rapport en date du 9 Resolved: To reaffirin a report made tc, Couricil mars - courant, recommandant d'opérer le virement d'un cré- gth March instant, recommending the variation dit de $550, pour l'entretien. d'un cheval et d'une voiture à propriation of $55o for horsekeep, for three désir! YVsage de trois'désinfecteurs du Département d'Hygiène. of the Hyg'ene, Departnient. 32.-(25903) Soumis un rapport du Directeur du Bureau 32ý(259O3) Subinitted a report from th' M tatistiqýies, recommandant le paie Municiýa1 dHygiène et de s - Health Officer, recommending the payment of ment des comptés ci-dessous au mont;%rit de $103 Peut confé mentioned accounts amounting t04103, for le ..rences sur l'hygiène des, enfants et la tuberculose: on Inf-zntile Hygiene and Tuberculosis: Dr G. J. Browne .. .. .. $40 Dr. G. J. Browne I)rj, N. Chaussé 5 Dr. J. N. Chaussé.. 25 Dr Dr. A. Cousineau Dr.j'- L Lesage 10 Dr. E. Usage ýDr: Gervais Drý J. il. Gervai s Dr',èhàrles Guilblault 5 Dr. Chailes Gifilbault - opérateur .. .. .... Armand Patebaude, 3 Aimand Patenaude; opýeratOr Total $'03 Total Sur proposition de M.. le Commissaire McDonald, appuyée. On motion of Commissioner McDonald, Èeco# par M . le Comnlissaire Aifiey, il-est Commissioner Ainey, it was, Résolu. D'autoriser le paiement desdiits comptes, à mf me Resolved: To authorize the payment of said ace ie crédit de $.s,,ooo voté à cette fin.' ex-appropriation of.,$5,ocýb voted. for such on de M. le Commissaire, Côté, appuyée 33. 33, s ote, seCOn --m-Sur propositi 'Oý mOtiOu Of COmmi SiOnér Cà M. 1, Commissaire AineY,ý il est -Commissioner iney, it was [ander au Contiffleur et.Aùditeur de la r and Résolu: De defr Resolved. Te ask the City Comptrolle tant Pris à fnéine le Fonds dEmplunt qui. Ount Ciféý quel est le mon What is the arripuiit taken from the Loan Accotint doit être remboursé Pair les pràpriêtàite6 pour égcuts, trot- rnust bé reimbursed by the proprietîofýs fur seWet]5,',. toits, etëi, en vertu de, l'Article 3531B dela Charte.. walks, etc, in virtue of, Article 35iB of the- ChartexA .34.ý-Sur rqposition de M. Commissaire MeDOnald, aP- 34ýO11 motion of Commissoner MeDonald,-se Puyée par d. le Commissaire Ainey, il est' by Commissicner Ainey, it was u;ý Que-la séance soit ajournée à vendredi, le, iý Resolved: That the meeting be adjourneil untit, à ii the igth:March ii a.m. inirs \u003e Il instant, at L, N. SENECAL, L. N. SENECAL,,ý ire- 4 Secréta* se-cr b,44, ýof meeting h d on the igth, March. 5, _endu ae eni dýi r9q sen Fréel M-K 1.es Con=j, klie Mrorship the Mujw !fi ý.4e, Che a McDo-nald, CU\u0026 c]Dpnald and Goç\u003emiï de M. le Comvlti2i*e Câté, aPPvYlk-,ý04 On mot: 5)4r . . . ton of comnil.9siône c0'téý b11ýý le ýcmmissaJre nii-sýiontý'Mc Donald, it was;: 24golii:. Que les min propoàitiý6ïi,-de-.Mi le conywi ý 0' 1 ' il ssairé Côté, appuyée ri motion of Commissioter Côté, sew Výr, M, le Commiss il:est e -oininiss;on r-fteDonald, it was ýeés,,o1tr. Que les, affidgvits- dé\"\u0026és dç\u003e,,aùt le Conseili Par Rglv'ed» Thàt. the affldaýJts, laid ý before' the' M. ilrizilevin Uluwenthal, au miet de ýertains Of£ciers. de by, Ald, Blumenthal tc thé LýaýW , alient certain Poliée Officer5,ý,J e, soient référés au DéPàrtemL4U en Loi, pour rappoirt ferrd epartment 1 fer wýreport X, (:ýoMMJssaîre Hébert prerid. $oâ: iièm. 'au su- -Seunllse une cýômmunîzation ommu 0 2 c nication fr tri je - t de l'acbýt'des, débentures de 1 iPalité ScOlalye anent the purchase ôf,, bonds from the School MMM 'i11týGrég0iýe le Thaumaturge. -bï: st. Grégoire Jc'J'hâumaturge.,ý Stir sîtibn de, K le Commissaire On motion of'Çoinmi\"iùncr...Cêté:,, M, lé, Hébert, il 'est, .Iliîosipnèr Hébèr't, ýt was De dépoer -aux arAf d. 'd. esolved: ýTh;at the %ame be file Of reco betrôleùi'à J% SübtiaiÏted warrarit8, verified 'h th ýàis, 'VériUs par le e c tý, I-Soumisdes man d 5rý diteur de la Cit,ý au montant -de silîiiailf ý.Jj4fý ýÈérti_%' ild Audiioý\u003e atuouoting te $À,,3l32ýoý61 a3 per Éeý,tifi Sùý ýropoýt1on de, M. le coilitni\"il' Hébert, ap of ç0mmifrsiongr Hébezt, seco«M,ý, rle puyée ple k commissaire côt\u0026.. IL est: usioner ç,ýté, ii wýâ,5 Ded 1atitori1se: le qlved'ý nzt the, payluctit",
         "L41ETIN MUNICIPAL I)F-- MONTREAL MUNICIAL BULLETIN OF MONTREAL un rapport du COritrÔleur et Auditeur de la 4ý,7Subn-1itted a report from, the City Comptro Sujet des démarches faites pour retracer'le man at u itor, anent the steps taken in order to trace tller, and la Commission Scolaire de Saint d A t he war- -Grégoire le Thau- rant pa'd to the School Board of St. Grégoire le Thauma- Pour les débentures achetées de cette dernière par turge, for the debentures purchased front the latter by the City. Proposition de M. 1, Commissaire Hébert, appuyée par On motion of Commissioner Hébert, seconded by Coin- 'e Ç-')mrniSsaiýe Côté, il est missioner Côté, it was ý - De déposer aux archives. Reso.ved-ý That. said report be filed of record. (2,802) Soumis un rapport du Département en Loi, au de la Passerelle construite par la \"Co 5.-(25802) SUbmitted a report from the Lavr Depart- -Pagnie David- ment, anent the over-head bridge erected by the Davidson an-deSSus de la rue Vinet. Co. over Vinet Street. ýPeOPOSition de M. le Commissaire Côté, CorninisSaire Hébert. il est appuyée, par On mùtion of Conim7ss'oner Côté, seconded- by Coin- m'ssioner Hébert, it was De référer à l'Ingénieur en Chef-Suppléant pour Resolved. That the same bc referred to the Acting rit e'n LO* with instructions to furn;sh immediately (Yurgence les renseignements demandés par le Dé- Ch'ef Engineer, the information sought for by the Law Depa 1 rtment. ý2'5à45) Soumis un rapport du Surintendant de IT- k-(25945) Subrnitted a report from the Supe mandant, l'installation de lampes additionnelles,, of the Light Department, recommending that additional F'athéliorerle service d'éclairage de la rue Bayle. lights bc installed in order to improve the l'ghting of Bayle Street.. iPr'OPOSItion de M. le Commissaire Côté, appuyée par ,%ýýeýnlnissaÎre Hébert, il est On motion of Coramissioner Côté, seconded by Corn- missioner Hébert, it was D'approuver ledit rapport. Resolvede: To concur in sad report. 3) Sournis un rapport du Surintendant des 7.-(25943) Subinitted a report from the Superintendent F- et. des Ventes, recommandant de rembourser les dé- of the Purchasing and Sa'es Department, recommen\u0026ng PrýS lnentýonnés, faits en rapport avec la démolition that the hereunder mentioned deposits made in connecý 1ýines bàtisses, savoir: t:on with the dernol-tion of certain buildings, be refund- ed, to wit: $90.20 J. G. Duquétte $90.20 re 27-50 0. Leclaire -ýý Ogîtion de M. le Commissaire Hébert, appuyée par On motion of Commis'sioner Hébert, secon-ded by Corn- etnmi=ire Côté, il est missirner Côté, it was D'autoriser la remise desdits dépôts. Resolved. That the refumd of said deposts be author- ized. 2$921) Soumis un extrait du procès-verbal d'une as- 8,=(25923) Subinitted an extract from tiie minutes oi la Commission Spéciale d'Enquète, au sujet de a meeting of a Special -Investigation -Committ ýe, anent :terrain Pqur l'établis senient d'un bain public, dans the purchase of a lot for the establishment of ( a. publie La Fontaine, recommandant le paiement de cer- bath in La JýOntaine Ward, recommending that certain account,3 be paid. M= de M. e Cf-in le Commissaire Hébert, aPPt'yéc Par On motion Of Commissioner Hébert, second d 'by mrnîssaire Côté, il est missioner Côté, it was De référer leÉýditS comptes au Département en Resolved. That said accounts be referred to the £4w Department for approval. souilnie M rapport dé rIngénicur en Chef- 9.ý(25932) Submitted a report from the Acting Chléi 1 l'ayis Signifié à la Cité J)al7 la \"MOnti.1al Pu- CorporýÉion\" de son intýéjtion d'ériger des Éo- Engineer, allent a notice served upon the City . by the, côté est de la rue Dumas. MOntreal Public - Service Corporation, of its intent*on crect poles, on the east side of Dumas etr\u0026\u003et,. ýý*roP0Sition de M. le Commissaire Côté, appuyée par '1ýOMmiSSai;re Hébert, il est On motion of Commissioner Côtéi i«onded',:by Co cnisskmer Hébert, it was De réýcommwder au Co eil l'octroi du permis Resolved: That a report be made ta, Couneui, rýý - aux conditiore ordinaires. . . 1 M l 1ý , ', endnz that said permission. asked for be grziited un the iisual conditions. \u003eMMM un t de l'Ingénieur en Chef- Sitbxftittýd a, report from the Acting Icýh-,ef ight, 1gincer,'ýeneiît à notice served'upon iffie City ýby tbe 8ur 17avis sign'fi' 17farilité par la \"MontreaI L El Co, Mo:ntrcaI;ýLight, Heât \u0026 Powér Col, of its son, â1tentioý -d'ériger un poteau sur un n0ýd erect a pole on McGill strt*tý north. of de. rue Youville. de M- k Commissairc Côté, appuyée par On'motion of ConirnisMoncr Côt1ý $aire, Hébem il: est: 'rriszioner Hëbett, lit was D recommander iù c That a re\"it bc ýjwà4ý\u003e X Conditionz ordinaires.\" Menaing ihat- the , -W Jw",
         "M4 MNCPLBLETNO OTIR ×UL'l MUIIA DE 4 × *E II-M FEcei uositoutuedlgtoxuqa- i- l.D bi nrdce e-gto r ti* Erad *u sueuusriedsta wydn ei ur arain h rm a evc ntesi a M. le Comsar ie rn o ig. o msinrAnyio ct Le* *ééussn nomsqecteqeto aêr o- Tedlgtswr nomdta hsqeto- Ï siéé ?nesa met ×oýde smeitlý M. l Co misair Mconad, ppuy pa M.le omms- ommssiner cDoald seondd b, C mm* *ar Apy * * * 7 Propse:De emader u Cnsel ue some de 2ooo Moed:Tha a epor bcmad toCounil skiê\"« pourétalirunelige detra way por l copte e l Vile, a sni f $2,oo, i orer o etablsh trmway lne* dasl urirE ad tdodneràl-Cmaneds text' cout nE adW r,-n t re Trm as epoie etelge.Ta wasC. ooe a th5adln. M. leCm isieCtapyeprM*eCm isie o msinrCtscne yCm isofr Hébrt Pr*s - erfrrl oin *dsu uDpreet M vd:Ta h hy oinb eë'eo ftý' d'rene *t ilet\u003e enLiw orrpotDprmn fo *n *retrpriadi-vs\"' L.~~ N EEAM ECAL ,I î ×1 ità ý",
         "MUNICIPAL DE MONTREAL 365 MUNICIPAL BULLETIN Of- MONTREAL COMMI851ON SPECIAL COMMITTEE ,,,,,9mlnée par le Conseil le 15 mars igi5, pour étudier un Special Comrnittee appointed by Council on the i5th ý.\"Î'ýPPôrt du Bureau des Commissaires, recommandant March igiS, to consider a report frorri the Board of ae procéder à l'expropriation de la lisière de terrain Commissioners, \"re\" expropriation for the widening rýui!se pour l'élargissement de la rue Notre-Dame ýý,0uest, à partir de I!avenue Fulford jusqu7au lot por- of Notre Dame street West, froin Fulford avenue to 'No. 61s duCadastre, Cad. lot Nýo. 615. C(nlIPte rendu de l'assemblée du ig mars igi5, a.m. Report of hieeting held on the igth March 1915, a,-. \u0026it.. Présents: MM. les Echevins Ménard, N. Lapointe, Present: Ald. Ménard, N. Lapointe, Mayrand, Létour- aaidýý,4étourneau, Dubois, Pauzé et Loranger. neau, Dubois, Fauzé and Loranger. l'échevin' Ménard est choisi comme président de cette Ald. Ménard was elected Chairman of the Committee. souniis et lu le rapport du Bureau des Commissairesi Subraitted and read the report of the Board of Corn- at' du 4 mars 1915, soumis au Conseil le 8 mars, recom- missioners, dated the 4th March igiS, submitted to Colin- nt de procéder à l'expropriation des immeubles requis cil on the 8th, recommending that the expropriation of élark'ýr la rue Notre-Dame Ouest, à partir de la rue Ful- the strig of land required for the widening of Notre Dame à peu-près vis-à-vis la rue de Lévis. street West, from Fulford street up to à point nearly op- posite de Lévis streét, be proceeded with. uËl début s'engagçant, il est And a débute arising, it was De faire rapport au Conseil, déclarant: -e\"Oved.-, That a report be made to council, stating Ile dans ropinion de cette- Commission, il est nécessaire thatý in the opinion of this Cotrimittee, it is necessary-and l urgent to ýomplete the widening of Notre Daine strect, etit de compléter l'élargisseinenit de la rue Notre-Dame, commencea nearlY 4 ycars ago, but that the alte'rriative of édepuis près dé. 4uns, mais que l'expropriation forcée forced expropriation should bc adopted only as a last re- t être adoptée qu'en dernier res$ort-et qu'il y a lieu de sort, and that a further attempt should bc made tô pur- c nouvelle tentative pour acheter directement des pro- chase directly from the proprietors the land required for, ,tes les immeubles requis, pour l'élargissement de ladite the widening of said Notre Dame street, in accordanke 1'ktre-Danie, cri suivant les prescriptions de\u003e la loi à ce with the provisions of the law, and they therefore recoin, ý-t- recommandant en conséquence, qu'un dernier effort niend that a last effort be made to induce the proprÎetorg \"hit auprès des. prýpriétaires pour acheter leurs immeu- to self their properties.by mutual agreement ut a reasoti- 'à Tamiable à. un in de sauver auxdits able in order to save the proprietors and ýhe CitY prix raisonnable, af ce et les en- consiý',raýle expe ses and the unavoidable annoyancé re- PýairEe et à la Ville, des frais considérables n illévitâbies dýune expropriation f orcée. sulting from a forced expropriation. lu: De recommander de plus que le rapport du Bureau Resolved- To recornmend, furthermore that the re- soit rejeté pour le moment et si, d'ici au port from the Board of Commissioners bý rejected, for. ý'1Dârs prochain, ledit Bureau des Commissaires ne peut the time being, and if, by the ýst Marchýnext, -the fiald à acheter à rainiable les propriétés requises pour l'é- Board cannot succeed in purchasiý b mutual Weëmeftt Mient dé la rue Notre-Dame Ouest, une nouvelle re- the properties réquired for the wiýenilng of Notre Dame., ndation pourra être faite au Conseil, à l'effet de pro- street West, a further recommendation may bc mad-é to 7. à l'acqÙisifion de ces. propriétés par expropriation. Couneil, to acquire said properties-by expropriation. Adjourned. JULES,ý CREPEAU, JULÉS CREPÉA»ý Sdtis-GTIeffitr de la Cité.",
         "BULLETIN MUNICIPAL DE, MONTREAL Sm MUNICIPAL, BULLETIN OF MO.NTkF,.A*i BUREAU. DES COMMISSAIRES BOARD OF COMMISSIONERS Compte rendu de l'assemblée du ig mars igi5, p.m. Report of meeting held on the igth March igi5, P_ Son Honneur le Maire, Président; MM. les Commissaires His Worsh:p the Mayor in the Chair, and Messrs Ainey, Côté. ney and Côté, Commissioners. 1 -(256W) Se umis un- rapport de PIngénieur en Chef- 1.-(25690) Submitted a report from the Acting 4 Su recommandant liapprobation d'un plan définissant Engineer, recommending thé approvalof a plan dele rope lie d séparation entre la propriété de la Ville et la pro- ing the dividing line betw ýrty priêté de la Commission du Hâvre. een the City's p of the Harýour Cornmîssl Sur proposition de M. le Commissaire Côté, appuyée par On motion of Commissioner Côté, se conded by M. le Commissaire Aincy, il est missio'ner Ainey, it was Résolu: De référer au Département en Loi, pour direc- Regolved: That the sarne bc referred te the Law partment for advice. 2- (25! Soumis un rapport de l'Ingénieur cri Chef, re- 2.-(25929) Submitted a«report from the Chief Eng commandant de faire voter Par le Conseil un- crédit de $2o2,- recommending that an appropriation of be:v, m à même le Fonds d'Emprunt Pour les réparations aux by the Couneil, eX-Reserve Fund, for airs te pûà Pavages, trottoirs permanents, macadam, etc., tel que détaillé permanent sidewalns,, macadam, etc., as Itasled in, dans ledit rapport, en vertu de l'autorisation accordée par les report, in v«rtue of the authorization gr te by thé derniers amendements à la Charte.- amendmènts te the Charter. Sûr proposition de M. le Commissaire Côté, appuyée par On motion of Comtitissioner Côté, seconded by M. le Commissaire Ainey. il est missioner Ainey, it was Résolu: Dàpprouver ledit rapport et de faire rapport au Resolved: Te concur in saidreport and te rep rt, Conseil en conséquence. CQuncil accardingly. 3-(30327) Soumis lesraPPorts des Inspecteurs.des Tram- 3ý(3o327) Submifted reports from the TramwaY ways, pour la semaine finiSSant le 13 mars 1915- spectors, for the week ending, on the i3th March 191- Sur tion de M. le Commissaire Côté, appuyée par On motion of Commissioner Côté\u003e seconded by M. le = saire Ainey, il est missioner Ainey, it was Résolu: De déposer aux archives. Resolved: That the same bc filed of record. 4-(25933) SOUMI\u0026 un rapport de l'Ingénicur en Chef- 4.-(25933) Submitted a report from the Acting Suppléant, au sujet de l'installation d'un poteau sur le côté Engineer, anent the érection of a pole on'the north nord. de là rue Dorchéster, à l'ouest de l'avenue Ûnion, par.la of Dorchester street, west of Union avenue, by the,. '.'Xontreal Light, Heat \u0026 Power Co.\" :txeal L ght, Heat \u0026 Power Co. Sui. Proposition de. M. le Commissaire Côté, appuyée par On metion of Cornmisàioner. Côté, seconded. by M. le.Coiiý.tuissàire Ainey, il est misàioner*Aý t, was oJuý De recommander au Conseil de légaliser l'instal e V ýR sol ed. That a report bc made, to Council, r, làtion dudit potém. mending thàt the érection oI: said po!e be legalize\u0026 e- (2579ý) S.jogijýis un rapport de -l'Ingénieur en Chef- 5-(25788) Subrnitted a report from the Acting ýSuPpIéanti déelarant', en réponse à une interpellation de l'éche- Engineer, stadng,,iii.reply. te a question put by AJdý Viti tavergnè_ qu'il ne setait pas ay-a.rit,ýgeux pour, le moment vergne, 4hat it woulà net bé 'advantageous. tà instge\" d\"ilsthller ime iorgt permanente dansla Cour de la Ville, perrnanentblacksmith shop in the uartier Roseluont. yàrd, Rosemônt Ward. Sur proposition de'lf, le Coin isýre c6té, àpPtly,ýée par On mation of Commissioner Côté, seconded, by ...C M. le Comi nize A1mý_il est, tý was Rée0lu: De transmettrc ledit fappoz aù ý-..cons 1, en 'r Reàolved: Tbat said report bc -transmitt d -t -in réply.to the above question. S-ouiiiis tin M'Pport de 1,111génieur e brnitted a report frorn thé Acting upeléant, déclarant n'a pas hesoïn de la bouil-: ginetr; stating that the City.does net need thé .1oire offerte.p* MM.,-Rondou, Çorliër \u0026 Cie. offered by Messrs. Rondou, £le. Sit . r 1 osition de M. le Commis sairé Côté, appuyée par.. On motion of Commissioner Côté, sècoridedly' M, Je.Commissaire Ainey, il et missioner Ainey, it was Rés6lu: D'infoirner MM, Rondoti, Coxiies Cie, en con- Resolved: That Messrs. Rondou,ý Corlier \u0026 Cie béý formed accordingly, (257A) - Soumis un rapport de Ftngéhîtur en , Chef- Subrnitted a report from the Actin Suppléant, recnmmandant d'accepter.-,I'offre de Mý \u0026 Brodie E * 1 1 ngincer, recommendine'that the offer from Mr. de' céder. à la Cité eratuitemeni et ffls conditions, la Partie de to cédé gf»àt.uit-oud aftd upcoriditionally thàt pý dt l'avenue O7ýford s'étendant de rýmnue Notre-Dame de. 'Oxford ayenue- cxtejingfrom Notre Dame de- G Ç\"îýee à l'avenue Monkland. avenue to Mônklend avenue, býe accepted. Sur proposition de u le c4mmiesairf asioner. Côté, seconded by Côté, appuyée par (-)n niution of Cot=i' M, te Ciomm-issaire Ainey, il est Aineyi, it Yfas Résolu:, conseil racceptation de làdite kesolved, Te recommend te Council the acce :of said. offerý s un rap t dé lIngénieur en Chef,, au Sàumi 8--(25930) Snbmittedý.Ï réPôýt from the. Chiel E sujet de lenfouissement des Is électriques, pour faciliter lee anent the Placin , m rç 9 of elect'ric wireà under ground tra-,a= d'élargissement du tunnel de Favchue Ontario. fo facilitate the Works in conapction ývîth the widenileil thé Ontarýo avenue tunnel. Sûr Proposition de 14. le Comnitssairé- Câté, appuyée pir On motion èË Commissionet Cbt\u0026,, ierolided by eie Côninii \u0026aire A.in , il est Ainèy, 4é%olu- De référer à la COMM19sion det Services Electri- se 0 eý kes Ived: That the saine bc relerred te th qffl -pour rappotfé . rw report. 'té'CoWinission for a",
         "L BULLETIN ()F mONTREAL îýFTIN MUNICIPAL- DE MONTREAL 867 MUNICIPA (25690) Submitted a report from the Acting Chief Soumis un rapport de l'ingénieur en Chef- 9-- 'Martineau \u0026 Fils, nt, au sujet des communicatiQn de MM. Martineau \u0026 Engineer, anent lett supply of broken Stone. -'ýOncernant le contrat pour la fourniture de pierre con- concerning the contract for the proposition de M. le Commissaire Côté, aPPUYée par on motion of CoinmissiOner Côté, seconded by Corn- Cl)àlmissaire Ainey, il est 1 issioner Ainey, it was 'ýýlu1 De référer au bc saine bc referred. to the Purchas- Surintendant des Achats et des Resolved: That t 1% pour rapport, ing and Sales Agent for a report. 7 425936) Soumis un rapport de l'Ingénieur en Chef, io.-(259\u00266) Subrnitted a report frorn the Chief En- .83, réclamé contre M. A. T. A. gineer, anent ail account 6o,83, claimed froin Mr. A. et du compte de $860 of $8 il, entrepreneur pour la construction de l'égout de la T. A..Chagnon contractor for Sýt.. Dominique Street sewer Dominique, pour les travaux que la Cité de Montréal the works ;bc City was conapelled to do in order to blieée de faire pour remettre ledit égout en état après have said sewer in good state after its construc Proposition 1 de M. le Commissaire Côté, appuyée par on motion of Coniraissioner Côté, secotided by Corn- .e-ýC0rn1diSsaire Ainev. il est missioner Ainey, it was De référer au Département en Loi pour rapport. Resolved: That the saine bc referred to the Law De- partment for a report. (2546) Soumis un rapport de l'Ingénieur en Chef, en iJ-(25846ý Submitted a report frOru the Chief En- ýà . ýr, in reply to an application frorn Mr.. Geo. Fran- _« . l'aPPlicatio, de M. Ùiýorges Francoeur pour une po- ginec inspecteur de brique, déclarant qu'il n'existe aucune: coeur for a poýition of Brick Inspector, statiiig that there de ce genre. is no such position. osition de M. le Commissaire Ainey, appuyée par On motion of Commissioner Ainey, seconded by Com- ç1mmissaire Côté, il est inissioner CôtA, it was l'u 'D'informer M. Francoeurlen conséquence. Resolved: That-Mr. Francbeur bc informed accord- ingly. Soumis un rapport du Département en Loi, 12.-(25500) Submitted a report frorn the Law Depart- des. devoirs des inspecteurs des bâti\u003eses en constrüc-, ment, anent the, duties of Inspectors of Buildings, under construction. PrOPosition de M. le Commissaire Ainey, appuyée par On motion of Commissioner Ainey, seconded by Coni missioner Côté, it was C'0n1miýsaire Côté,.il est D'informer le Conseil du Travail que le règle- Resolved: That the Labor Cotincit bc informed that en vigueur pourvoit à l'inspection des bâ- the by-law now existing provided for the inspection of . '1111spertéÉs durant les années 1913 et 1914. build.ngs under construction, and that a statement show- ing the number of old buildings inspected . during the years 1913,and 194 bc transmitted to said Covncil. 'C(mirnissaire Hébert prend son siège. Conimissioner Hébert took his scat. Ccrnmissaire McDonald prend son siège. Commissioner McDonald took his scat Soumis un (2.5861) Submitted a report from the Stiperinten- rapport du. Surintendant des 13ý f \"'Feý\"ýIntna'ndant le vote d'un crédit te $14,516, pour le dent of Parks, recornmýnding that ý an appropriation 0 dl, 'Personnel des terrains de: jeux, ainsi que pour $14,516 bc voted for the maintenance of the staff of 'the us et entretien des appareils, pour finir l'année cou- Playgrounds -and for the repairs and maintenance of the apparatus until the end of the current year. r,ý,pOSition de M. le Commîssaire Aincy, appuyée par On motion of Commissioner Ainey, seconded by ICOnr- Côté. il est missioner Côté, it was be recommander au Conseil le vote de ladite Resolved: That a replort bc made to Council,- recoin- gr. les fins ci-dessus. mending that said suin bc voted for the above puXpOSeSý _13titeau prend en considération la question des subi 14.-The Board then considered the question of grants k'à être Dayées aux Universités Laval et McGill ainsi to bc made to Laval and McGill Universitica', as well as '14,oritreal Institute', et à la Société des Arts Ma- -tc, the Montreal Technical Institute and the Society Of et Arts and Manufactures. de M., le , Cammissaire, McDonald, appuyée On motion of Commissioner McDonald, secondcd bY 1ý,ÇQnunissàire.HAbert. il est Commifsiioner Hébert, it was De recommander, au Conseil que ces subventions Resolved. That a report bc made to douncil ' recom--. mending that said grants bc paid, as foIlOWPj éx'-kel.st.evé. comme suit à même le Fonds de Wserve. Fund: al_ $10,000 l'aval univers.ity iooqo McGill University échniéal' Inatitutc 7,500 Montreal Techn1cal Institute Arts t ManUfuctUrgs 3,000 SO CtY Of A 8 a d Manufactures_ $30,5W fý0um 1 îs un.rapport du Départe . ment en Loi, 15,-(25382) Subtnitted a report froir the Law Depart-, Bureau d'indiquer 1 arpenteur qui sera chargé de ment, r\"étiting the BoaM to appoint the Laud , Stiryey,ý\u003e:r 1,a Cité dans le b . ornage du lot No 331 du. cad. r reent the City ne fixing of the limits of f0tcad.ýNQ.ý 33, des Carrières mtrett. St-Louis, surla rue des C '9 Côté st. Louis on lution de M-, 'le. Commissaire Côté, appuyée, liar on motion of Commissioner Côté, secOn4gdý by, - A issaire Ainey, -il est missiont-t -Aincy, it was Thaî instruëtions bc giveâ tO 1 the 121 De donner instructions au Déqýartemtiit -en of 1 1 ctte finý partment ib Ïetain M'r. J. P. B - Cagii-eiri's iéte« ,le M, B. Càsgraeii, poïir c IJ 'au 16,-The Boitd resuuaed the in1t procéife à la continuation de Venu tfilté d de la pierre dui r L0M;üêý Di stont tý Lo",
         "àÈ mouTkilKr, BULLE=-OFýX(mm. ýM, Arthut Vailée, -procureur de M. Durand demande qu'il Mr. Arthur Vallée, Mr. -Durand!s attorney, a9ked Mit permis à son client d'assister à lensuête,' ce qui est ac- his ýclient be allowed to attend thé said investi cordé. which said request was -granted., Les étmoins suivantý sont assermentés et examinés: The following witnesses were sworn and examine'.. Oyprien St-Arhour. Cyprien St-Amour. Eýhibit No 8- - Carte de poinçonnage. Exhibit No. 8.-Checking card. j Exhibit No 9. - Carte servant à la livraison des voyages Exhibit No. q.-Card used in connection with- t de pierre. livery of loads of stone. txhibit -No lù. - Billet de pesée. Exhibit No. ioýWeighing tickets. Firmin Delorme Félix, Roýchoi-j, Arthur Vinet, Qmer Dru- , 1,'irmili Delorme, Félix Rocholi, Arthur Vinei,,.OnKlr ftesne, Antoni 1Ïýîndo, Chrles Mffle, Antoiii Rondo (M fre8ne, Antoni Rondo, Charles Meese, Antoni kondo.,., nouvel exan-\u0026-n),.Joseph J3, Ricgrd, joseph L. Vanasse, J. E. ther examine(t), Joseph B. Ricardi joseph L. V_ Yerry, Hector Cadieux, (eh nouvel exaincri). E. Perry,'Hector Cadieux (further exýan1ined). F.Xhib* Mo le. - Etm de l'estimé du coût des travaux dans Exhibit No. iL-Statement of the estimates of t4'Pý Ies rues Omer et Sairite-Catheririe. of the works in Cmer and St Catherine streetý jý A, Gagn\", Louis Bro-uillette. J. AýGagnon, Louis Brouillette,, 17.-Sur proposition de M. le Contmi\"re Câté, appuyée 17.-On motion of Commissioner Côté, 5ýecoýded\", par K le CommisWre Hébert, il est Commissioner Hébert, it was Résolu: Que iletiquéfe soit aj . ournée. au 20 du courant, à Resolved: - That said invéstigatÎon be adjourned: Ir kg aýfn. the 2oth instant at il a.m. 18.-Sur proposition de M. le Commissatre Hébert, appuyée 18ýOn motion of Commissioner Hébert, secon Pàt M le t«Mff4uakle ý64n\"ý -9 - ffl Comtnissiôner Ainey, it was Résolu. D'approuver là réquisîti\u003cjh -Nos- 6i-62, Départe- Resolved: That the réquisition Nos. 61-62, Parkd\"' biffl des Pates (Ile partni«t ýSt. Helen's Island), bc approved. 'j90-Soumis le rapport du du Département en Loi et des 19-Subrnitted a report frorn the Law Departinelit txýý, eu 3u5et du règlemeit de certaitieg réclaftiations. Experts, recommending tbat certain claims bc - setil Hébert, appuyée par Pl '01w-ftiotion of -Commissioner by M. lé Comrnîssaire Côté, il e4l Hébert, seconded by rnigaibuer C'ôté, -it wage, Rlâow.: ealloÉser le rè*tnent , desdites réclamations Ré-901-vÎd: That the seulement, of the said claitný* comme sulit, à même le Fonds de Réserve. authorized, as follows, ex-Reeerve Fiiiid: ý478. J. H.-Cadieux, chute sur trottoir, jugemeitt 8478. J. H, Cadieux-Fall on s:dewalk. judgri-ient- au \u003e \u0026-mandeur... $150-00 To Ple.nt-*ff Frais à Mtres Fauteux \u0026 Fatiteux 92-55 Costs to Messrs. Fauteux and Fauteux- - W2. Dame Nap. Voyer, - h=dati i on 7-U0 9482. Dame Nap. Vûyer-Floodingý 9435. J. L. Laf leur, Ltée, - inondt(tion 304-71 9435. J.-L. Laileur Ltée-Flooding 953r.- Finley ST4fth \u0026 Cie, - inondation 9.30 9531. Finley Smith \u0026 Co.-Flooding Danie J. Hqu4er, , inrondation 21,00 9446. Dame J, lianter-Flooding -oýnid di Carlo, inondation 10-00 9522. Ant 95z2. Antonio di Carlo-Flooditig 0à.,Z I\u003eathe E. Brookes, inondation 5,00 qý32. Dame \u0026 Broc\u003ekes-Fidoding X\u0026P. Brisebois, accident de travail 6s.oo qÈo2. Nap. Brisebois-Jabor accident e4q6ý Hezui ckàrlat(4 accident de travail 42-12 9496. Henri. Charlatid7--L-abor accident W77. IZa'ôùl Auclair, accident 4e travail 3\u002600 9477. Raoul. Auclair-Labor aczi4enf 9440, L'é;ý accidentde travail 6Pý75 F. --\"bot' - accident ri), 947e. Hermaine Montpetit-Flooding- (St. Henry): 3M Il Wi Labrèche--FlooditlW (St, Henry) 0494- Hector Portier; 196.30 9494, Hector, Éortier-elooding (St, Si-C\"traAM eýérý : .: 1 Guerixi \u0026 Raymond--costs re Labrèche \u0026 Fortier .20, ýý ùmiq des màîi4àtý, vérifié par 18 Concê 1er et u- . D,--S1Lýbrni . ttýcd Watraffts, vâified by the Cîty ConP aitètte dé la afiý au ifto.ntafft -totàl de suivaht ii5te Icr and Auditô -certifiée. r, aggrrgating twP, sum of :. Sur -prôpositi 1 on de X le Commissaire Héà«,t 40M pw pet certifiéti list, Mje 'Cotùtnlssere c6té. fl- est \u003ch.=Gtiom ()f Comillissioner 11ébert -seccrided -by rici c ý ti. là6lu, I ý'en autoriser le paititicbi. iD it. Vffl. P-£8olved-ý That peinent of à Z* àame bc authori d, pruposîtion de M, le 21ýOn -rt: second ire il est f comblissiorier Kébý- ': second par le conimissa, eý Cô té, it Was k\" Que la séance soit àj rtiéé au 2ô courant, à ii Re9ýolved-' That this Ws, meeting 'bc àdjourned iiiitl) 20th.ýinstant,,at le; a.m. 'ËCAL, U N' SENIE c Ac1ý Secrétaire",
         "tËTIN MUNICIPKL, DE MoN -CRFAL s6à - MUNICIPAL. 13ULLFrIýN -OF' MOMtREAL Pte, rendu de l'assemblée du 2o mars 1915, a-n. Report of meeting held oiiýthe 20tli.March agi5, a in. ROnneur le Maire, . Président; MM. les Commissaires His Worship the Mayor in the Chair, and Comii1iý- ýMcDonald, Côté. sioners Hébert, McDonald and Côté. unus un rapport du Dr S. Boucher Directeur du Bu- i.-Submit4ed a report from Dr. S. Boucher, Médical 0 UII]ciPai d'l-lYgiène et de Statistique's, ainsi qu'un rap- Health Officer, also a report from the Chief City Attor- it \"A'vOdat en Chef de la Cité, concernant les abattoirs ney, concerning abattoirs and knackers' yards in the City. ýëhantiers d'équarrissage dans la Cité. P\"Ilp9sition de M. le Commissaire McDonald, appuyée On motion of Commissioner McDonald, secondéd by le Commissaire Hébert, il est Commissioner Ainey, it was Que la Compagnie des Abattoirs de Montréal, Resolved: That the Montreal Abattoirs Co. bc iio- ,'ýl'Abâttoirs Company, soit mise en demeure de faire tified to abate immediately the nuisance caused by the les nuisances qu'elle cause par l'exploi- opération of its abattoirsr and knackers' yards in the City 'de ses abattoirs et de ses chantiers d'équarrissage dans of Montreal and affecting public health; to co-ply imIne- 'Je, Montréal et qui affectent la salubrité et la santé diately with the provisions of the Provincial Act . con- de se, conformer immédiatement aux dispositions cerning public health and particularly to the provisions 1 d'Hygiène de la Province de Québec et particulière- of articles 62 to 69 of said by-laws, as well as to the pro- aux dispositions des Articles 62 à 69 de ces Règlements, visions of the City By-laws and of the act governing the 'I'l'aux dispositions des règlemerits municipaux de la latter; to provide immediately for the rernoval and con- et de lu loi qui la régit; de se pourvoir, immédiaterneiit, veyance of dead animals, etc., vehicles, approved by the \"Y'ýnlèyenient et le transport des charognes, etc., de vol- Board of Health of the Province of Québec, to . se for ;ýPl\"Ouvées par le Conseil dHygiène de la Province de the destruction of said dcad animals, etc., of the newest dëý se servir pour la destruction desdites charognes, ai-id most modern proceedings and means, so that publie »ràcédés et moyens les plus nouveaux et les plus mo- flealth may not suffer thereby; to have the build- Pour que la salubrité et la santé publiques n'en souf-, ings, machines, etc., which are being used by said, de faire approuver immédiatement par le Conseil Company, for the destruction of said dead animals, de la Province de Québec, les constructions, ma- etc., immediâtely approved by the Board of Hcalth ec-, dont elle se sert pour la destruction desdites cha- of thé, Province of Québec; to discontinue imme- etr-; de cesser immédiatement tout transport par les diately any transportation through the streets of the City la Cité des cadavres d'animaux morts ci dehors des of carcasses of aniraals which die outside of the City li- 'le la Cité ainsi que des débris, détritus, etc., provenant mits, as well as of offal, refuse, etc., coming frQm the nil'ÎP21ités ýoisine§, et qu'à défaut par ladite *Compagnie colifOrmer à la présente mise cri deffieure-, la é e iieighbouriiirr municipalities, and should the CornparlY ýta Êe tous les recours que la loi lui accorde, aiCn't 8 fail to comply with this -notification, the City shall avail ,eeOuts spéciaux que les contrats- existant entre ladite itself of all the recourses provided ýY law as well as any ic, et la Cité accordent à cette dernière; spécial recourse which it inay exercise in virtue of thle contracts existingwith said Company, 119' 'Compagnie Davies Ltd., et Matthews-Blackwell That the Davies Co., Ltd., and the Matthewa-Blackwéll be notified to imme. iately comply, as regards the ent mises en demeure de se conformer immédiatement, Ltd., d ýý11t1jr abattoirs quelles exploitent dans les limites de la aýattoirs operated by them, within the City lirclits, with ux d4ositions dé la, Loi d'Hygiène de la Province de the provisions of the Publie Health Law of the Province (les Règlements du Conseil d'Hygiène de la Province of Québec, of the by-laws of the Board, of Health of the Province of Quebec and particulai. c, et particulièrement des Articles 62.à 69 desdits rè- -ly of articles 62 to 69 des Règlements Muniçipaux de la Cité et de la of sai\u003cj by-law, of the City by-laws and of ý the act govern- régit, et de faire cesser immédiatement les nuisan- îng the City, and to immediately abate the nuisance causý eurq dits abattoirs causent et qui affectent la santé ed by said abattoirs and ývhich affect public health, and :ýUlubritL ubliques, et qu'à défaut par lesdites Compa- in the event of the said companies failing to comply with \"£le se c Mmer à la présente mise en demeure, la Cité the above notification, the City shall avail itself of all the ýftdra de tous les recours que la loi lui accorde; recourses provided by law; lesdites mises en demeure soient signifiées auxdites That said notifications be served upon said compansels par le ministère de Mtre jean Beaudouin, Notaire by Mr. jean Ileaudoin, City Kotary, and that a.rfflrt:.be et' quun rapport soit fait au Conseil. made to Couneil. 6) Soumis un rapport du Département en Loi, 2.-(25546) Subrnitted a report from the Law D art la décision rendue, par la Commission des Che- ment, concerning the order issued b of 2 marý courant, sur la demande de la \"Can- -ay Commissioners, on the 2nd March instant, on the ap- Xortherri Quebec Ry.\" our être, autorisée à construire plication'made by the Canadian Northern Quebec %ilway 'à travers les 'rues Mdacona et Marlborough, for. authorization to lay tracks across Stadatona \"d Marlborough streets. PrýIPcýsition de. M. le Commissaire Côté, appuyée par On motion of Cômmissioner CÔté, seconded by Cffl- \"ýý=missaire McDonald, il est missioner McDonald, it was ! De recommander au Conseil de donner instruc- Resolved: that a, report bc ruade to Councit récoe7 Département en Loi d'en appeler de cette décision au mending that instructions bc given ip the L-aw Departe. Ut Général eh COnýeil. ment to appeal from said. decielon te the ýGGverBGr G-êur eral in Couneil, fâiré suite à la résolution du 17 m:ýrs courant, à 3-In ptirsuance tio thé respIntion -adàPicd On the 17th tituer une enquete, aTmi les emffloyés des Dé- March instk ý6f,ý holding an du TrésorW Jté, et du Contrôleur 'etAU- tion, among i ýînzployeès 0,f the departments of the cit3l 11W Cité, au sujjÜ de la disparition de certains d\u0026u- Treasifrer and Auditor arient thç (fiýap çarance l'achat de débcntures -dit la Commission Sc6- documents . cOncerning' the purchase oý -Utégoire le' Thaumaturge, lès- , officiers et dm- ùe Schëol of st, Grègoirele Týhalfttbl wits sont a-,ierràentés ét\u003e,itltçmgésý. ge, the follôwîng officersý and erriployces exau-tin WW, mil3saire Ahiey $on tuissaire Côté laisge, É= siëe",
         "BULLETIN MUNICIPAL DE MONTREAL TRI, MUNICIPAL BULLETIN OF MON Baquêt, A. Couture, G. Cartier, S. Casavan, N. Smitlý, J. A. Baquet, A. Couture, G, Cartier, S. Casavan, N. S C. Gingras, , Pelletier, Chs Arnoidi, J. H. Charette,. L. J. D. C. Gingras, E. Pelletier, Chs Arnoldi, 1. H.- Char de Beaudry, 'A. R;'Làflarnme, J. K 0. Monette, A. E. Mérineau, Beaudry, A. R. Laf lamme, J. E. 0. Mouette, A. E. M..' A. E. Bessette, L. Fréchette, F. M. Lavoie, R. Bédard. A. E Bessette, L. Fréchette, F. M, Lavoie, R. Bédardý:..: 4--Sur proposition de M. le Commissaire Héber . t, appuyée motion of Commissioner Ilébert, seconded Wl- par M. le Commissaire Ainey, il est missiouer'Ainey, it was Résolu: Que la séance soit ajournée à 3 bis p.m., ce jour. Resolved: That thfs meeting be adjourned o'clock p.m. thisdate. L N.SENECAL L. N.SENECA Secrétaire. - . . . . . . ... ý.1 Compte . rendu de l'assemblée du 20 mars 1915, P.-. Rebort of meeting he!d on -the 20th March 1915 Soh..:Hýmmeùr lé Maire, Président. ýTous présýnts. His Worship the Mayor, Chairman; all- the rnemb.. the Board. 1ý(25W) Sobýnis un rapport du Dépa en ýqi, 1.-(25868) Subinitted a report from the Law, \u003e au sujet de r«Ire -de certains propriétaires de veýdreira ,a ment, -anent the offer from certain proprietors tô Cité des terrains requis pour l'élargissement du ( re. e the City certain lots red for the widening .la Côte-desýNeiges, dane le quartier Côte-des-Neiges. ýýdes Neýges Road, in M11t'l'i des Neýges Ward. Sur propositionde M. le Commissaire Héber t, appuyée par On motion of Commissiorier Hébert, seconded bYý le Commissairt Côté. il est missioner Côté, it was Résolu.- De faire rapport au Conseil, recommandant d'ac- Resolved: That a r4ort be made to Council, 1',9 cepter les offres suivantes: mending that the follow-ing offers be accepted: Ikose Annie Lawlôr Goyer, une lisière de terrain de Rose Annie Lawlor Goyer, a strip of land mea- ýr8i5 pieds, à $i le pied, bâtisse, etc. 7,315 suring 1815 fect at $i per foot, building, etc. Zépliirin Beaucage, une lisière de terrain de 3,552 Zéphirin Beaucageý'a strip of land measuring 3552 pieds, à $i le pied 3,552 feet, at $i per foot Pour dommages, achat de hangars, fiais de démé- For damages, purchase of sheds, rernoval ex-. nagement, etc. 28,322 penses L,..Sénécal, une lisière de terrain de 8,ooo pieds,, à E. Senécal, a stripî of.land measur';ng 8poo fect, aýt::,ýýýý\" .. .. .. ..... .. .. .. 12,000 eý5D le pied $i.Sô per foet 2,-(25979) Soumis un rapport du Surintendant des 2--(25970 Submitted a report fro.m- the Piul, Achats et,\u0026% Ventes, transmettant les deVis pour la demande and Sales Agent, fianstnitting specifications for de sournissîôns pour les articles suivants: of the following artý'cles.- SoumistÎons pour achat de, qdvieux fer\" etr- For the.,pùvchaft oîf.. 4crap iron\", etc. Sùun1týsi0ùw pour W fourniture de, àere. F or tliýÉ 9upply of sand. sý\u003elinûssions pour, 1w fainýniture de eharbdýà polir kks divers F or ille suppýY of coal for the different departrne So, unilý;sÎorýs', pour la Lýurnitum'1dë là -po*ýmWê1 inorganique. For the eupply of inorganic dust. soumissions pour 'Ruh- For, the stipply of 'ç'Rùbble\" stone. ..soumimions ýbur là fourniture de piel;re à nýýeadaffiià.« et For the supply of macadamizing sfone and b aille\u0026 'pierr stone. soumiss, S po la £6à=hti huiles. ion ut re For the supply. of oils. Soumissions pour, la fouýniture do fiches et clous en fil de For.the.suppJyýof hooks and wire naili. Ur la fourniture de la,, f onte de fen cuivre nzeý ,5;oùmisii0ý8 Po For thesul\u003ePly,- of cast irün, copper and býonzeà et b-ronze.' Soumissions pour la fcràrniture de matières explosives. For, ti 811pply OÎ explosives. vour la fourniture deliuyàbx:et radiers en ter- For the gupply Of terra cotta and vitrified pwcà ýa te nifé et -vitrifiée, soumissicný pour fourniture de tuyaux enplomb; plomb en For the ou ae .f blanc. pply of lead: pipes, piÈ lead and inÈý saumot4, et li\"got et, er- sommisslons pr9m la fouriiiture de la fèrrormerie. For the s4p ly Of hardýýe., Sur proposition de M. le C,\u0026nffiinaire Hébert, appuyée par On mbtion, of Commissionct, Hêh.ert, second'ed by, lecommissaire Rtéý il est mimaner C8t,ý it wii lzéeolu rouyer lesdits dêvis.,etý d'autoriser la demah D'app Resoleed 1 T at se-d gpecific .. tiêný bé,.apl -th. be callëd for, 3-(25910) Sournise une communication du Fonds Paý 3.-(2591GY Su1iým!tted a'comrnunýcation fro triatique Canadien, demandant le paiement de six versemetits adian P,4triotýc Fundý asking for the payment of 9W citi triontant souscrit par la .,Ville, pour let'Fondü,'Iesàits -Éd by'the C ents s'élé-vant à la Somme ýde,$90À)m mentîs of the amotint subscib ity, f o,ý , Fuild, the said instaIments- amountlng ýp th*' iý",
         "MNCPAL DE MNIA MUNICIPAL BULL ETIN OF 3MONTREAL ýI)OStin e . e Commissaire Hébet apuée par On motion of Comimissioner Hébert, seconded by Com- nlisieMcDonald, il est miss:ioner . McDonald, it was Dercomandr-au Consei e vote de ladite soin- Resolved: That a report be nmade to Council, recot- SlFods d'Fmprunt, pour les fins ci-dessus. mending that sa:d sumn e voted ex-Loan Fund forth above purpose. 7»ueupend denouveau en considération la ques- 4.-The Board resumed .consideration of .the question divaion de la pierre dans le. quartier Longue- of the delivery of stone in Longu'ot a tOsiinde M. le Commissaire Côté, appuyée par On motion.of Commissioner Côté, seconded by Ci- MisieAiney, il est missioner Ainey, it was Dedner instructions à MM. H. Dubuc set H. Resolved: That instructions be given to Messrs H Idesmette à la dispositions de l'Avocat en, Chef Dubuc, H. L. Auclair, to place themselves at te dia9a »ou reevoir des instructionis à ce sujet. of the Chief City Attorney to comply with hi instuctin on * hssbet ' ueupoèeå à l'tude du budget imputable sur s.-The Board proceeded to cons-derthe works, etc. dZP=t, et advenant 6.1s hrs, chargeable against the Loan Futid, and it being 6.15 9.n. Postio deM. e Commissaire Côté, appuyée par On motion of C imianioner Côté, secotided by Corn- 'Qel sac soit ajournée au 23courant, à Il Resolv.ed: Th this meetin be adjourned until the N. N. SENECALLN.S ECI Secréaire.Secreagy Pa « ; *",
         "*6.. * 7A -dfI-TÎ ×4NCPÉ *J ë4ËA UICÉLBLEtlO ON ;PCAE TPCA OMITE Co msso *pci ei' *ie et *ecéispu ee aiaino p tosfrp Copt red elasmled 2mr 35 jLRpoto etn edO h 2dMrh11 -S6t* *r6et.M .ls c'vn .Lpiie rsdn, Peet l.L aone him n o* G4ox 4 éad *edn aiirOCnele uesen- nrW ioLrvèe 'onl n kils *a Co msinrpedeosdrto erpotd'u h o mte eue osdrto farPf rea, *e o msarsqiliaéésu i oréuearý h or fC m isoes swl sarpr qu'un ~ ~ *apr delIgnere hfitrmiee nrp- At he nieradarpr r h portdu'Conrôltiret udieur réondat àcerains qes- andVudtor fepyin to cetai qustins ut« tions~~ ~ ~ ~ ~ poésprl omsin Sur a popoitin deM. 'écevi ýLaivîreil st O moionof ld. ariièr, i *a Réslu *u la prset sénesi juneàmri 3 Rsle.Tg hsmeigb dore n du *orat * ihsam ate2r ntna ia J. EGAUTIERE, GUTH sertie \"Sec cgmmiwçn~~~ 8éil\"t vieetdecéispu eVaito ofprpiatin o e ;gout Compe rndude Ja\"eblé du 2 mrs:1ý1Jý8ý. ýePot'df -metin hed * ;ad, Tedo an aivè ×o deMsFée su ;a ;;poi ;n\u003e iirietO oio fAd aiiri Sel",
         "MUNICIPAL DE MO-NT'R'F-Al- 37 1 3 IÀÜNICI PAL 'SUÈLETI N CONSEIL MUNICIPAL CITY COUNÇIL . .... . Report of spécial -eeti -1 the ý're11dù de l'assem ng held oi 22nd March 19,1 blée spéciale du iS mars 1915- nileur le Maire, M occupe le fau- His Worship the M ayor, Mr. Médéric Martin, in, the Mâéric Martin, Chair. rl-- ýý: , Il . - 1 - . - Lapbinte, W ard. MM les ýçhevins L. A, Lapointe N. La- Présent: Aldermen L. A. Lapointe, N. Ptésents May- May'rand Turcot, WaM, 'Cibruiell, Létburheau, Boyd, Bastién, O'Connell, Létourneau, Boyd, Bastien, . ýT,4rcùt, Macdonald, Giroux, Blumenthal; Larivière Macdonaldý Giroux, Blumenthal, Larivière, -Wuié; fiMé- RubenýsteirriuV2tiidelac, Weldon, Loranger, \"lard, Rubenstein,ý Vandelac, Weldon, Loranger, Huý ICIP, Ubeau, Therrien, Chartrand, Elie, Rochbn, Bat- Dubeau, Therrien, Chartrand, Elie, Roch-il, ea,14, l'auzé;,Lavergýne,,,et, MM- Ainey-Côté, Hé- Dubois, Pauzé, Lavergne-and Messrs. Ailey, côtJý_1ié- onald, Commissaires. bert and McDonald, Coýýmissio'ners'. ývétbal dela -derniere. assemblée est lu et adopté. The ni nutIcs of -the, las t'meeting,. wiere rea4, and col- firmed. PETITIONS. qub Pèllico, à l'ef f et d'être -constitué en corpora- i.-From the Pellico Club, to be incorpo'rated, au Bureau des Commissaires. Referred to the Board of Commissioners, utntreal Local, Cauncil of Weznen\"i: protesta nt .2;-From Montreal Local Council,-of Women' protestý- c 1Ttulafiôný, des àutos dâns -le Pare Mbnt\"Royal. ing against automobiles in Mount -Royal Park. ,Cý1 sur lé bùteau ýpour être prisé en considération en Laid on the tablé to be considered with thé igth ýô?dtýr s que le igème item de Vordre du jour, If the ciay. ý'SYbdkat Catholique des Char'pentiers-Ménuisiers, 3.-From\"'Syndicat Catholique, CharpentiersMëdui- 1ý0ntrç la -préférence donnée à -certains ouvriers ý de siers\", protesting against préférence given to ceraill Union laborers, oyée à -w Commission Spéciale, re Salaires Raison- Referred to Special Committee té fair wagés. la famille'de feu Fý'X Préno%ýeau, remerciant le 4.-From family of late F. X. Pfénovèau, tijanking ,\"de la -ý,mpathie qu'il iiii à témoigilée.' council f or sympathy exteridéd. ý9ux archîye-,--ý:. Filed of record. Saint- . Denis, demandant tepayers, 'St. Denis Wàrd, aski for C'er- Contribuables du quartier 5.-From. ra ng. améliorations, tain irnprovenÎents... sitiW-ile. M. l'éch. HOULE, appuyée par M. Péch. On motion of Àld. HOULE, secondéd hy Ald. MAY' D, il est RAND, it wasl- la e ri il , au Btireau des Resolved:- That said-petition be referréd tc, the- Ëoârd U 'dit eq ête soit renvoyée avec prière (rétudier laqùëstibn de savoir S'il of Commissioners, with a rêciuest that they ebnsider. the e . terminer rélargissement de la rue Saint-Denis advisabilitY of completing the widehilig âf St.- DeÉile-- Wëët-ý. Sul- friom, Cârrières streeÈ tc Làurief, la rue des Carriercs jusqu a l'avenue Laurier, spogitions de la loi iý\u0026Wr à dé sujet en igii, et with die provisions of the law, adbetéd.-iii, thWýýon iý ledit But= d!éttidierý les. autres demandes con-, in igii, and considigr,- ýthe si' ladite requéte et'dé'les accorder, si pos'sible. other requests in sa!ý( petiiioln, and toi grani'the'éarn'e if possible; ýs Tsý REFORT9. uteau des commi alres, ai! salet du 8 . ervite de la 6.-Frorn Board of commissioners, -le ilerry 'eerV*tý -8t. ille Sainte-Hélène. 1-£elenls. Island. ton de K l'écIL L A. LAPOINTE, app.uýe pgx On motion of Ald. L. A. ',TURCOT, il est Ald. TURCOT, it was Que' ré ude, A, t remise à là That of sàýd'rëport ýe de- dit rapport soi . . , \" - ý1_ ancë, et qWulle Commission coin osée , de ferred urîtâ rit:kt inecting, a1îd'thýt a Spécial cominîtté-e del- y( ci5,àibbs:êd: of Ald. 'Giroux, Ménard, Van ýe'hevins Girônx 'Métiard, Van, aie, Wé! on, elu -vergne, Houle et Larivière, Soit- nommk BIgmenthal, L-averg-ne,' limité ali'd Larivièie awJnîýd les. recommandations faites par le Bureaù des. 't , 0 consider the recommendafio-n of the Boeýrd ý0f C0mei]ý\u0026- res, cetteý Commis-Sion devant f rt \u003eau 31011ets, said cotËmfttee'to t'ýP'ort,ýto cwlacil r ýplus tard que lundi prochain. Le littr;gplrl ladite thàn et-x-t Monday, the quorum of SUW Cornrnitttý to =t être 'de nq mem reau ýe- coýàM1ssalrcs, demand=t érédi uý , , tion for St Phi, traverse de là rue St-Ph îppé., É4ct L loti m,;ýu ci Kid n A,ý LAFOINTE, dppuyét paý, est \"Put e ,ý4poit ýbâ i,«u et Adopté,",
         "BULLETIN - M UNICIPAL'DE MONTREAL 374 MUNICIeAL BULLETIN 01, M . . . . . . . . . . . \u0026-DuBureau des Commissaires, demandant un crédit de 8-From Board of Comrnissioners, foi an $2o,22o pour l'achat doutillage pour la construction d'égoùts. t:on of $20J20 tO purchase p!ant for the constru sewers. Sur, proposition de M. léch. L. A. LAPOINTE, appuyée par On motion of Ald. L. A. LAPOINTE, - secdri M. l'éch. MACDONALD, il est Ald. MACDONALD, it was Résolu: Que ledit rapport soit reçu ci adopté. ResQlvcd: That said reboril bc reccived and g.-Du Bureau des Commissaires demandant un crédit ad- g-From Board of C-ommissioners,, for an dîtionnel de $1,700 pour la pose dun syphon sous le Canal approprýation of $1,700- to conStrUct syphon -und Laihine. chine CanaL Sur proposition de M. l'éch. LETOURNEAU, appuyée par On motion of Ald. LETOURNEAU, seconded.. M. l'éch. TURCOT, il est TURCOT,. it was Résolu: Que ledit rapport soit reçu et adopté. lýeeolvéd.ý 'Phat said report bc rectived and àd (MM. les échevins Giroux et Lý A. Lapointe, dissidents.) '(Ald. G\"rotix àndL. A. La ahite dissentin P, io.-Du Bureau des Commissaires, demandant un crédit ad- MýFrônt Board of Commis6ioners, fôr an âd' ditionnel de $373.55, te achat d'une propriété de M. Isaîe Mar- aPerÔPtiàti6u Of $373-55 ýre ýpùrèhaÉe, of propérty. if solais., Isaïe Margdiaià. Sur proposition de M, l'éch. L. A. LArOINTE, appuyée par On motion of, Ald. L. 44POINTE, secoe )11P l'éch. GIROUX, il est Ald. GIROUX, it- w'a'ie: Rësolti: Que ledit 17apport sôîtreçu et adopté, le Reklved:, 'Phàt sâlià report 4 receivéd and aàdopPt, des mernbresdu Conseil présents exc4dant la.majorité absolue requise par la loi. (The nuln\"1111 of members présent exdeeditig.. tftl, soluté majorit, t'equired by law.) -ii.-Du Burm-u des Commissaires, dernandant un crédit de IiýFroiÉ Board of Commissioners, foT an ae l' - ý; le, pour payer es témoinsl experts,, te expropriation de la tion of e3où to pay expert witnesses ré Dtnotiv Il «I me Denonville. expropriation. Sur proposition 4e M. _I'éch, .DUBOIS, appuyée par M. On motion of Ald..DUBOIS, seconded by Alè. MENARD, il est Né'-RD, it was Résolu: Que ledit rapport soit adopté, avec l'entente que Resolved., That sad report be. adopted ton le montant de $26 fixé par le Bureau des Commissaires corn- how -cf $è5 'être les . ever that the amotint fixé by t1fe Me devant honoraires des experts dans chaque cause, Coxnmissîoàiis as th f to bc ýpàid in eàa c cémPr arches et tous les travaux qui pour- include alf thé. wo endra toutes les déin . rW chall bc perfdrmed .b raient ètre faits par ces experts. en rapport avec l'expropria- cýYpËrts, in confiection with ihig dicpropriatibli'éf eza 6011 de chaqgé.immeuble. perty. iz-Du Bureau des Commissaires, réitéra i 1, nt un rapport an- iz-From Board. of Commissioners térieur, à l'effet de payer un compte de, $igoo à M. H k viotis ieporttô,pay en accoLlilf Oi,$IPàa to Mr... Lordly. Lordly. Sur proposition deM. l'éch. L Aý LAPOINTE, appuyée par- On motion of Ald. L..A.- LAPOINTE, se M. -J'éch. MENARD, il est Ald. MENARD, it was Résolu:; Que ledit rapport soit rejeté.: 0 ete Resolved: . T-hat said rep rt bc rejected. ýM. Véchevin O Connellý dissident.) (Ald. -O'eo'nnë'll diesenting,), i3ýý-ýDu Bureau des Commissaires, 4 l'effet de votêr cet- 13ýFro1Û Board Of CoMMiseionér,ý_ to . votcý- tains ýmuntants, te réparations: au matériel roulant Pour le àunas ré repýiýing relling stock,, Road Department.ý,';, Dîépartefflni de la Voirie. Sttr propoýsition de M,.I'éch. L. A.. LAPQINTE, appuyée par on ulôtion of Ald. L. A. LAFOIXTÉ secààd' il est A1d-:OýcôNýxÈLL, it wa Résolu - eule ledit rapport soit reçu let aacpté. ,e*,.demàndant,,un crédit des Commissair .,j4.-Frbxa ed6xd, of for an à te eýglcment 525ý of $108 te sur propelOtioe ýde M. J'échý L. X LAP01NTE;ýaMy4 _Va:1ý -,0ýu nàýj,ýýJ of Ald., L kl,'BËXSTEIN, il lest Ald. JkV;îýÈNS-rEfN, Iledlit ilâpport,40it- ÉeÇ1ý et ad'opt,ý_: lhat ep said r ô t bé,îcçf_\u003eiýed alid -a 15ýJDu e-âreiu, àee' C0=isýÂircs, souineft2nt un t-4POet 15,Ftolü Board of u chef du Dëpaftemeut des,, Incendiesý te rè9lernentýdè ofýChief of Pire Dtpartfncnt te by-1 aw oncell'in Su P cJa'*ý 1L rehý L A. LA.PÔINT4 ýppuy4 On, motion of 'Ald L M. ilèch,,XAYRA-ND, il est A\"d. MAYRANDit Résolu: Que ledit rapport soit reçu et adopté. 1rhat sàw rëpâri be r1weivèd aùdýýù , i6--m-pu Bureau des Commissaires, répondant à une. ques- tion, te: tuninel de, 1w: rue J tibn rd Ontario street týût1neI. _Dýu Bureau des Cornrriiàsairirs, répondant à ultè 4\"ésý X7-ýýrom Board of Commissioners te lying to fit'9ý, re'nettoyage ýdèff rute \u003e - .: , . .. ý 1. , P e'-ý-Da Bureaudes Comnussaléesi r ondatit à unc'questi BoÙd of CommIs»Iôligtsý replying tq Irý*\" conduites sur la rue fi ôti te underground ëonduifs, St. Cafherine etve, ýý4r propoý\" de K Péch. L. Aý LAPIOINTE, appuyée pari of Ald, L. Aý LAFPJýi--f est DUB -eésiýn, 'Que wdits rup»brte soient reçus et que copies; en, That said 1 reports bc recefved, soï : ent f;ýný ëÉ 'aux hP'ýtransMiited to the Alýderm \u003e -and.' en inter ýJP.-Du But eau des Commis saires, réitérant un rapp ort au , 'Board of reaffi r térileur, te offre de M e\"eQý ilherris de.céder certaines par- -v.iou$ rePott te offer 01 Mr. George Wilhelms to'c'e tië4, de ruà. t t'\" a, il pot ý1 s of- Ëtre6ie. Sur proposition de M. l'écK IL.' A, LAM On motlon ôf, É. A. J\u0026, réch, LARIVIFËF, il ese Id: tARIVIERF, ft'Iwag Résolu: Qýu c Wü rawti ved",
         "IN MUNICIPAL DE MONTREAL 375 MUNICIPAL BULLETIN OF MON11ZEAL Bureau des Commissaires ' à l'effet d'inscrire cer- 2o.-From Board of Commissioners, to inscribe certain cOmme rues publiques. streets as publie thoroughfares. t't'position de M. l'éch. L. A. LAPuINTE, appuyée par On motion of Ald. L. A. LAPOINTE, seconded by liOULE, il est Ald. HOULE, it was Que ledit rapport soit reçu et adopté. Resolved: That. said report bc received and adopted. -Pu Bureau des Commissaires, à l'effet d'inscrire par- 21.-From Board of Comm;ssioners, to inscribe part of 'ýrtit Minto comme rue publique. Minto street as a public thoroughfare. ÔPOSition de M. l'éch. L. A. LAPOINTE, appuyée par On motion of Ald. L. A. LAPOINTE, seconded by MACDONALD, il est Ald. MACDQNALD, it was Que ledit rapport soit reçu et adopté. Resolved: That said report bc received and adopted. u Bureau des Commissaires, à l'effet de pe!mettre à 22.-From. Board of Comrn'ss:oiiers, to allow Mr. I_ La- fetière, de maintenir en place une marquise. fetière to maintain a marquise. tcrpo Otion of Ald. L. A, LAPOINTE, seconded by sition de M. l'éch. L. A. LAPOINTE. appuyée par On in -ÇHARTRAND, il est , Ald. CHARTRAND, it was u: - Que ledit rapport soit reçu et adopté. Resolved: That said report bc received and adopted. il Burcaudes Commissaires, à l'effet dpprouver les 23.-Frorn Board of Commissioners, to approve plans of \"Harris Abattoir Ço.\" Harris Abattoir Co. POshion de M. l'éch. I_ A. LAPOINTE, appuyée par On motion of Ald. L. A. LAPOINTE, seconded by MENARD, il est Ald. MENARD, it was Que. ledit rapport soit rejeté pour le moment et Resoved: That said report bc rejected for the present ý--Yédecin Officier de Santé soit prié dé bien vouloir and that the Medical Health OfficÈr bc requested to take .conTJaîssance de la demande de la Compagnie Harris Communication of the demand of the Harris Co. and to erle Conseil si cette demande devrait être accor- infor- th'e Couricil if their demand should bc granted. il Bureau des Commissaires, demandant un crédit de 24.-Frorn Board of Commissioners, for an appropria- ter,évision de la liste des électeurs parlementaires. tion of $ii6à.25 re revýsion of Parliamentary Electoral List. h. L. A. LKPOINTE, appuyée par LAPOINTE, seconded by it! on de M. l' c On motion of Ald. L. A. ý,ARD, il est Ald. WARD, it was -Que ledit rapport soit reçu et adopté. 1,'esolved: That said report bc received and adopted. Bureau des Commissaires, à l'effet de voter cer- 25.-From Board of Commissioners, to vote certain bventions au montant de $3o,5oq. grants amountîng w $30,500. ation re'pise à la demande de M. l'échevin Dubeau. Cons-Meration deferred at the request of Ald. Dubeau. Bureau des Commissaires. demandant un crédit de 26ýFrom Board of Comm:ssioners, for an appropria- rourrépa)rations , aux pavages, etc. tion of $2o2,oS to repair pavements, etc. 'xoeositiori de M. -1 éch. L. A. LAPOINTE, appuyée par On motion of Ald. L. A. LAPOINTE, seconded by MF-NARD, il est Ald. MENARD, ît wasi Que ledit rapport soit amendé en en retranchant Reso.ved, That sad report bc amended by strik'ng ý'item autres que ceux se rapportant: therefrom all the items other than those referring to ages permanents $51),Ow Permanent pavements .. .. .. $50,000 ýrs permatlents 20,000 Permanent, sidewalks 2oooo ,Âý1ýL4t: I;eBtireau des Commissaires étant prié a total Of $70,000; the Board of Commissioners being re- vouloir donner au Conseil des détails complets sur item afin de lui permettre de. voter avec clo quested to giýe to Couricil complete details In connection with the Cher items, in order that the Couricil maY,ý Cause sur ces demandes de crédits, et que, ainsi knowinglY, vote said appropriation,ý4 and that, so arnend-'ý ap ed, sa;d report bc adopted. ledit r ' port soit reçu ci adopté. lappoit est adopté par les deux-tiers des membres de Sad report was adopted by two-thirds of the members of t by law. tel que requis par la loi. lie whole Counciý as: requýred -Bureau des Commissaires, réitéra9t le rapport 27.-From Board of Commissioners, reafürming(. 'à l',ef fet d'opérex le, virement d7un . montant de $550 vÎous ieport to vary a sum of $55o for the Health Diepart- ment. LÈTOURNEAU, ap 1 puyé par M. l'éch. DUBOIS, Ald. LETOURNEAU moved, seconded by AId'ý 1) li- BOIS, Qu,ý ledit rapport soit adopt\u0026 That sa-'d reportbc adopted. 1-'A..LAPOIN'rE, appuyéepar M. l'échý LAVER- Ald. L. A. LAPOINTE moved in aniendment, accond- $c cri . . ... u'. eti by Ald.ý LAVERGNE, ent- Quëledit. rapport soit rejeté et que le ]lu- That said rePort bc rejected and that the )ýôârd of Çdfný Commissaires soit prié de demander au Médecin Of- missioner8 bc requested to as.k the Medital Heàlih Offifct Ibi Santé s'il n'y aurait ý 05 pri8sibilité dé f aire un- ré- whether it would nIt be os tô, te-adjust the amotint du montant de .*ow, voté pour entretien de cheý of $6»oo voted for hors cep, ic'et;, etc, 9calth - De- res, etc., Département d'liygiètic, de façon à ac- ýartmen*, or waft unt1 thier -8 aeproptiaýi üri' shall bc votéd in JUayy, to the disinfectoýrs ''the Ux dédinfecteurs le rnntitalit dr2 $.55o requis pour en- n 1 !av to nt to cý,cva1XX dici. ý la fin de l'armée. tmount ho\"ekeep until tlie end 01 the yearý ,'ýdýbatL ý,efiegêanÏý. ledit,, atuenderrient étànt mis aux And-a deb 1 ate ârising, said amendmérit bcinK p*t the Conseil se partage\", Council divided4., A, Laroi Macdonag Giroux, Larivîèrej 1- A, 1,ètp6!ïiteý M acdonald, GýrouX, Lari9iýrc1,ý1 e__6. Jý Lapoint nnell Lètourneau, Bas- Niays-, N. e warL 0,(:ýo and, Turcot, ùm en th4 Mévarà Rvbenstein. V Bz: n, LoTang Chartrand, tei\",' Ëýwàvg er,ý Dubeau, TkÈrrie Ro 0', 11ibois, Faüzé-2\u0026. RoýÛox4 lý»rb eati. derrient cst XeJ t,ý in1thÇý tiv",
         "-il-utlËTIN. MVN1CIP,%ýL -nE'MONTREAL 316 ÜUNICIPAI, BULÊEtf1ý- Ô1rý MONTREÎ r:-La motion principale étant mise aux voix elle est adoptée The main motion being- put, it vias carried on th,2ý1, sur la même division renversée des voix, Jil est division reversed, and Résolu En, conSéquëi1cëý Resolved: Accordingly. 28ý-Du Bureau des Commissaires à l'effet-de permettre à .28-From Board of Comrnissipners, t.Q oýiýi,,pw th e la Mbntieal Light, Heat \u0026 Power -de: planter un poteau treal Light, Hcat \u0026 Power Co. tý; ërect;a p\"(oyrte on'' dans la rue, McGill. street-,, Sur proposition de M. l'éch. L. A. LAPOINTE,- appuyée par On motion of Ald. L. A. r'APOINTn;' sec - on. d M. Véch. WELDON, ýiI est Ald.- WELDON, it was Résolu. Que ledit rapport soit reçu et adoptée.' Resolved:- That said report bc recelvéd ind ad bu, Bureau des Commissaires à Tef iet de eeimettre à 29.-From'Board of Commissioners, to àflow the\" la Montréal Public Service Corporation de planter des po- treal Public. Service Corporation to çrect poles on- teaux dans la rue Dumas. Street.- Sur. proposition de M. l'éch. L. A. LAPOINrE, appuyée par On motion of AU -Lý A. LAPOINTE, seconde,' M. Iléch. DUBEAU, il est Ald. DUBEAU, it was Résolu. Que ledit rapport soit reçu et, adopté.ý Resolved, That said report be rëceived, and -ad 3û.-Du Bureau -des Commissaires, à l'effet de permettre à 3o.-From Board of Commissioners, to allow Mrl L. DalcouM de maintenir et, place une marquise. Dalcourt to m aintain a marqul'se.1 Sur proposition -de M. rýéch. L. A. LAPOINTE, appuyée par On motion ofAldi-L. A. LAPOINTE, second l'éch. THERRIEN, il est Ald. THERRIEN, iîýwas .Résolu, Que ledit rapport soit reçu et adopté. Resolved: That said report bc, reccived and adoPt ýJXz-\"bu Býireàu' des' Commissaires, à l'effet de permettre 3i-From Board of Commissioners; to allow the à la Montreal Uàht, Heat \u0026,Pýbwer Co. de planter un poteau treal Light, Hèat \u0026 Power Co. to eréct a pole on dans' la-,rue Dorchester. chester Street. Surproposition de M. Véch. L. A. LAFOINTE. appliyée par On motion of Ald. Le A. LAFOINTE, second M. 1'4ch; BOYD, il est Ald. BOYD, it was Résolti: Que ledit, rapport soit reçu et aàopté. Resolvéd.ý That saïd report be receivéd aùd ad 32.-Du Bureau des Commissaires, 4 Feffct d'accepter la 32.-From Board df Commissioners, to accept the.' cessiori d'une partie de l'avenue Oxford. ion Of a' pbrflon of ýOkford avenue. Délibération remise à la -demande dé M--I',eýchýévin Giroux. Consid 0- eration. deferred et the request of Ald. Gx# .33ýDu Bureau des Commissaires, à Yeffet de permettre à 332-From Board of Cethmissipners, to aýIow the\"e là Canadian Northern Québec Railway C 0. de poser une voie adian' Northérn Québec Railwey' Co . to cross Smd à travers les rues Siadacorig et Marlborough. and Marlborough strects. nélibération remise' à la 'demande de M.: réchevin Char- Considération deferred at thé request ofýAId.'Cbar tvaind. 34.-De la Commi 1 Sion Spéciale, recommandant. que le rap- 34.-FrOm SPecial Comm'ittet, recommending tba port\"du\" Bureau des Cofnmissaires, -,ré \"achat de propriété part 'of Boàrdof Càthtnissfonctà W'-puréliaSe, cëf fÏinLý de MM. J. et H. Pagé, soit adopté. perty from Messrse J. \u0026 H, Pag'é be-'àdopted.- On' 1-seconded- by -AI Suý proposition de M. réch » M ËN A R D, appùýyée par M . motion of AU MENAgD dl r\u0026it ÈÔCHON'e il est CHON, it was Résfflg: Que ledit rapport de ladite Commission Spéciale Resolved: That said report Of ýýd Spec'i ýtÇoffi p2ciat Coffi ainsi ýue le rapport du Bureau des Commissaires y annexé, as well as tlit report of'the Board of Co=missionere reçus et adopté le nombre de membres'présen-tý ekcé- réunto annexed bc recei;ved and adopted, thé nuéýàïbD dant la mUjc,1itý abýý12e requise paf la loi. inembers prese#t exççediný, absolute majoriýy .. r ed bý law.'ý' \u003cU L. A.- Lapoititcý di5ý (Aldý T- Ae La hibé ýi8ýcnting. . . . . . . . Commission, Spëdate d'Ëilquète--re achat oi été 3ý -ýýFi C, m Special Comm',itte 1 Pr a e of Inývestijýaticn re, tue Amhexst, pcigrýun-ýbain public. \u003e0 d pnrcbase of pràperty on for, bl,ý,' bath.. de, M. fle. M. 0 crtïon i ' n motion of Ald, MENAR.D; éch ON, il est DON, it wao eiblu reçu ýt a'IOPt Th rep . a ta a at sait rt bc - recciv ýid 0 Ié les \u0026h6It1sý L A.'lapointe, ý1ou1é'et Boyd, digii (Ald. L.ý X LapOintè, I dents.). Son\"Éonneur lè 'Maire Zant qMté la salle du Conseil, M- His Wmhip the M'aydr li'avini leit the Coli\u0026U l'échevin 'Macdonaldj Occupe le fauteuil de ber, Ald' Macdonald,, Acting MaYor, took the la présidence. 36----ý-D1 la CSn-issiçm S éciale, ré râýpcirt'dii Bureau des â6,.-From Specîal COmmittee re repor't ô « Commissaires, concernant 1 e4ropriatio'n, de, la'. tue Notre- Commissidners concerzin ý e 1ý4.rîatJon of ame Ouest, We gt, »eoposition dé, M. léch, MENARE), appnyW . t «, M ... cconded: bry ()n tnotion: of Ald,,:MENAR,ýD, X\" Ne T4AP01NTZý il est' . . . : :, , . . 1 ''. . 1 . LAPOINTE,,it was t,-'Qw, îe dit- rapport dd ladite:.cdMnflniôTý. wt\"ýreÇa ' PeSdIved.- That ýà 1 ii'd report 16f eid lai Co= be reccivéd and kàOptedý 'nd:et Le A. 1ýp0înte (Ald, ThtrrienI.Chartrand a iid L. QUEST1ONS, QtWýL\"lQns sont'\"ees au ureau des Corn- ý7--rcrëàýh questions werèý put to the of, m 'àýâjrcý, avec prière'd'y f7épot1dre'à la prýcha1nc assemblée missioners, , -, ýýbat'they'rïý,ei)l ' ' X i w0h'a fequeu t thertto du C*isýiJ'paY (à) Mý I'ýéchevinWù4, pour l'inspection de next mectilig cf the, 'Cbuncil, b (a Ad. (b): M. léchevin Utibenstein, te ouvertur de inspection ýcrUjn $teettg; (b Ald. Rub' tew,",
         "F MONTREAL '!'MUýiIC1,PAL 1\u003e£ MONTREAL 877 MUNICIPAL 13ULL-T IN, 0 C'i£isoul (c) M. l'échevin Mériard, pour un recense- Ing Lf HUtChison street; (c) Ald. Ménard, for an annua census. s MOTIONS. r proposition de M. l'éch. L. A. LAPOINTE, ap- 38-011 motion of Ald. L. A. LAFOlNTE, seconded' M. l'éch. BASTIEN, il est by Ald. BASTIF-N, it was Què le Bureau des Commissaires soit prié de bien Resolved: That the ýommissioners bc re- nner au Conseil les renseignements suivants, rela- e nish to the Council the following inform- quest d to fur u Notaire de la ýCité. ation in connection with the City Notary; i détermine que les contrats doivent être payés par i' Who determines that contracts are to bc paid for by C0ýtractant avec la Cité? the party contracting with the CitY? ùel est le montant d'honoraires que le Notaire a reçu, 2' What amount has the Notary recelved as fées in c'l salaire, de ce chef depuis qu'il est à l'emploi de la ;_ddition tc, his salary, since he has been in the CitY's em- ploy? it Bureau soit de plus prié d'informer le Conseil That the said Board b further requested to infdrm the it Pas lorsque des, soumissions sont demandées pour Council if they do not think that, whenever tenders are etc., que ceux qui sOum is Sion nent, sa- called for works, supplies, etc., those who tender, kilowing .,,tt,rp,y,, un montant aussi considérable pour that they will have to pay a considérable amount for No- nÇ\u003etaire, ajoutent à leurs soumissions un montarit tary's fées, add to their tenders an amount sufficient to E.,Pour rencontrer ces dépenses et que, par consé- cover such fées, and.that, therefore, it is the City which Ia Cité qui est appelé à payer ces frais de Notaire is called upon to pay such Notary's fées, notwithstanding ré le traitement qu'elle paie et les dépenses qu'elle the salary which it paysand the expenses which it ineurg ;04r -entretien du bureau dudit Notaire, papeterie, for maintenance of the office of said Notary, stationcry', hm, etc., - été. stenographers, etc., etc. Proposition de M. l'éch. L. A. LAPOINTE, ap- 39.-On motion of Ald. 1- A. LAPOINTE, seconded Véch. WARD, il est by Ald. WARD, it was Que le Bureau des Commissaires soit prié de sou-- Resolved: That the Board of Commissioners bc re- COfiseil tous les documents se rapportant à l'achat quested to submit to Céuncil ail the documents concern- r,10ge automatique, laquelle horloge le, Bureau des ing the purzhase of ail automatic clock whicli thé Board aitts a ordonné de payer à même ýIes crédits pour of Cdmmissioiier5 ordered to; bc paid for ex-appropriation. tasuelles. for contingencies. Posi ion de M. Véch, L. A. LAPOINTE, ap- 4o.-Ori mot'on of Ald. L. A. LAPOINTE, seconded l'écL MENARD, il est by Ald. MENARD, it was Que- le Bureau des Commissaires soit prié de bien Resolved. That the Board of Commissioners bc re ,'p1eýtre devant le Conseil une -copie de l'opinion du quested to subinit to Council the opinion of the L4w. Deý- Qnt en Loi et des documents se rapportant à la ré- partment on the,çlaim of Messrs. Fleet \u0026 Falconex, \u0026s;ý de MM. Flect \u0026 Falconer, pour honoraires en rap- Weil. as of. ail documents relating thereto for fees in con- l'emprunt temporaire, que la Cité a fait par l'entre- mection with the teniporary loan recently negotîated b3r 'ýla Banque de Montréal. the City, thrôugh the Bank of Montréal. Mr p- -On motion of Ald. L., A. seconded Mýô osition de M. l'éch. L. A. LAPOINTE, a 41 LAPOINTE, 1 . é\u0026 O'CONNELL, il est by Ald. O'CONNELL, it wàs Que ie Greffier de la Cité reçoive instruciions de Resolved: That the City Clerk be instructed to PTe- Un état démontrant toutes demandes, questions, etc., pare a statement showing ail demands, questions, -etc., Btiréau des Commissaires, ou fonctiobnaires mu- Put to the Board of Conitnissioners or civie officia% bY par lit Conseil, depuisle ier janvier dernier, et qu'à the Couricil since the ist of January last, and that, in fu- un -registre de telles demandes, questions, etc soit ture, a reeter of such demands, - quesiions, etc.,, be » kýèpt le£ réponses s: rattachant, et que méýtion ýý soit J with the replies made thereto and a mention made-in cach tous les cas ou les rèýonse% nont pas.étéýdonnées. case where replies shall not l14,zeý been given. tTe,,sltl,,on de M. l'écli. DUBEAU,. appuyée par 42ý-On motion of Ald.I DUBEAU, seconded. bY:,Aldý Z NGER, il ýest; LORANGER, it was Que le Bùreati des Ckýmmissaircssoît --prié d'inÎor- Resolved: That the Boardý of Commissiloners he r\u0026 ramissaires de:3ýZcûle,; Catholiques, à.leur assem- quested to infortn the Catholic Échool Commissi tiers aL r4i' ir, le.ý du mpis courant que, Wit Bureau their meeting tà be. held on Tuesday -evening, the 23rd sýaires es pNt à appliquey à rachat de la rue Ro- instant, that said Board.oi Commissiollers are willme to e SailAt- dTý'à lýý rue Saint-Christophe, le-nion- apply to the pur-ùjiaÊé-:ôf Robin street from, St. André, qui -a -déjà vQt,6 pour J'élargissem ent. de strect to, St Chélitophe. street, the am;ýýnt, di pi,6oe al- xcady, voted, for'the Widéning Ot La FaYettt.1aneý NOTICES OF MOTIQNS. l'échçvip Laver9ne,,rý*. construqtion de voùte de., 4J,ý.-By Aldzerman Lîýý1ýrý ý1const'ruct1ôii ýoî, City. liâÏl. gtie, vaults, M., réchwn I_ A, à ref fet dl. amender W --By.. Ald an L. A. Laýe4nte, to amen dé feu: le. réý îndemijîtý tf)\"f ami] -525, ré indemnité â1âz tàwiik pom y of lât Firenii;n'T L i, tlR- î 'a' 1M f et' (le prendre- et doý'Y ek et ýMppûit du Bu CI, 1î1ý1ý ý1r1îàir fbý k, igues pour",
         "1cf BOLLET11 MUýî G ëAL liE MÜN a uye P' air M., l'écli. Gii motion of Ald: ÈÔV Sur proposition de M. l'éch. 14OULE, pp' e LÉ-, sec rided bý MAYIýAlýD,- il est RAND, it was Résolu.ý Que ledit rapport soit adopté. Resolved: That said report bc adopted. J 46.-The order of the day being rçad te conside 46-Etant lu lordre du jour, à l'effet de prendre en déli- side béra-tion un, raport du Bureau des (ýommissaires, re certains report frorn the Board of Cominissioners, for certai :crédits peur la construction d'une ýïbliothêqué publique. piîations, for the erection of a publie libraryý M. Vérý4 LORANGER, appuyé par M. l'éch. TURCOT, Ald. LÔRANGER -môved, seconded by Al,« Tu Propose: Attendu que te rapport du Bureau des Commis- Whereàs the report of the Board ;of Cornmissieone saires, actuellement devant le Conseil, ne donne aucun rens.ei- before the Coulicil does net give any information: gÉement: Sur lé genre de cônstruction qui doit être érige pour i' As toý the kùid of building wliich is te bc servir dé bibliothèque; bc used as a library; 2' Sur la qualité et la nature des matériaux qui doivent 2' As te the quality and nature of the materials te.. être employés dans la construction dé cet édifice;. in the erection of such building; 39 1 sùr la coffipétence et la respoiisaiýiité de l'entrepre- 3' As tO the ëdiripetency and responsibility of the'ýý, rieur où des entrepreneurs à qui doit être confiýe cette entre- tracter or contractors te whotri this undertakiiig.'41 ehtrusted; Attendu de plus que ce Conseil ne peut légalement prendre Whereas, moreover, this Couricil cannôt legally w3s li Pésponsabilîté de VGtèý des créditsý s'élev ' ant a .,près d'un responsibility of voting appropriations, âEmountillg to déini-million de doll2ýrs sans connaître quelques -,détails des half.millian dollârs, without beîng 2cquoinied with travaux qui -doîvent être exécutés avec ces crédits',- the details'of the works which are te be perfàtrned wll appropriations; Qu'il Soit Be it 'd cted and that 1késolu: De reiéteïr ledit rapwrt et de prier le Bureau des Resoived: That ffl repart.be rejç CýîninissaJres de bien Vouloir, pour rie pas retarder inutile of: Commisaïoners \u003e réeested ta submit ta the iýËht fi construction de la biViothè,que,, soumettre -au Conseil, w1thout 'delay, ln order net te uselàs1y delay Ïbe sans délai, un nouveau rapport contenant les renseignenlents tien of the library, a new report containing ibe im'f r4,«Uisý, de fa1ýon,à ce que ledit Conseil puisie voter,, avec coný required, sce that the saià Council may voèý with a t nais--ance', \u0026, cause, lés fonds ýuê ledit Bùréaii des Commis- knwledge of the facts the fünds asked, for by swres. detnandent; Board of Commissioners; thàt- said Board be Iu' quésied te cansider the advisability of erecfing suli, Qué ledit eùrea-d séit aussi priéld?' ler le ttunité de bv day labor, tifider f4e control ai id suptýsion of 'l a joutnée, s s le ecýhtwil et 1 a sur- cials. veffieike' de fotïctiùboaires ttiunitipnûx.' JEt, ý;n débat, S'erigagýeantý And, a débatearising, M. eêch. L, A ÉAÈOINtF,, appuyé par M. l'éch. O'CONý Moved iâ amýer)dMeni by Ald. L. A, LAPOI N,.rE, NELI, pfo\"e. en by Ald, UCONNELL, -1ýffl\"rùcnt. Qiïe ledit rapport soit, adopté ci que le Bû- That eaidý tepgrt be idopted =d týat. the !3ýôard bý esiofterg be aehorized te erèct the proposedl librarl' top sevçs swt autorN fairc è'5istti e_ a - mi à, jW rpéë, 411 te'idge propos; en wýMk, -ff \u0026«rmd, advisuble: and, dg farý as possible d'il pays., üse of car)edý= eateew. un FéCÉ BOYbý 2ppûýé PUXfM, le, ÊÔYÈ)ý nioved, g«ýOti4,ýd 'U Mk 1 . \"Pr Ïoh ec 4 'rhat said répoLtt bè \u003e gdbW\u0026 le' Ccmýei1 se Th Vofe éta pns, âU e ýoté beng fcken on wid ',quh-atnendnwtiý tW N. Lpointé, ward O'Conàel, yêâ t LýPoi1nt4, Ný Lapoitiýý Ward,ý,_ ý,ZfMr :kubn,-iein, weidéh -Rubens toyd, Baetien, Mý\u0026!Orald, Blumênthafl e, Thérrien, Chartrand, nard, Vandelac, Loýanget, Dubeau, Tl errim, Laranger_ 1?Ûbe 5;», Baawau, Dubiois,, Pauzé, Lavcrgnc7-17. So it Pasâtd in e iiiielvë. -Ili Zmt sel Prt4e vote Pour Jý AI' t Bcyî, Macdonald. Blil- Yeas: L A La (YConntlI,'Bè,ýýd, RubeýW'_ - 1 coiytte'- IË, aoté, M rd 'Vat, Tuee.: CJroiÏ'ýý -0 Na\" \u003e'ý 1 1 ý\u003eJ yý",
         "ETIN MUNICIPAL DE MONTREAL 379 MUNlCIPAL 13ULLETIN OF MONTREAL il est rejeté. So it qassed in the negative. tion principale étant mise aux voix, le Conseil se The main motion being put, the Council divided: N. Lapointe, Létourneau, Boyd, Mayrand, Turcot, ycas: - . N Lapointe, Létourneau, Boyd, Mayrand, Turcot, 'HOulé, Ménard, Rubenstein, Vandelac, Loranger, Du- Giroux, Houlé, Ménard, Rubenstein, Vandelac, Loranger, Du- 'Thûrrien, Chartrand, Elie, Rochon, Barbeau, Dubois, beau, Therrieii, Chartrand, Elie, Rochon, Barbeau, Dubois, ýLavergne--2o, Pauzé, Lavergne-2o. A. L apointe Ward, O'Connell, Bastien, Mac- Nays. L * A. Lapointe, Ward, O'Connell, Bastien, Macdo- lumenthal, Weldýn, Hushion-8. nald, Blurnerfthal, Weldon, Hushion-8. elle est adoptée, et il est Sý it was carried and lu, Resolved: Accordingly. 'En conséquence. proposition de M. l'éch. L. A. LA POINTE, appuyée par On motion of Ald. L. A. LAPOINTE, seconded by O'CONNFLL, Ald. O'CONNELL, nseil s'ai ourne. ned' The Council adjour 0. DAVID, L. 0. DAVID, Greffier de la Cité. City Clerk. AU S Et- RENE BAUSET, %Oùs-Greffier de la Clté. Asst.-City Clerk. Î'"
      ],
      "title" : [
         "Municipal bulletin of the city of Montreal ="
      ],
      "type" : "document",
      "source" : [
         "Bibliothèque et Archives Canada."
      ],
      "contributor" : "oocihm",
      "location" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06867_117",
      "label" : "Troisième Année/Third Year, No. 13 (27 Mars/March 1915)",
      "key" : "oocihm.8_06867_117",
      "media" : [
         "text"
      ],
      "pkey" : "oocihm.8_06867"
   },
   "version" : "0.4",
   "request" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06867_117/1?r=0\u0026s=1\u0026fmt=json\u0026api_text=1"
}
{
   "request" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06867_124/1?r=0\u0026s=1\u0026fmt=json\u0026api_text=1",
   "version" : "0.4",
   "doc" : {
      "key" : "oocihm.8_06867_124",
      "media" : [
         "text"
      ],
      "pkey" : "oocihm.8_06867",
      "source" : [
         "Bibliothèque et Archives Canada."
      ],
      "contributor" : "oocihm",
      "location" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06867_124",
      "label" : "Troisième Année/Third Year, No. 20 (15 Mai/May 1915)",
      "title" : [
         "Municipal bulletin of the city of Montreal ="
      ],
      "type" : "document",
      "lang" : [
         "fra"
      ],
      "published" : [
         "[Montréal : La Ville de Montréal?, 1915]"
      ],
      "note" : [
         "Hebdomadaire",
         "Index pour Troisième Année/Third Year dans Troisième Année/Third Year, No. 52, numéro de l'ICMH 8_06867_156."
      ],
      "text" : [
         "Troisième Année M.i 17 Third Yenr 20 May p A' L MUN1C1PAL.ý [IULLETIN CITY' De la CITE de MONTREAL 0tMONTREAL ýý,'ýn»LISHED ]EVERy SATURDAY PARAISSANT LIE SAMEDI MATIN MORNING UlcatlOns relative to the Municipal Toute cornmunication concernant le Bulletin 8hOuld be addres8ed as follows: Municipal devra être adressée cOrnrne suit: -24ýNIC1PAL BULLETIN 13ULLETIN MUNICIPAL CITY HALL HOTEL DE VILLE MONTREAL TELEPHONE MAIN 4240 MONTREAL IDELIBERA FIONS ISSAIRIES BO,4pD OF COMMISSIONERS ,,ItEAU DES COMM refidu de l'asftmbléè (in 27 avril 1915, a Report cf ineeting helds en the 27th April 1915, a-ffià 'les Con-imissaires pres6nt: His Wàr8hiP the Mayor in the Chair, and Maire' Prés'ident; mm Messrs. Ainey, Hébert and CÔté, COmmissioners ert, coté. Flarlagan appeared before the Board and éT-Ifid M. Flanagan se présente devant le Bureau I. Rev. Mr. cetin s hi the St. Louis e1'usage de la salle de lhôtel-de-ville Saint-Louiý, asked for De réuni ns en faveur de la Croix-Rouge. Town Hall, in favor of the Red Cross. ýti0n de M. le Commissaire Ahicy, appuyée par , on motion Of Éon-imissioner Aincy, seconded by Coin. 4saite, Hébert, il est in;ssloner Hébert, it-Was faire droit à cette demande, et (le donner iKý- Resolved: That sald request be granted and that ins- ,'attýý;11rintendant des Edifices Municipaux de tructlons bc given to the Superintendent of Municipal- 't'c'le Révérend. M. Flanagan pour fixer les datýs Buildings to confer wth the Rev..Mr. Flanagan as te the dates of said meetings. utie requête de citoyens sý plaignant de l'exis- 2.-Submitted a petition from citizens compla'il!';Ig of c bâtisse, occupée comme magasin de a certain building occupied-as secoild-hand store at No. atý1';Q 773, rue Saint-Jacques. 773 St. James strett, Dn de M. le Commissaire Ainey, appuyée par On motion- of Corntni-,siQner Ainey, s.econded.by- Com- Hébert. il est :xissioner Hébert, it was ýeso ved: That -the sanie bc referr te ýÏféXer à lArchitecte de la Ville, pour rap- 1,ý ed te the City Àr- chitect for a report. 711WUÎre McI)pinal\u003cl prend son siège. Cornmiss'oner McDpnald took Ws scat. ute of fre, de M. A. Kelly, of f rant. de vendre 3..-Subinitted a letter'from-Mr. A. Kelly, offeririg te à gazoline. sell te the City à gâsoline yacht. tý0t1 deý M_ le Cominïssaire Ainey, appuyée par On motion of-Commissioner Aincy, seconded by Corn- çôté,,ii est dant des Parcs pour rap- missioner Côté, it wast ferred to the super*.11- ré f 6if et au Surinten Resolved,. That the sanie bc re tetîdent of, Parks icir'a repôrt.' rýnmTr-,wication de la Ligue du 4.---SÙbïn'ýtted a -couirniinication from the- Civic onn crient L'eague, askiùg that, instýüctýons nt de d er instniçtions au Surint il nt y be given te the -et fiersèr uà;\" Supcrintendentý of an area of about 4 tO 5 1àourer pace d'environ that -ýs lioltifier aussitôt q1ýe le acrcK Park rjýttghcýd ànd _haTrowedý and 'ParcL lialdwin, ci de Io 4 , aýn -qtlitg ýùigsent y dotýhef dqs déni;àýýAtfa- they he noifiedaýs soon ils the wqrk is doÉe iri (WdtDýtba t they May givt farming Mon dr M. lie Commissaire AinéY,ý app par niotion of ccmmissioýier Ai0ýeYe àecç*ded,\" gai it vý;as éférer aü Sùrintefidan t dcýà Resolved: That the ýaftý le'xeferred ý0 'the of",
         "U, BULLETIN MUNICIPAL DE MONTREAL MUNICI.?AL BULLETIN OF MOEF, 5.-Sotimise une communication de M.,Thomas M. Morgan itted a communication from Mr. au sujet de l'expropriation d'une partie dt à propriété, si- Morgan .ent the expropriation of part.ôf hie tuée au coin sud-est des avenues du Parc et Van Horne. , ted, at the south-east corner of Park and.':,, avenues. Sur proposition de M. le Commissaire Hébert, appuyée par On motion of Commissiolier Hébert, secon M. le Commissaire Côté, il est missioner Côté, it was Résolu: De référer au Département eu Loi pour rapport. Resolved: . That the same bc rcferredýto1., partment for à i eport. 6-.Soumise- une communication de MM. Armand Cour- 6.-Submitted a communication from Mes, tois \u0026 Frère, sollicitant une entrevue avec le Bureau. . Courtois \u0026 Frère, asking for an interview wýtW1 Sur proposition de M. le Commissaire Hébert, appuyée par On motion of Commissioner Hébert, secorni M. le Commissaire Côté, il est missioner Côté, it was Résolu: D'informer les réquérants que le Bureau sera Resolyed: That the petitioners bc i-'orme prét à les recevoir, jeudi, le 29 du courant, à midi. Board will receive them on the 29th ai, 7.-(26588) Soumise une interpellation de l'écheyîn Submitted a question put by Ward, au, sujet des soumissions pour la fourniture de l'as- anent thé tenders for the supply of asphalt . . . . . . phalte, Sur proposition de M. le Commissaire Hébert, appuyée par On motion of Cânimissioner Hébert, secoc.. -M. le Commissaire Côté, il est missioner Côté, it was Résolu: De référer au Député-Ingénieur en Chef pour -Resolved: That the saine bc referred to rapport. Chief Engineer for a report. e rsés faits Par le DéPa \u0026-Soumis un état de dbou rtement 8-Subinitted, a statement of disburseme' en Loi,,en certaines causes, au montant de $213-70. the Law Department in certain cases, aý $21.3-70. Sur proposition'de M. le Commissaire Hébert, appuyée par On motion of Com-missioner Hébert, second M. le Commissaire McDonald, il est missioner McDonald, it was Résolu: D'autohser le paiement dudit montant à même ý Resolved: To authorize the payment ther le Fonds de Réserve serve Fund. g.-Soumis un compte de M. F. X. Champagne, au montant 9.-Submittë-d an account from Mr. F. de $71i pour assignation de témoins, dans l'enquéte concernant amounting to $71, for having served sub-pôCR'ý4 la livraison de la pierre dans le quartier Mercier. igation concernirig the delivery of stone il, Mef, Sur sition de X W Commissaire Hébert, appqyée par On motion of Commissioner Hébert, sec4ý K lè = issaire Côté, ý il est missioner Côté, It was Résolu, D'autoriser le paiement dudit compte à même le Resolved: That said account bc paid ex- crédit voté pour payer les frais de ladite enquête' voted to cover the costs of said investigatiOgý,,.. M-26(574) Soumise une . communication du Secrétaire io.-(26574) Subm1ttýd a communication du Département des Réclamations, attirant l'attention du Bu lifig eh cretary of the'C'laims Department, cal feau sur Ici dangers causés par le permis accordé aux étran- of the Board to the danger arising froni the, g7s d'utiliser' lespoteaux en cuivre, employés par les pom- strangers arc allowed to utilizc the copper PÔ piers pour descendre d'un étage à l'autre pn cas dincendie. the firemen to go down from one Sitorey th case of lire, Sur proposition de M. le Commissaire Hébert, appuyée par On motion of Commissioner Rébert,,aec M. le Coannissaire Côté, il eït rnissic:ner Côté, it was Réýlu. De référer au Chef du Département des Incen- Resolved: 1 That the ýame bc referred to dies, avec instructions de voir à ce quect fait nese rmou- the Fire Departinent wuh Înstrucfions to:\"f\" velle pasý 1 such practiIce. li.-(2648) Soumise une communication de la.Compa-, Il. (26649). Subrnîtted a communication %amontagne Limitée' se.plaignant du. mauvais état Lamontagne limitée\", coiriplaining of tKt de la rue Èisson. son Street. icn de M. le Commissaire Hébert, appuyée par M, 1 t = s4we. Çw, il est On nî'ýtinn M Commissioner Hébert. secý.,eý iiiisaloùer, M3, it wu Résolu: De réfâW au Chtf pour kesolyed- That th rapport e saine b e referred tà C-,Iiief\"Zngineer for a report, .12.-Soumis un rapport du 'Surintendant des Edlfices Mu- IzýSubmitted a report from the sul\u003eer nicipaux, transmettant certains renseignements, en réponse Municipal 'Buildings,. fransmitting certain if, à ' une interpellation de l'échevin Ward, concernant les ter- Teply to a question put'hy Ald. Waýi\u0026, . col' rains vendus par la Ville, Boulevard Saint-Laurent. land sold by the City, St. Lawrence Boulevar Sur proposition de M, le Commissaire Hébert, appuyée par Ori motion of Commissioher ffêberît, sec M - le Commissaire Côté, il est miuioner C6té, ft was kftolu: Pc transmettre ledit rapport au Conseil. Resolved: That said report be tran=1 t 8) Soumis deux rapportà du- Surintei\u003e -dan ?e7 I3-ù26677-ýa6678) submitted two repo t de rÈclairage, recommandant rinstalliation de lampes ntendent of the Light Department, sur certaines rues, 91r.iitistallation,,of. lamps iii certain. street8-,ý 'Sur proposition de M. le commissaire Côté, appuyée Par -On motion of Commissioner Côté, stc(M M. le_ýCommissaire Hébert, missioner Hébert, it-was _app et lesdits- rapports. R'tiolved: To concur in said reports\" 14- (:Dý4) ý S,ýuWfq un rappo rt du D 1 épartéti ient en Ioi 14e-ýgubniitted a report. from, f lhe, Lawý D redôrAnlardae le reglement ý de la réclamation \"Dr 8ý1àrp\" v g commending that the claira of Dr. Sharv il La Cité de Yonttéal, sur paiement au demandeur d'une soin- NIontreal, be settled-by ýýing to the pfiLle, me de $86ý-35, ce dernier se chargeant de payer, àýniêmë $860-35, t'he latterto pay Out of said suia,, h; cette somme, teos lis frais de sur proposition de M. le.Commissaire Hébert, appuyée, par On nib'tioi, ül Commissî0lier: XébjEýt, le: commismare tniâsioner Côté, it was. Réso1w. Miitorisér le xè lemeut de ladite rédamation, Xesolved: Thqt said claiii: be settitd gif, Ë;am.nle ci-dessus à rnèffie lé Vonds dt Réserve.",
         "INMUNICIPAL DE MONTREAL 801 MUNICIPAL BULLETIN 0F MONTREAL des mandats, vérifiés par le Contrôleur et Au- 15-Submitted warrants verified by the City Comptrol- té, au montant total de $8,25o.8o, suivant liste ler and Auditor, aggregating the suin of $8,25o,8o, as per certified list. de M. le Commissaire Hébert, appuyée par On motion of Cominissioner H.ébertseconded byCorn- ui§saire McDo'nald, il est missioner McDonald, it was In autoriser le paiement. Resolved: To authorize the payment thereof. ý Soumis un rapport du Département en Loi, 16-(26549) Submitted a report from the Law Depart- ýnt de demander aux Ingénieurs de la Ville, cer- ment, recommending that the City Engineers. bc request- e 1 Uts, en rapport avec la lettre du Club Ou- ed to furnish certain information in connection with the -Fniard, concernant les ouvriers à l'emploi de letter frorn the \"Club Ouvrier St. Paul-Emard\" concern- sttuction Co.\" ing the laborers employed by the Cook Constrýction Co, 8itiOll de M. le Commissaire Côté, appuyée par On motion of Conimissioner Côté, seconded by Corn- issaire Hébert. il est raissioner Hébert. it was De référer à l'Ingénieur-Surintendant de l'Aque- Resolved: That the same bc referred to the Superin- immédiat. tending Engineer of the Water Department for an imme- diate report. Soumis un rapport de l'Architecte de la Ville, 17--(226530) Submitted a report from the City Archi- t de Permettre à MM. Paré et Lussier d'occu- tect, recommending that Messrs. Paré \u0026 Lussier bc al- le No cad. 393o, subd. P-8 et 9, quartier lowed to occupy Cad. lot No. 393o, ýubd. P. 8 and 9, Y t.teevoir-,emmagasiner et vendre du bois, etc. Emard Ward, for the purpose of storinig and selling Wood, etc., thercon, -On de M. le Commissaire Ainry, appuyée par On motion of Commissioner Ainey, scconded by Com- 5àire Héberti il est mission er Hébert, it was 'ýc0Tder le- permis demandé. Resolved: To grant the permission sought for. \u003e 26342) Sur tion de M, le Commissaire iS.-(26564-26342) On motion of Commissioner Aincy, Par M. le Commissaire Hébert, il est seconded by Corrimissioner Hébert, it was 'Conformément aux, rapports soumis au Bureau, Resolved: As per the reports submitted to the Board de la Ville, d'octroyer les permis suivants: by the Citv Architect, to grant the following permits; permis d'occuper le lot No cad. 4'iA I. Mr. R. Hotte, to occupy Cad. lot No. 411A, St. jean- Si-Jeýn-Baptiste (No 1459 rue Clarke), pour Baptiste Ward (No. 1459 Clarke street), to install an un- souterrain, et y emmagasiner la gazô- dergroutid tank and store gasoline therein; A.- Utourneau permis d'occuper le lot No cad. 2' Mr. J. A. Létourneau, to occupy Cad. lot No. iffl, 1ýS'X53 du quaýtiei Saint-Henri, (No 2698 rue subd. 152-153, St. Henry Ward ýNo. 26ý8 ýNotre Darne ýQ4est), Pour y recevoir, emmagasiner et vendre street West), for the purpose ot receiving, storing and selling gasoline thereon.' ,ýý 8!tien -de M. le Commissaire Côté, appuyée ig.-On motion of Commissionei Côté, seconded by 'Ssaire Hébert, il est Commissioner Hébert, it was réitérer le rapport fait, au Conseil, à l'effet Resolved: To teaffirra the report made to Council, re- 1 dé voter une somme de $2,oco pour Fins- COMMending t;ýat a SUm of $2;000 bc voted for the install- 'Os$\u003cc du type \"Imboff\", pour l'épuration de ation of an Iftibôff pit-to purify the Notre-Dame de Grâ- Nôtre-Danie de Grâces, et de donner ins- ces main sewer, and to give'instructions to the Engineer ieur en Charge du Département des Egouts in charge of the.Sewers Department, to confer with Mr. M. McNulty pour l'occupation du terrain. McNulty as to the occupancy of said piece of land. Outniee une communication de la \"Luxfer ýaùý-(ýý6646) Subrnitted a communication from the Lux- donnant avis à la Cité qu'ils ont un compte fer Prisrn Co., noti ing the City that they have a claini le contracteur du plant de filtration e. of $1,e23.90 against P. J. Jago \u0026 Co., contractors for the filtration plant. ýde M * le Commissaire Côté, appuyée Par On motion of Commissioner Côté, seconded by Com- aire,ýjjébert. il est missioner Hébert it was 4ferer au Contrôleur et AvLAeur pour pren- Resolved: That the same bc ý réferred to the City Comptroller and Auditor with instructions to take note thereof. Îs . aire Hébert donne avis de motion à l'ef - 2i.--Cornmissioner Hébert gaýe notice that, at the ý*41eu\"i0È à la séance du Bureau des Commis- meeting of the Board of Commissioners, on Weanesdayi 3 hrs P.m., sur la question -de l'élargisse- at 3 pm., he will niove that the question of the widening Notre-Dame Ouest. of Nôtre Dame street West bc considered. Soumis un rapport du 1 Direct eur de l'Assis- 6604) Submitted a rtport from the Director 91 SUÉ la. demande du Surintendant des Parcs, Municipal Assi . stance, on the communication froin ' the aition de l'Assistant-Surintendant de Illle Superintendent; of Parks, askiiig that \"1ý SuperPosed beds, lits suprposês, destinés à la station de pô- bc placed at the disposal of the Asst.-Superintendent of 1t, et ce Pour la saison dýété, et déclarant St. Helen's Island, for the Island Police Station, for the dr'ýit à cette requéte, pourvu que ces lits surrimer se#son, etating he is in position to grant sa1d.e-e ires soient retournés au début de l'au- quest, larovided said beds and the bedding required bc re- turned. at the. beening of th'e fall. Utf71zý étre en état, de laver et repasser la He furthermore stated that lie w'Us in a position to, agi ný Le trans oTt de$dità efiets devant être and iron said,.bedding. The said articles.to bt'tranë\"rtedý 1- nitnt des. warcs. by the Pàrks Dep'artm'ent. 1 .. 1 ý 1 M, le Commissaire McDonald, appuyée On motion of Commission« UtD=Zlçi, sàëmdti by «aire Ainey, Il est Cotùùûseic\u003encr Ainey, it was ÔUYtr ledit ýappQrt. Tocotýctir in *ai\u0026 reporL e JeçmMunication de, la \"NaËonal -rire Pro-. 23.--Subrwtted a communication fre1ýa thýý \"ý., demandant. de dé . l4guer le Chef Ttet: . Fire Proýec tion Aý4oda-6on, aeldng that chw fi on de leut'Astoriation, qiù'ýaurâ lieu l0g be dekgated to the convo'týtïon of *éîr tp held *n 6e iithý iith \u0026ne ret",
         "BUI-L.LTIN'M[,INICI PAL DE MONTREAL 602 _MUNlClPALý BULLETIN'OF M Sur propositionde M. le Commissaire McDoiiald, appuyée On motion of Commissioner McDonald, BO par M. le Commissaire Aincy, il est- Commissioner Ainey, it was Résolu: Qu'une somme de $roo soit votée, ex-Fonds de ïiesolved: That a sum of $ioo be voted Réserve, pour payer les dépenses du Chef Tremblay, à cette Fu nd, to pay the expenses of Chief Tremblày ,sonvention. vention. 24-(25624) Soumis un rapport ýdu Département en Loi, 24-(25624) Submitted a report from flic sur la réclamation de MM. Picard \u0026 Valin, pour extras, en nient, on the clwm of Messrs. P-card \u0026 Vallr4.ý -apport avec la construction du poste de feu et de police, in connection with the construction of the ffii dans le quartier Bordeaux, et déclarant s'en tenir à leur rap- station in Bordeaux Ward, stating that they r port du 24 mars dernier, savoir, que lesdits entrepreneurs report made on the,24th March last, te wU: t n'ont.pas droit à ces extras. contractors are net entitled ta said extras. Sur proposition de M, le Commissaire Aiiiey! ýkppuyée par On motion-of Commissioner Ainey, secolidedAl, M. le Commissaire Côté, il est mrssioner Côté, it was Résol-ù': D'approuver ledit rapport et d'informer MM. Pi- Resolved, Ta concur in said report and t card \u0026 Vallin en conséquence. Messrs. P'card \u0026 Valin accordngly. 25.-Sur proposition de M. le Commissaire Ainey, appuyée 25.-On motion of Commissioner Ainey, ý1, par M. le Commissaire -Côté, il est Commissioner Côté, it was Résolu: Deý donner instructions à l'Ingéilieùr en Chef de Resolved. That instructions be given te tbý', se mettre en. communication avec le Comité du Monument 9iiieér ta communicate with the Cartier Main' Cartiér, pour savoir quel a été l'emploi dL-s $2i,5oo, montant mittee and ask them. how was spent the anio voté ' par la Ville, pour les travaux aux approchés dudit go- Soo voted by the City for the approaches -te _t miment Cartier, et de faire ýrapport aux Commissaires, en Monument, and toreport ta the Commiss-on 26-Sôumis un rapport du Député-Ingénieur en Chef, re- 26.-Submitted a report froni the Deputy commandant la pose d'un tuyau à l'eau, dans le Boulevard gineer, reconimending that a water main hé 1 Monk, entre les rues Saint-Patrice et Jacques Hertel, au coùt Boulevard between St. Patrick and jacques approximatif de $3,ooo. at an approximate cost of $3,000. Sur proposition de M. le Commissaire Côté, appuyée par On motion pi Conimissioner Côté, second4 M. le Commismife Hébert. il est miesioner Hébert it was Résolu: D'autoriser la pose dudit tuyau; le coùt devant Resolved: That said main be laid, the cost. être imputé sur le- crédit votIé, pour la Posede tuyaux à l'eau be charged agaînatthe appropriation vQted.f0r1ýý, dans différentes- rues. of 'ater mains in dýfferent streets. 27.-(267ýIl') Soumise une , communication de M. J. E 27--(26711) Submitted a cçnnmunic ation ir Maya \u0026 Compagnie, demandant que la Ville-fasse clôturer J. E.. Mayo ý \u0026 Co., asking the City ta _fef ic le terrain qu 1 ell, e possède au coin des rues' Bréboeuf et Boule- land owned by the latter, corner of de Bréboeüf vard Saint-Joseph. St-. Josèph Boulevard. Sur proposition de M. lé Commissaire Hébert, appuyée par' .,On motion of Commissioner Hébert, seconddd K le commissaire Côté, il est nissioner Aincy,,it was Resolved. That thé same be referred tQ Résolu, De référer à l'Ineiiieur-Surintendànt 'de la Vai- tending Engineer of, the Road Departrnent' rig, et 11TAgent des Achats et des Ventes, pour rapport. Purchasing and ýSa1es Agent, for a report. .z. 28,-(26682) Soumise une communication de K S. Dar- ling, au sui-et de ],ouverture d'une me, sur lé lot No ýad. 6l' 2S.-(26m2). Subrnitted a communication fr du Village Incorporé de la Côte-des-Neigis, et dant la 'Ville Darling, anent the, opening of a street oz! èst propriétaire. pf the incorporated village of côte-des N.eýkei, belongs te the City. sur roposition de M. le Commissaire Ainey, appuyée par K ýe tcuumi§saire Hébert. il est On motion of Cômmiýsiýz!er Ainey, ÉecoP, Résolu. De ré férer à l'Ingéi iieur-Surintendant de la Voi- Missioner Hébert, it was rie pour rapporf. Resolved: 'rhatý the same be referred ta tending' Enginéer oi ýthe Jkoad. Départment f\u003cW' Sýiumîs un rapport -du Département en Loi 29--(2,667,3) Submfited a report from the,' sur e la \"Mont-Roral Liquor Groctry store', metit, on th ë claim ofl the Mount Royal Li au tnootâllt de représ,-,ntant a -valeur des peàux de ig veaiLix, canfisqués par la Cité- et, Ie -rejet de. Stdre, am\"ntitig ta 4i, represçnt:rîgýtbe ladite réclamation. Yalves corifiscated' by the City, recommendi Sur proposition de M. le Commissaire Hébert, appuyée par c V, le Cernmissaire Côté, il est i ' On motion of Coihniiâioner liéberj, Résolu, Uapprouver ledit rapport et d'informer les réý quéraiits en conséquence. Resofved- Të concur in èa-',d report and p etiffoners accýorditigly., 30,_ (elo) Soumise une éomm=katibn du Président de la chaàbr\u003ee' de COMMerce, transinettant une tapie'd'une r\u0026 3ûe--(26ý,ü) Submitted a comtnunicati \"luticil\"a-doptée par le Board of Tradt, lAssociation des Ma-- Chairrnan, M the 1'ýChambrý de CoMweCeý',, hnf a L ctbriers Caaadiéný dt la Chambre de Commerce, à l'effet a ýre\u0026olution adopted by the Board of Tnd6ýý ýprier l'admitlistration municipale d1étâbjiý, à. Montrégj- un Mànufacttzrérs' AYsociation and îhe ýýCha 1Xuýgù de ren.qcignements commerciauxet indugtrielà therce\", re4Ùàting the, civic adininistritýOILs\"\" in M1ontýeal a Cý,jinmercW and Indu8trilat, pt ûpositiýcn de X-le Commissaire. Hébed, apjýüYée par M, 4 Uemmiesairc ýMéDonald-, il, est On motion- of, Comihiesioner 1-lé4rt, iWCOO kiwtU - 'pe faire . rapport au doàseil recomwafidant li was vote de làdite $OMMe., à être imputée sur lé montatit disponi- Resol-ved That fhepetitioners et qupeléMentaiýe. ààid tequet fer: the 516Y 56timig un rapport da seinmndànt des Edi-, b port frotti tfiý, 3 X.\u003e (265 i 6) Su Mitted a re 'ces le 4ote d'unCrédit -,Te Wd dent of' Munic!pàl lýùildingj, recomfnell Pour r2that métallique$,, pour le Bureau du ropriationýof $2oo be voted for tht u ýGr8f fier. fi 1 'pu Çý cabinets for ýthe City Cië, t, 10 Se propositiôn de Mý le ëammi\u0026îaire Ailley; appUY, Ôn motion of Èomniissienér Ainey, inissioner MeDdnald, It'wat",
         "MUNICIPAL DE MONTREAL 603 MUNICIPAL BULLETIN OF MONTREAL De faire rapport au Conseil recommandant le ed: That a report bc made to Council, recom- somme, à être imputée sur le niontant di5po- d i Oý,',, h a t saýd surn bc voted the saine to bc charged against t e ayailable ba'ance of, the Supplementary ý8ud9ct SUPPlérnentaire. th 1 Budget. soumise une communication de M. james 32-(25882) Subni'tted a c 1 ommuilication from Mr. ja- ýÏet du paiement des taxes sur des terrains offerts mes Baille, anclit the payment of taxes on picces of land en 1913, Pour l'ouverture d'une rue, et pour les- offered to the City in igi3, for the opening of a street, 's jamais pu être produit de titres réguliers. and for which no regular titles have never been produced. os't01-1 de Mý le Commissaire Hébert, appuyée par On motion of Commissioner Hébert, seconded by Com.- Inismire Côté, il est m. Isslon r Co' té, it was l'e référer au Notaire de la Ville ývec ilistrue- R,,ý,.leved: That the saine bc referred to the City No- ,eendre les procédures nécessaires, pýur obtenir les tary; xith instructions to take the necessary proceedings Propriété desdits terrains. in order to obtain the tules of said land. \u0026 33 -On motion of Commissioner Côté, seconde ropOsition de M. le Commissaire Côté, appuyée d by 111rnissaire Hébert, il est Coi-nini--,ioiier Hébert, it was ')'a'ltoriser le Secrétaire à écrire au Départenient Resolved: That the Secretary bc instructed to corn- à Ottawa au Builders Exchange et à la Geiieral municate witlý the Labor Department, at Ottawa, to the Associatiý. pour avoir une copie de la liste des Builders' Exchange and to the General Contractors' As- Llis la Ville de Montréal, approuvée soc'atýon of the City of Montreal, and ask thern to send ces trois corps. him a copy of the schedule of fair wages, approved by the issaire Aine , dissident. three bodies, respectively. y (Commýssioner Ainey dîssenting.) _Proposition de M. le Commissaire Côté, appuyée 34.-On motion of Commissioner Côté, seconded by ýcû111mîsSRirG Hébert, il est - . . Commissioner Hébert, it was 'Que la séance soit ajournée à 3 hrs p.ni., ce jour, Resolvèd: That this inceting bc adjourned until 3 ý1r l'étude-de la question des tramways. o'clock this day, to résume consideratioil of thé Tramway quesvon. L. N SENECAL, L. N. SENECAL, Secrétaire. Secretary. r'ýýdu de l'assernblée (lu 27 avril 1915, P.M. Report of meet'ng held on the 27th April igi5, p.m. le Maire , président; MM. les Commissaires Présent: His Worship the Mayor.in the Chair, and 0rtald, Hébert. Messrs. Aîney, MpDonald and Hébeèt, Comm'ssioners. e ayant été ajournée à cet après-midi, Pour i,--The meeting having been adjourned unt:1 this after- que-stion du tramway, il est noon to consider the Tramway question, it was consentement unanime, que le ]ýureau procède Resolved: With the unanimous consent of the mein- Outite. bers, that the Board proceed to consider routine business. Soumis un rap\"t du Département . en Loi\" 2ý(ý265o9) Subm»tted a report from. the Law Départ- 'Palement d'un compte de.$i2.5o, pour f rais de tnelit,,anent the payment of an account Of $12.5o due to du$ à M. J. J. Loniax, dans les causes de Ber- Mr., J. J. Loinax for fees as stenographer, in the cases of , devant le Recorder Weir, et déclarant ne -Bernadet \u0026 al., before Recorder Welr, and stating that ver le paiement de ce compte. they, cannot recomniend the payment of said account.. -de M le Commissaire gébert,'appuyée Par i On 1-notion of Coli-iiiiissioner Hébert, seconded by Cun- ýire Ainýy, il. est missioner Ainey, it was approuver ledit, rapport, et Z,*inforiner Son Resolved- That said report bc approved 6ind that His ýP1ýcorder'Weir, en conséquence. Honor Recorder Wer bc infoinied accordingly. souluis un rapport du Départe itted a report from the Law Départ- lhent en Loi, 3.-(24617) Subrn r,ýchauds installésýau Baiti Laviolette, par la nient, anent the heaters installed in-Laviolette Bath, by the Presto Heater Co. On de M. le Commissaire Aincy, appuyée par On motion of Commiss;oner Ainey, seconded hy Com- ;ýssýaire McDonald, il est inissioner McDonald, it was tecevoir ledit mpport Resolved: To receive said report. $=mis un rapport du Département en Loi, 4.-(26276) $ubmitted a report from the Law, Départ-. \"MQnt-Rdyal Spiniiing Co.\", a droit à l'ex- nient stating that the Matint Royal Spinning Co. is not Aem'e-t d'eý.taxe dé pour- la cons- held to, pa V the laying of a sewer in ,*u rex Of $1,511.25 fo 1 t darl,ý le quartier Saint-Paul, en vertu de St. Paul in virtue of die exernpVon sald. Company. a obtenu ýde la Ville Saint-Paul. has Qbtained from the Townof St.-Paul, M. le Commissaire Hébert, appuyée par On motion oi Commissioner ,Hèbertý seconded by Con: On=issaire Ainey, il est miffloner Ainey, it was rtcommander au Conseil de'donner ingtruc- Résolved. That a -report be made to ColuncÎt recom- 4 la Cité de rayer ledit montant des li- Meffdtng that insýtructions he euven 1 to the City _Tiý,easurer- to write off said. sùm. le Commissaire Hébert, appuyée. -On motion of ComM*ssiofticr dedl- b$ ssaire cUéý Li ek cSnrnîss1ýneir Côté, It *As rOuver fr; réqui itions suivantes Resolved: To approve the foilowille requil4dona on oüest) N Road (West Division) -NOeý 08 46, 47- 46,47- No Road",
         "BULLETIN MUNICIPAL DE MONTREAL 6C4 MUNICIPAL BULLETIN OF M: Voirie (Division Nord): Nos isq, i6o, 161, 162, 163, 164, Road (NOr6Éýh Division): Nos. i5g, 16o, 16l) 165, 1,66, r67,, 168, 169, 170. l65ý 16 167, 168, i6g, 170. Inspection du Lait etdes Fermes: Nos 4, 5. Milk and Farm Inspection: Nos. 4, 5. Marchés: NO 40. Markets: NO. 40. Aqueduc: Nos -89, 29o, 291, 292, 2293, -294, 295, 296, 298, 2W, Water: Nos. 289, 29o, 29,, 292, 293, 294e 291 300, 301, 302, 303, 3û4, 3()5, 3ýo6, 307, 308. 298, 29!), 300, 301, 302, 303, 304, 305, 3o6l 301, impressions et Papeterie. NOS 23, 24. Printing and Stationcry: Nos. 23, 24. Inspection des Bàtisses: NO 12. Building Inspection: No. 12. Bibliothèque Civique (Fouridation Co.) : No io69-ioý.. Cilvic Libra'ry (Foundation Co.): No. o6ý-ioJ--' -Pades (Ile SairiteýHélèiie) Nos 85, 86, 88, 89, 90, 92. , e\u0026 Parks (St. Helen's Island): Nos. 85, 86, 871, Parcs (Parc Mont-Royal) Nos 18, ig, 2o, 21. Parks- (Mount Royal Park): Nos. is, X9, 2ý0, Os 82, 85, 84, 86, 87. 87. Edifices Municipaux: N Municipal Buildings. Nos. 82, 85 84, 86, Hygiène et Statistique: No 9. Hygienc and Statistics: No. 9. Assistance Municipale: Nos 147, 148. Municipal Buildings: Nos. 147, 148- Maladies Contagieuses: No 44. Contagîous Diseases-, No. 44- Iîicendie S, No 97, 98, 99, Ioc, loi, 102. Fire: No 98,99, S. 97, loo, 101, l02. Police: Nos 69, 70,71, 72,73, 74. Police: Nos. 69, 7o, 7j, 72, 73, 74- Les minutes sont lues et approuvées. The minutes were read and confirmed. 6.-Le Burcati reprend l'étude de la question des tramways,. 6.-The Board resumed considération of tWý' et question and Sur, prfflsition de M. le Commissaire Côté, appuyée par On motion of Çommîssfoner Côté, secondie ýM. le Commissaire Hébert, il est missioner Hébert, it. was Résolu: Que l'étude de ladite question Soit remise à iner- Resolved: That considération of said queo, credi, le 5 mai prochain, à 3 hrs p.m. ferred until VTednesday,.ihe 5th Maîyy next, aait 7.-Sournise une.cofiimunicationdela Compagniedu Chemin 7-Submitted a communication from th G de Fer du Grand-Tronc, au sujet de l'application de la Coin- Rai Co., anent the application of th, pagnie du Chemin de Fer \"Lachine-jacques-Cartier-MaiÈon- que$ C tier, Maisonneuve Railway Co., foi, neuve\", pour approbation de profi Is de certaines rues, et pour the Profi!es of certain st.rects, and for perrrI4 permis de changer la direction de certaines ruelles. vert certain lanés. Sur proposition de M. le. Commissaire Côté, appuyée par On motion of. Commissiorier Côté, seconded\", M. te Commissaire Ainey, il est missioner Ainey, it was Résolu -, De référer à ]'Ingénieur en Charge du Trans- Resolved. That the same be referred to., port et au Département en Loi, pour rapport. in charge of Transportation and to the Laýý11 for a report. .\u0026-(2M56) Soumise une communication de la Commis- i\u0026-(26ý56) Submitted 4 communication firoie,' Sion des -Services Electriques, suggérant le choix d'un fonc- tr c Service Commission ' suggesting, the nanmie,111 tionnaire pour localiser les endroits où Fon ne s'est pas encore cial io locate the Places were the Municipal conformé au règlement municipal No 514, au sujet des fils 514, anent the. inside wires of various es intérieurs des divers établissements qui doivent 'être reliés which are to be connected with the ttndergràu aux conduits souterrains. bas not Yet been'complied with.' Sur proposition de M. le Commissaire Côté, apphyée par On motion of Comtniss\"oncr Côté, s M.-le. commissaire Ainey, il est missioner Ainey îit was, Résolu. De référer au Surintendant de. l'Eclairage, a a ame be referred t vec Resoleed; Th t the prière de suggérer un fonctionnaire pour cette fin, tendent of the Light Depar,7ntwith a M $,tlggeet the'fý4rnë of an offic al for that u\".fýý purp _0-ý(26707) SOUMÎs un rapport ýdu Député-Ingéniçur en 9-(26707) Sùbmitte4 a repcoert fromthe recommandant d'oýércr le virement d'une somme de recomMending that a sum of $i, 90D, u montant disponible du pavage de Faverfue Lincoln, froni the available amount mted for thepa'v\" et de 1 applIqtIer. , a âvage de l'aveput Plymouth. coin aveliueaiîd applied tô . the paviftg ûi,, avenue. sûr Propositie 4 le commissaire ýcôté, aýppuyèîê pal On motion of Cornlliiâs,*oner eecon M. lé cý0mn1iSSâ!re Ùé7ýrt, il est. ms , côté' i'sioneir J*bert, itzwas Résolu. De recommander au Conseil d'opérer ledit vire- Resolved: -bat a report be made tô C mending ihat saîd sum bc varied. Io,-(e6666)Sournise une communication de M. Raoul La- lo-ý(à6666) Submitted a communication d'autoriser le Bureau, des Dessinateus à Paoui'Lacroixi asking that the Dra htnien'§'K, ug '117er, 12r examen et vérification, à MM. R. Lacroixet W. be authorized to deliver w Messrs, R. Lacir E Bauýh«, les plans homologués du quartier, Merçîer-ý E. -Boucher the homologateà pl, no of. Meýcfé examination and veriÉcatfon.ý Str ýpe0pû*Jdcn de M. le Coffimissaire Côté, appuyée par On màtioff of Corümiss ioner Côtàý seton le CýmiiîJssaîre Hébert 1 - elt mistiotier liébert, it was kéË'ôtu: einformer Mý Lacroix que le Bureau ne ýpeut Resolved.. That Ur LacroýX be, f cette demande, BOard cannat gralit said request. is un rapport du Dépüté-Ingépiéur en oý\u003e Scumil Il.-(267,Q.9) Submîtted. a report frm fhe Chef, r«ýý e*nt le vote dun crédit de $1,100, pour coin- Engineer, r'ecoMmending that aftýepJ:É0PMtî pléter 1e3ý 1ýýord=ent,. des égouts àux 'rues Prud'homme, hé voted to complete the qewer corînectionS 'Guy et veadôme, afin de mettre la, ne. Sherbrooke én::état me, (;1ýY and Vendôme streets, in order to Put\", d'être %a Êtreet in a condition to be paved\u003e Sur le commissaire:.at lippuy4e, pu: . 1 911 inmivn of Commissioner mé, gcç Co ils ze -,H4b,-rt, il est Hél\u003eett, it wa» Résolu': De rerorlnmander au ccè$ýài lý vote . de:,1aditeý Resàlved- Týat a report be Mido to sormiie pour rexécuum.) desd.liu.:trivnux à: la mending that sald gum be voted 1,\u003er tbe c day- abor.",
         "MUXICIPAL DE MONTREAL tj05 MUNICIPAL BULLETIN Of- MONTREAL Soumis un rapport du Député-Ingénieur en 12-(25469) Submitted a report froin the Deputy Chief oftileandant de prendre les balances disponibles de Eugineer ý recommending that the available balances of Pour la construction d'égouts sur certaines rues, ap ropriatons voted for the laying of sewers in certain le gomme totale de $46,o28.99, et de les appliquer ce unting to the total sum of $46,oý8.99, bc var:ed lesýrOmPtcS d'égouts dépaýssés sur certaines rues, tel and ied to overdrawn accounts to pay the amounts ées audit rapport. _.P,,ldd the appropriatýons voted 'dans les listes annex app'i in excess of or the laying of sewers in certain streets, as shown in the l'sts annexed to said report. Ùsition de M. le Commissaire Côté, appuyée par On motion of Cominissioner Côté, seconded by Coin- saaire Hébert, il est missioner Hébert, it was 1)' recommander au Conseil d'opérer le vire- Resolved: That a report bc made to (-ouncil, recoin- mending that said sum bc varied. Soumis lin rapport (lu Député-Ingénizur en 13.-(25648) Submitted a report from the Deputy Chief à une interpellation de l'échevin Létourneau, Eng»neer, in reply to a question put by Ald. Létourneau, es inondations dans la partie sud-ouest du quar- concerning the f!oodings ýn the south-west part of St. erui. Henry Ward. c'ý't'on de M. le Commissaire Côté, appuyée par On motion of Commissioner Côté, seconded bv Coiri- ssalre Hébert, il est missioner Hébert, it was t e transmettre ledit rapport au Conseil, en ré- Resolved: Tbat sa.id report bc transmitted to Council\u003e .12 interpellation, in reply to sa'd questi . on. Ile Une résolution du Conseil, à l'effet de retour- 14.-(25728) Submtted a resolution of Council, referr- reail des CoMmissaires, pour détails supplémeiitai- ing back to the Board of Commissioners, for.further de- 'Yrt dudit Bureau, au sujet de la cession de l'ave- tails, a report from said Board arient the cession Of Ox- de M. le Commissai re Hébert, appuyée par ford avenue. On motion of Commissýoner Hébert, seconded by Com- saire (ýôté, il est missioner Côté, it was référer au Département en Loi, et au Député- Resolved: That the saine bc referred to the Law De- Chýf, Pour rapport. partment and to the Deputy Chief Eng\".neer for a report. Soumise une résolution du Conseil, à l'effet . 15.-( 6154) Subrn ted a résolution of Couricil, reject- raPPOrt du Bureau des Commissaires, recoin- ing a report from the Board of Commissioners, recom- er.un arrêt de tramways, rue Notre-Dame mendiniz that a carstop on Notre Dame street East bc changed. \"tiOn de M. le Commissaire Côté, appuyée par On motion of Commissioner Côté, secwded by Com- \"àýjte Hébert, il est missioner Hébert, it was \"\"r)e'transmettre copie de ladite résolution au ré- Resolved: That a copy of said resolution bc transmittý JÏ 13. A. Gougeon. ed te, the petWoner, Mr. J. B. A. Gougeon. .soumise une résolution du Conseil, à l'effet 16-(260 14) Submitted a résolution of Couricil, rei lect. ýaPPô'rt du Bureau des Commissaires, recom- ing a report frorn the Board of Comrnissioncrs, recOTn- $2o4, pour la reconstruction d'un trottoir, mend:n,,ý that a sum Of $2Q4 bc voted for the recdnstruc- tion of a'sidewalk on Roberval Street. le,41it , rapport a été rejeté par le Conseil, As said report was rejected by Couneil, 'tÎOn dé M le Commissaire Côté, appuyée par On motion of CGmmiýsîoner Côté, seconded by Com- 1'saire Hébe«rt, il est missioner Hébert, ft was e référer de nouveau la question au Départe- Resolved, That the-question bc again referred to the pour rapport. Law De,)artment for a report. saire Hébertz laisse son siège. Comm-ssioner Hébert left his scat. 5) Sý01Jmis un rapport du Député-Ingénieur en 17.:-(26oýî5) Submitted a report frorn the Deputy Chief 'le à une question du Conseil, en date du 12 Fngýneer, in reply te, a resolution of Council, adopted on au Sujet de l'ouverture de la: rue Hutchigon. the i2th Apri.1 instant, arient the opening of Hutchison- de M. le Commissaire Côté, appuyée par street. On motion of Cominissioner Côté, seconded by Coin- !ýSýuré Ainey, il est raissioiner Ait-ey, it was lDcý ýransmettre ledit rapport' au Conseil. Resolved: That sa'd report bc transinitted to Couricil. 8ýauiýis le dossier au sujet de l'arrangement 18.-(24470) Subrn;tted the documents concerning the le Protestant Hospital fc;r the Insane, en rap- Proposed deed of agreement with the Protestant Hospi- rient de l'aqueduc. tel for the Insane, in connection wýth the widening of the Aqueduct. M. lé Commissaire- Côté, appuyée par On motion of Coinmissioner Côté, econded by COMý ney, il est missioner Ainey, it was une cession . des terr Î_ s suivants dudit Resolved: To accept the cession of the fo!lowing Picces of l9nd, from sad hospital i de terrain de formeý 1 irrégulière, dans la i' A strip of land of irregulai form situated in ýthe faisant partie du lot No e83 des plàn et Town of Verdun, forming.part of lot No. 4683 of the,ûfý officiels de la Paroisse de Mmtréal,. d'une fic:al plan-and book of référence fokr the parish-of Mon- Ped'ý cinq Pouces, dans la ligne nord-aiuest, treal,,xnéasuii.ng 810\" 5\"1 widee cm the riorth-west lýýe, effil eensý la ligne sud-est, parun rofondeur de 8o2\"on.the south-eaÈt fine b 135' deep on the South-West sud-ouest et 121 piedJe? dans la ligne I:ne, and jol, 81e optre area of pieds carrés; borne ) Squaré fett;,'l\u003eoundcd en the north-west hy the, -de 95,28 ée au %,2\u0026 pancieillié ligne dela p '61 de VAqueduc fô.rfnér fine, of theprdperty of the Aqueduct of MolAçéal; sud t par le résidu du lot 1 n the s uth-ast by the residuc of lot No. 4«,3ý1- \"ou the, roprk é46,,, au nord- 0, Xe _-t . , sud-ouest par la 0 _t:he,ýQuth-we3t bYt#1ýt o W , P-%Ttse 'Ci-après M)t-th-tast bY lot No. 468:2 and en '4685; pArt Of lot NOý 4685 hercafter destriW, de terrain de forràr liýégulière, dans la A striv of 1and of ý irtegülat, fàrft1ý skuatg4,, in Ahe, Wsant partie du lot NO 46Sý- desditg Plan Town of Vcrçluïi, forming eýj of r«i-ag 770' mesutànt ci ' latîctlr'77Ô Pieds dans ficial PL=ý 'atfd bý»k, of i,121e*llct' O\"t\" et ýu pieds clans la li e Sud-eSt, Pàf ID lenath on thC 'jj*rjhýWeet '1irirý 3rid 7« eil the",
         "BULLETIN MUNICIPAL DEMONTREAL 606 MUNICIPAL BULLETIN OF une profondeur de 135 Pieds da\"s la ligne nord-est, et go south-east, line, bY 135' in depth on hIlld;, Pieds 4\" dans la ligne sud--ouest, et une superfhýic'de 8Ià83 line, and 90' 4\" on ýthe south-west line, an pieds carres;.bornée au rord-oilest par l'ancienne ligne de la area of 81,583 square feet; bounded on propriété de l'Aqueduc de Montréal, au ýuid-cst par une autre by the former line of the property of the A partic du lot NO 4685, au ilord-tst par la parti.2, vôisineci- Montreal; onthe south-eastby another part dessus décrite du lot NO 4683 et au sud-ouest par le lot No 4685; on the north-east by the adjoining part 4686; crýbcd of lot No- 4683, and on the south-west,\" 4686; Une Jisièrcý de terrain de forme irrégulire, dans la ý3' A strip of -land of irregular forni, Ville de Verdun, faisant partie du lOtNO 4684_desdits Plan Town of Verdun, forming part of lot .15 ct livre de renvoi officiels, mesurant en largeur 545 Pieds 6\" p'an and book of reference, measurin 5 5' 6' dàns la ligne nord-ouest, et dans la ligne sud-est, et une on the north-west l'ne-and and on thé u - 'ý superficie de 23,614 pieds carrés; bornWau sud-est par l'an- having a superficýý«al area of 2,3,614 square.fcgl-'. cienne ligne de la propriété de l'Aqueduc de Montréal, au 'on the south-east by the former llne of thec nord-ouest par le résidu du lot No 4684, au nord-est par le the Aqueduct of Montreal; on the north-wes-t,' lot NO 4682, et au sud-est par.la partit voisine ci-après dé- due Of lot NO. 4692,. and on the south-èast by, crite du lot NO 4685. Ing part of lot Nd- 4685 hercafter described. j Une lisière de terrain de forimý irrégulière, dans la strip of land of irregular foým, situ Ville de Verdun, faisant paýtie dudit lot No 4685 desdits plan Town cf Verdun, forming part of said lot Jý1'ý et livre de renvoi officiels, mesurant en largeur 523 pieds said official plan and book of référence, rneg$ dans la ligne nord-ouest et dans la ligne sud-ouest par une feet in width on the north-west line and or, profondeur de 40 pieds et 2 pouces dans la ligne nord-est, et west1ýne, by 4o' 2\" in depth on the northýea 63 pieds et 4 pouces dans la ligne sud-ouest et une superficW 63' 4\" On the southýwcst 1 ne, and li-aving an al de 265115 pieds carrés; bornée au sud-est Par l'ancienne ligne square fect-, bounded on. the south-east by -de la prâpriétë de l'Aqueduc de Montréal aunord-ouest par line of the property of the Aqueduct of Mon le résidu dudit lot NO 4685, au nord-est liar laý.partie voisine notth-west by the residue of sa\".d lot 'No, - ei-dessus décrite du lot No 4684 et au sud-ouest parle lot north-cast by the adjoin'ng part above desct, NO 4686, NO- 4,684, and on the south-west by lot NO-1 aux conditions suivantes: folJowýi1g. conditions: i' Tant qu'une partie quelconque de la proprîété 'dont i' That so long as any portion of the pro font partie lesditcs lisières de terrain servira à des fins d'hô- of the said strips of land forni pet, ig 119ed pital, la - Cité ,ýoiiýinucra à f oui-nir et 'à maintenir la prise purposes, thé City will cOntýnue to suPpIy d'eau potable ainsi que la Prise d'eau. pour ýprotcctjon contre. the water intake for drinking purposes and'a l'incendie, telles -qu'actuellement fournibs à l'hôpital; intake for fire purposes, as riow supplied te t .2'ý - En ce qui, concerne l'approvisionnement «eau actuel- Z' That as regards the. existing w . ater 'su de l'hôpital, tous les raccordements de tuyaux et de soupapce hospitâf, all connections to pipes and val ' - qui seront dérangés au, cours de$ travaux 'que là- Cité exécute the works tow being carried on by the Ci -actuellement, seront faits par cette dernière à ses frais et dé- by the latter at its, own expense; pens; ty 3' La soupape sur la conduite de 14 Pouces communiquant 30 That thé valve on the fourieen incli avec l'aqueduc, sera placée sur la propriété de YhôPital aux Aqueducî bc placed on the property of théh irais-de là Cité; expense of the City; 4 0 La Cité construite un regard (manhole) auýdessus de 40 That, the City shall construct a wa4hi 1 la soupape reliant 'actuellement le tuyau de l'hôpital avec. la valve now connectýng the Hospital ma\"n.id f, Conduite, et les autorités de, Yhôpital auront libre accès audit 'and that the hospital shall have free acce5s, regard en, tout temps; manbole at all tÎmes; 5 Commeil sera nécessaire pour la Cité, au coùrgde ces 5ý\u003e That as it Will bc necessaryfor the présentes opérations, de supprimer le raccordement âctuél deý ing on its présent operations, to remove the l'hôpital avec la conduite, la Cité pourvoirjý 1'lxiepitnl d'un ilect'on of the hospItal wîth the conduit, raccordemeili temporaire avec la conduite, de manière à don- provide the hospitaU, fre' -nee à l'hôpital, gratuitement, un approvisionnement d'eau ply e ofcharge, an unit, ,ininterrompu pour toutes fins pendant le cours de ces opéra- of.water for all purposes during thepr, operaticýns; (i* La Cité construira et maintiendra au-dessus dé 1,44ue- 6' That tbc City- shall trect and- inaintal 'due un pont Mn=e#ý4n acier ou én' béton arMé- de'pas Aqueduct a permanent steel or reinforced 'z moinà-ýde 14 Pieds gýpport,ýr ubt, char- of., et lesg.thaii fourteert feet of roadway*and ,,ý ge- en niouvenizut de4co liVreý5 par pied carré, a moving load of not less than one df, des barrières de ferme devant être établie§ et devant être sous square foot, farm gýtés te bc p , ovided af14ý,11, le 'Contrôle des autorités de l'hôpital; the contre' of the hospital; La Cité maintiendra ut, pont, temporaire suffisant pour 7ý_ That un.til completion of the dciiiier aux autorités de l'hÔpital un moyen de communicar carried 1 on by the City m connection with tfi' tion, avec -leifr propriété- des deux côtés de-, l'aqueduc,, jusqu'à' d until thé efection:of the permanent bf' 'Ce que lés-tiavlÎik qut'la Cité exécute actuéfiement 6 r pport. an a in ïhé foregoinà clawe hereof, tht City Wi Paqu et que le pont ýermanent avec educ aient été terminés tehi 'OrÉLry bridge t.0 provide eo tnenlkiiné . dans la elà uk précéde , nfe ait ëté con struit; p the hospital te its property on both s'des duct; 8'la riiý' le ; corivel nt le chemin . privé, de, 8 Thàt the, City shall. properly, gradeý thZnýiW conduisant. au pont, des deux côtés de l'àqùeduc, sur, ofýýthc hogPitai lead-'ng te thé b'idge on b la l*te:ýuf- du chemin àc.twI, tel qu'actuelkmerit tracèj du côté Aquediict 4 the width of the pr L eýcnt roep' le.chemin devant être étayé par un inur' rlôsed, un thé soiith-east àid. of the Aque de Soef côtés d'ic-cibi. Cette dlaù-! to bc retai tn.:bkoùtj des deux ned in'place bj, à.conërete rrtaiýh' ëe \"ýa1i49t- ffim:went aux abord$:. du Polit tempôrairé et, oth 9 t§ ificreof. This clause applies to du P\u003cm péîý t 1y to the femporary brIdge as well as )ridge; qý L'a Cité c67tlttim 12t' Màiýtiendra a perpétuité, des 9' Týat *ë, City. gÉall, ýui1d and tures Permancýt',ýL ef de moins de 6 pieds, hauteur -ras de manent iron fencc,ýi of not less thali six *e entre la Pronriété cé44é fnýr les prt'Seilteig à la Cité çt la pro-, wcen tËý property hereby tedcd to the priété de l'hôpital. k- long aeâ lignes de diý,i,5ioil entre ictiles, Perty of the Hospital, along the Unes ý of', et des clôtures en fer des deux eàt,4g ýkadjts abor(ls nivelée, theý s4mè, 'and iron, ferces on, both, $ides eonte. lodites clôturé$ et ici pialle Élicel. id Ion éd, apProatheste the the \u0026aï ço",
         "TX'MUNICIPAL DE MONTREAL 607 MUNICIPAL BULLETIN OF MONTREAL atne to bc submitted to the Board être soumis au Conseil de direction de l'hôpital tial and plans of the s À --approbabtion avant qu'elles soient érigées; of Management of the Hospitcýl, for their approval bc- fore crection; te la terre excavée sur ladite propriété cédée par io' That all earth excavated cri the saýd property pre- Mes par le, autorités de l'hôpital à la Cité, et lion sently ceded by the Hospital to the City, and not requir- \"'.les fins des entreprises de la Cité, appartiendra ed for the purposes of the undertakings ofthe City, will à[;.. Il be' \u003eng to the Hospital; Une Partie du coîtt d'aucune propriété qui a déjà 1ý- That no portion of the cost of any property 1= ci-après ex ropriée par la Cité pour l'aqueduc dy h cafter expropriated by the City for the Aque- acr ni aucune partie (les autres dépenses encou- ý.ct and Boulevards, nor any part of.the costs otherwise 't pour la construction de l'aqueluc Iou des incurred by the City in the construct-on of the-Aqtieduct de la conduite, lie sera prélevée sur la propriété or the Boulevards, or the conduit, shall be levied on the comprend les lots Nos 4683, 4684 et 4685 prc;perty of the Hospital, being lots four thotisand six de renvoi officiels, ou sur aucune partie huiidred and cigthy-three (4683), four thousand s huli- ý0.Pr1etè, tarit que celle-ci servira à des fins d'hô- dred and eýghty-four (4684) and, four thousand sýx hundred and eigthy-five (4685) of the said official plan and book ofýreference or any portion thereof, as long as the said pràperty is used for hospital purposes; s les travaux que fera la Cité en vertu d2s droits 12' That all work's to bc donc by the C*ty by reason 1t, p ar les présentes conférés devront être exécutés of the rights hereby granted to the latter, shall bc per- et suivant les règles de l'art, la Cité s'engageant formed expeditiously and in a good worklnanlýke inaiiner, 'î ntzs à voir à ce qu'aucun dommage et aucun in- the C.ity hereby undertaking that no dAniage nor uinieces- lie soient causés à l'Hôpital; sary inconvenience shall be caused to or suffered by the Hospital; 'Pýë devra obtenir, à ses frais du gouvernement 13 . That the City shall obtain, at its owil expense, Québec, inaiii-levée de sýli hypothèque gre- main levec from the Government of the Province of Que- \"été vendue par les présentes. bec of its hypothec affecting the property hcreby.soýd. SUPPORTANT LES FILS ELECTRIQUES, ETC ELECTRlC POLES, ETC. ;sera nécessaire pour la Cité à cLuý;e des tra- Inasrnuch as it will he necessary for the City, by reason de Paqueduc, d'el-i1ýver les poteaux of its work in the enlargernent of the Aqueduct, to re- 'fils électriques qui sont actuellement sur sa MoIlle the electric poles now 011 its property'. the Hospital Zutorités de l'hôpital consentent, par les pre- hereby consents that electric poles be placed by the City que des poteaux soient placés -par la Cité sur la on the adio-n--ng property of the Hospital at approximate- aeente de i'flopitai, à à peu près aux endroits in- Iv the po-nts indicated in, red ink on the said, blue pr-nt ý e rouge sur iedit pian (blue print) 1 en dace du plan dated on the twenty-seventh day of August last, ýtr 0914) ci-annexé; il est cependant colivcpu (1914) hereto annèxed; it being however agreed that only iýý bois seulcincrit seront çmployés et placés wooden poles shall be used and placed on the property de l'hÔpital; et les autorités de 1116pitai con- of the Hosp.tal; and the Hospital morcover conserits that à ce que -le bureau de l'ingénient de la Cité, the Office of the City, Engineer now temporarily on the Meut. temporairement sur la, propriété de 116- t y of the Hospital be placed by the City at' such Pàr là Uté à Ceiidroi ý.Iooîptellil th, Hospital\u003e may. ind-cate on, the prôperty of the it que les autorités de 17ý)Jlt sur la propriété, de l'hôpital, située au HosptaI Iying tà the soùthýéast of the strips of land res . de terrain ci-dessus cédées à la Cité; mais hereinbefore cedtd to the City; but this consent by the 1 de la part des autorités de l'hôpital à ce que 14ospitaI te, ýthe placing of the said poles and of the said et ledit bureau soient placés sur la propriété office on its property is thus gratited upon condition that ,ainsi accordé à la. condition que la Uité s'en- the City will and the latter undertakes to rernove the said eng, é3ge par les présentes, à enlever lesdits po- po'és and the sad office from the property of the A os- 1ureau de la propriété de l'hôpital sous deux pital withiri two years from date hercof, the City hereby des présentes, \"et il est convenu entre les par- consent'ng and agreeing that in the event of.the City fail- ýk cas oà la Cité négligerait d'enlever lesdits ing to remove the said pole-, and the said office or aliy of lçiu'un d'eux ou ledit bureau à l'ex 'ration therri at the expiration of the sa'd term of two years, the 'ulis,'fes autorités de l'hôpital aàiront Île droit Hospital w'll have the rýght to 'remove the saine, at the àux frais de la Cité sans qu'il soit nécessaire expense of the City, without any légal proceedings beilig unes . d. The City undertakes and shall bc bound te, hold, procédures judiciaires;_ i equire t'124e ne' et s'engage à protégerles autorités de protect and keep harinless the Hospital- froni any and, ail ý'ýUTi1ntir et 'à les tenir indemnes de toutos ré- claims that maýr at aily time'arise ow:iig to the presence. 'D»'Arront être faites à cause de la présence of the sa.'d poles on the property of the Hospital in such la -proprié - té'dé l'hôpital de manîète nianner that the Hospital will be in no ýÀr;iy troubled by ullement inquiétées à raison àe la of the perm'ss'on or rights hereby granted to the par.les présentes accordés à la Cite; City. de' l'h6pital consentent aussi à ce que la.Cité The. Hospital 4ioreover cansents that the City riiay 012 nord du . ponceau dans ga Position actueile iliaintain the norih inlet to the Culverf at Îts Pre\"nt PO- de 111.ôpital, soit à environ io pieds au nord- s* tion on the property of the Hospital, being about teil 'zordýouest dés lisières de tcrrail, en 3èllle fect to the north-west of the north-west line. of the strips itrs dans les - Présentes, et à ce que là Cité of land'thirdly and fourthly hercinbefore described, and. fossés de drainage ahoutissant audit ponceau, that the City niay construct drainage ditches legd\"119 ý,.tJ 'de l'hÔPIîtal -et maintienne- lesdits fossés jus.. said Culvert on the prorrty of the 146spital and main- -égouts pr0jýtis aient été construits.et que Ic fainýthr said ditches unt, the proposed sewers are Plu5; mais il est convenu entre 1--s partieý; ed and the Culvert îs no longer u5edý c11lèntý la Cité cessera de se servir de ladîte:' and the C ty undertakes that in ân event gt will ceaise et de5ýdits f ssée ýet les comblera et remet- usiug the sa d i:m!et and ditches ani wili fill uý the saine 4hut tionditiiDu within Iwo, ýon état. Primitif sous deux ans de la date 'and iribst«,e the land to lis Ot49- years ýrom. the date h\"eof. 'a cýpir Tht Citv will Pý of ffi7ýi e ts nd oi '4 -'le coût du, ptéÉent contrat -et dune . ýy ail ý Costa e p r\" élà 1 1 .. .. , 1 1 cGpY . f ýYr thé 1 Moqýîtà1. 'lè,cout Probable, d'a à And whercas the probable cOstý atC-l t ýO th e fenim and font il' est question ci- matee of the EngXriec II 1M,2ý)0 Et qeil:ý:se néce«Iaire de mentioned, is X1ecý toi ci tQ - t Othe- 'ce pbnt et dé ceffitruire eussi d'auttt« iw*aý4ç§ w \u0026ýich lyeidge",
         "BULLETIN MUNICIPAL DE MONTREAL Ss MUNICIPAL BULLETIN OF Mo ponts avec approches, traverses de fermcs, etc,, de recom- bridges with approaches, farm c-rossings, etc., mander au Conseil de mettre à la disposition du Bureau des port bc made to Council , recommending th2to Commissaires une somme de $5oooo pour ces fins, ladite soin- $5oooo be placed at the disposal of the Board. Me devant être imputés sur l'emprunt spécial autorisé par le sioners for said purposes, said sum to, be char Règlement No s56. the special loan authorized by 13y-law No. 55 ig.-Sur proposition de M. le Commissaire Côté, appuýée 19.-On 'motion of Commiss'oner CÔtée par M le Commissaire Ainey, il est Commissioner Ainey, it was Résolu: Que la séance soit ajournée au 28 du courant,-à Resolved That the meeting b'e adjourned ii heures a.m. 28th instant,.at ii o'clock a.m. J L. N. SENECAL, L N, Secrétaire. Compte rendu de l'assemblée du 28 avril igi5, a.m. Report of mect;ng he'ýd on the 28th Aprà Son Honneur le, Maire, Président; MM. les Commissaires Présent His Worship the Mayor in the Hébert, Ainey. an Ainey, Coirimissioners. i.---Soutnis des mandats, vérifiés par le Contrôletr et Au- J.-Submitted warrants, verified by the C diteuý de là Cité, au monta-nt total tic $T9,ô22.19, suivant liete ler and Auditor, aggregating the suin of $z certifiée. l*st certified. Sur proposition de M. le Commissaire Hébert, appuyéé par On motionof Commissioner Hébert, second. M. le Commissaire Ainey, il est missioner Ain ' ey, it was Résolu: D'en autoriser le paiement. Resoived: To authorize the payment the'r .2-Soumis un projet d'annonces ýüur la demande de sou- 2.-Submltted a draft of advertisernt missions, pour la construction du bain du quàrtier Saitit-Lau- ders for the crection of the bath in St. e. Sur proposidon de M. le Commissaire Hébert, appuyée, par On inot'on of Commissioner Hébert, second M. le Commissaire Ainey, il est missioner A-iney, it was Résolu; IYapprouver lesdites annonces, et d'en autoriser Resolved: TO approve of saià adv'rtisei1î la publication, àuthorizetÉe Publication therzof. 1-(26704) Soumise 'une communication de M.' N. Eý 3,-(:26704) Submitted a communication frQLn,ý Brais, offrant de vendre un terrain à la Ville, pour l'érec- Brais, affering to sell to the City a plece ofl tion d'une caserne de pompiers, erection Of a fire station, Sur tion-de M le Commissaire Hébert, appuyée par 0M motion. of Comniissioner Hébert, second IL le, Folposlissaire. Ainey, il est rnissioner Ainey, it was Résolu,. D'informer M. Brais que la Ville n'a pas Vinten- Resolved., That Mt. Brals bc informed- tion d'acheter de terrain, pour cette fin, cette année. the intention of the City te purchase afty rpoft this year. 4--(26715) Soumis un rapport , du Surinten4àm des 4--(26715) SýubrPittcd a report from the Achats et des Vente, recommandant là remise d'un dépôt-de,- and Sales Agent, recommending that the $Soo, à. la.z \"Canada Iron Corporation Litnited\", en rapport Corporation, Lirnitéd, bc refu4ded a dépo,^,it, aveçý le contrat pour la fourniture de regarde d'égouts durant iii connection with their contract for the su la saison 19I4ý19i5- manholes durin' the scasôn Of 1914-Ï195. Sur Etopositi0t)ýdc X le Commissaire Hébert, apijuyýée'par On motion 01 CCtnnlissioner Hébert, seccoil Ainèy, il est missioner Ainey, h was ký remise dudit d4êt Reeolved.. -To àUthotizc, the refund of sa\"', , S-S«L1niiftý une c-oi-fitntmication de MMýý X 14, Mîrîer.ý ç_OMmunic4týon f roui. es$ËL' Company Limited, eu sujet de, leut,-soufxi\"îbft: t1erý o., Lid., anent.their. tender fer the iàOtF\" niture.-de sable. Sur proposition dé M le Commissaire H.é'bert, appuyée par On mot'on of comf)aissioner Hébýért, $te n\", M. le Commissaire'Ainey, il est saioner. Almey,'it Waîý Résolu: De' référer au Surintendant des Achats. et des Res6lv,édý That the samî bereférred to Ventes. and SalesAgent. 6--(26210) Soumis un rapport de rArchitecte de la Ville, (h---(à629c,) Submitted fram'. terommandant de permettre à la \"Q M. Chandlox. Garage and rëcommendin that xfor. co,, Ltdý,,, d'occuper le lot No.cad. 12, subd. 35ý36, Co.. Ltd, 9 the G. M. Chandl r Go quanier-Duvern4,y,. NO 419, Ra0el-Est, pour insffli bc allowed 1.0 occup-V Cad. lot Neý , et un »ý Dtivernay Ward, No réservoir suterrain, pour y recevoir, emmaeasinet et vendre there 4rP'Rachel Fast fÇ de la gasoline, 011, an utidergrouiid, tank for the storaCý s»T'PrOP08ition dé M. le Commissaire Ainey, appuy 1 ée' Par à0n Moýýn.of Commissioner A M. le CbsÛrÙssairè Hébert. il est izey, l'aùtoris . , . 1 . Wîâsioner 11ébert ît was, ation demandée. - , 'a 1zesolVtd,ý Tô ýrant the: 71-(2aîgs), ý soumis un rapport du Surintendant des Marý ch4, l'ac'hat de trois fottaines-abýé cir 1 - e--ý266ý3) Submitte\u003ed ik report frýorn týe su UV S'. qf Markets, recommending that thret drihk* pour le 'Uïrdtë Bonsecours. bc-PlirchUed'for Bonsecoürsý Market Sur prôPý*ieon de Mý le on motion Ain M. le commi \"Ite ýHébert, il tse ti ûfasionex Hébert, it *ai, késolu - Eý ppyrt. à eh autatir, p6tir sa- Resolýed That said report be réferred ..'Voir S'il R des fSlU di4ýonfW r su1perintenýënt of Markets, in or4er to knewý,, purpaýe.",
         ". riN MUNICIPAL DE MONTREAL MUNICIPAL BULLETIN OF MONTREAL ihi5l un rapport du Surintendant du Pare Mont- 8 .-Submitted a report from the Superintendent of n'mandant le vote d'un crédit de- $goo, pour entre- Mount Royal Park, recommending that an appropriation al du Parc Mont-Royal. of $goo be voted for the general maintenance of Mount Royal -Park. lition de M le Commissaire Ainey, appuyée par On motion of Commissiotier Ainey, seconded by Corn- miisaire Hébe*rt, il est missioner Hébert, it was De' tecommander au Conseil le vote de ladite Resolved: That a report be made to Council, recom- ý.ltS fins ci-dessus. mending that said suin be voted for the above purpose. Soumis un rapport de l'Architeçte de l'a Ville, 9.-(26705) Submitted a report froin the City Architect, 'u týde faire approuver par le Conseil un bâtiment recommending that the plan of a buliding which the Ca- iý1n United Theaters Limited\" se- propose d'é- nadian United Theaters, Limited, intends to erect on Cad. t No cad. ii, quartier St-Geories, rue des Con- lot Noi iI, St. George Ward, Councillors street, for the r emmagasina e de décors de théâtres. storage of scenery, bc approved hy the Council. itiOn de M. le Commissaire Ainey, appuyée par On motion of Commissioner Ainey, seconded by Com- iýsaire Hébert, il est raissioner Hébert, it was lya'»Touver ledit rapport, et de faire rapport au Resolved: Ta concur in said report and tc, report ta 'conséquence, Council accordingly. ýumis un rapport de l'Architecte de la Ville, jo.-(26478) Submitted a report froiri the City ýrchi- Ytýc=ander de permettre à M. Victorien tect, stating that he caainot recommend that permission eýý*ëcrW sur la ligne projetée du Bou- bc granted ta Mr. Victorien Aubry to open a wood yard à rest du 21ýî i\u003eapineati, on the proposed line of St. joseph Boulevard, east of Pa7 pineau Road. Le CcmwiS5ýaire AtÈý1Y, 1qýpujée par On molion of Commissioner Ainey, seconded by Cam- missioner Hébtrt, it was wr.le req To concur in said report and ta inforin apý- accc rdingly. ýüw. Kpport de l'Architecte de la 'Ville, IL-(2442-5) Subrnitted a report from, the City Archi- 4W travaux aux chamWi de toilette du tect, anent the p«ýgr.ess of works at the lavatorles of Bonsecours, Market. eKh Commimmirc, AineYý amneée par, On motiort, of Coinnüeàieaer Ainey,, ucoriéed - by Com- il niissioner Hébert, it- w -rnrý-roir, ledit rapport. « Resrolved: That said report bc received. i, $qttmieuiý' ra\"Qrt du, . Chef du Département- i2.-(267ocy Submitted- \u0026 report fr 'the Chief of the ', recémtaàpdut de - pernwüre à. MM. john Fire.ýDepwtTnent, rLscommending that Messrs. John Quin- Ae Teýýr; téÏnMairernmt- la c1ôtureý en.'bois; lan - Ca. be allowed- ter movie baclr tetnporarily the wood- eli arrière dit poec N*_25, rùeDrvm=fflçlý en fence in rear of Ne., 25 . Stlition, Drummond Street,' fti-enb-eprerwurs sote'à bâtir tmlýeraw., which. separates the yard of said station from the lot 1 upon, which said contractors are building à garage- _q1à ý; : Owaietiôh of Commissioner Alincyl seconded by Coin- on de M le Commissaire- Ahiey-, apM Wpo re H\u0026rt, il est nii3siehýét Hébert, It was torisation deman Resolved: That the authorization sought for bc grant- -arder l'au dée, sous la sur- ýl\"ý,rc@hitccte de'la Ville. cd, un'der the Super-;àon of the City Architect. ni,ýsaÎre Côt prend son siège. Commissiener Côté took his Scat. un 'rapport diV Chef du Département des Iný i3.-Subffiîtted a report from. the Chief of the Fire De- andarit de faire réparer la moulure en brique partinent, recommending that the brick moulding decorat- Inuril du rez-de-chaussée du poste de Bordeaux., i . ng the walls of the ground-floor of Bordeaux Station bc repaired. on dl. M. le Commissaire Aîney, appuyée par Ort motion of Commissi oner Ainey, seconded by Corn, irë Hébert, il est ffiissioner Hébert, it was ý1a0P0uver :ladite recommandation, Resolved7 To concur in said report. Suumis un rapport de l'Ingénieur en Charge 14--(26737) Submitted a report from the Engineer in \u003e -recommandant le paiement de deux comptes de charge of Transportation, recommending that two ac- Ae Fer du Grand-Tronc, au mon- counts from. the Grand Trunk Railway Co., amounting $22,64, représentant-la art de la respectively ta $232.Gý3 and $22i64, representing the Citys retien et de l'opération dels ba-rriè- share of the cost of maititaining and operating gates, cor- Rveime Atwater et de la me Rose de Lima, ner of Atwater avenue and Rose de Urna street, and on t-Ftrdinand. St. Ferdinand street, bc paid. Qý de M. le Commissaire Côte, appuyée par On motion of Cornmissioner Côté, seconded by Com, rt HélXit il est afissîouer Hébert. it was paiernentý . deodite comptes. Resolved: Ta authorize thé payment of said accounts. ý4ife Hébert laibse son siège, Commissioner Hébert left his àeàt. ýSou1nise une communioation, de la Comfnis- 15.-(26wi Submitted a communication from the Rat sujet des réparations à faire ait mur de re- -bor. Uoerd, apent the repairs ta 'bc. made to the trYetinént Wall. -de 144 le commissaire Côté, appuyée par ork ýmûdoti of coMmiesiôner, Côté, s-ecônded by çôw. eire Aitýey\u003e il est misgioner Aincy, It was ,'Êéfëter à IIngénieur-Surintèndant-suppléant Ètsolved- That' Wd rommunicahoft be the des rý-gdute,, peur, attentiôh, immédiate, Acting - Superintendàig 'Engiacer. ý of ihe Sewers Depart- aiýe Hébért. reprend son sîègeý Hébett resumed Èis Sezt. Hohtieur le Ma i6ý-ý-At the àuggestion of Hia W-orahip, thtý MàýYeri, kt was le C=niivnire Réhet àà 'eqolvedý, That Comtri\"ugmr )q6bet be MWited ir6 ,ýe»trer en pourparkrs, ýaYee lei fi=clerl\u0026- 1ýew-York, t-p mi fer withý fh* Attweig\", flitaxe«g *Ith, a cd ýJY 'e de 1',fixiesion ý de, 11\u003cmprunt de $6ýioo;wo vieW, of issuftýg the -l\"n M Conuil, en dàte du le avri4,,ý915 8o1ýutÎon of April",
         "BULLETIN MUNICIPAL DE MONTREAL 610 MUNICIPAL BULLETIN OF M. le Commissaire McDonald prend son siège. Commissioner McDoliald took his scat. 17.-Sur proposition de M. le Commissaire Ainey, appuyée 17.-(:)n motion of Commissioner Ainey, par M. le Coninlissaire McDonald, il est Commissioner Mct)onald,, ii was Résolu: Que la SéauCe Soit ajOUFIléC au 29 du COUrant, à Resolved: That the meeting bc adiotirne.d.::. il hrs h instant, at ii a.in. L. N. SENECAL, L. N. SEN.- Compte rendu de l'assemblée du 29 avril igiS, a.mý Report of meeting held on the 29th Apýril Son Honneur le Maire, Président; MM.,les Commissaires Present: His Worship the Mayor, in the, C McDoilald, Aiiiey. missioners Ainey and McDonald. j.-M. l'échevin Mayrand introduit une délégation de con- i.-Ald. Mayrand introduced a délégation Of tribuables de la partie nord du quartier de Lorîmier, en rap- of the north part of de Loriýn-\"er Ward, incýo» port ýavec le prolongement du Boulevard Saint-Joseph, de la the extension of Si. Joseph Boulevard, froM rue Chabot à la rue des Erables. to Maple itreet. Après pourparlers, et After discussion, on mot;àn of comrni$so Sur proposition de, M. le Commissaire -,%Icboiiald, M. le nald, it was Commissaire Hébért est prié de faire rapport sur la possi- Résolved: That Commissiôner H'b t b e bilité d'ouvrir le Boulevard Saint-Joseph, de la rue Chabot report on the possiblity of Open- es t., 1ýf _o4cp - à la rue des Erables, froin, Chabot.to-Maple stre\u003eets. 2-Souffiises des annonces, pour soumissions, pour la four- 2-Submitted draft, of advertisements bal niture et la livraison de pavés. ders for the supply and del-very of pavie'g. bý,1ý Sur proposition de M., le Commissaire Ainey, appuyée par On motion 'of Commissioner Aineysecor1ý,, M. le Commissaire McDonald, il est mieioner. Mcl)onald,.it.waq- Résolu: Dapprouver, lesdites annonces, et d'en autoriser - Resolved: That the saine bc apprgjvedý and,', la publication. cation. thercof bc authorized. 3-(26351) Soumis un extrait du Procès-verbal d'une 3--(26,351) Submitted an extra.ét from the, séance du Conseil, tenue le 26 avril igi5, concernant la de- fneeting of the Counc-1, held on the 26th AP mande d'un crédit au montant de $130,000, pour la reco'iis- appropriat'on-ýf $iâooôà asked for by the tructiop du Marché Sailit-Antoine. reconstruction of Ët. Antoine Market., Sur proposition de M. le Commissaire -Ainey, appuyée par On motion of Commi\"ioner Aincy, se M. le Commissaire McDonald, il est mÎs3ioner MtDonald, it was Résolu: De reeommatider au Conseil de voter,'à rÉénie le Resolved, , Te report te Council, recoMtp Fonds d'Emprunt, une Somme de $ý130,0G0 pour la recoilstruc- SUM Of $I3Gý0Oo be votdd ex-Loan Fundýf,5\"r- tion du Marché Saiiit-Antoine, truction of the above market s 4. Sur proposition de M. le Commissaire Ainey, appuyée 4.-On motion of Commissioner AîneYý par M, le Commissaire McDoiiald, il est Commissiorfer McDonald, it was Résolu: Qge la ýésolution -du 22 du' courant, à lýpffet d'ap- Resolved. n, of. the 211 That. the resolutio the prouver le cahier des charges, pour le privilège de la tra-,-crse proving the spécifications, fo? the privilege 9 de Plle Sainte-Hélène, soit amendée de façon à ne pas corn- ferry boats between the City and St. Hele - _ýortcr, pour le concessionnaire dudit privilège, l'obligation amended so' as not te impose on the prendre une police d'assurance semblable à celle prise lege the ation of taking -an in-gurance p, pour1c'funiculaire de la Montagne. te ihat tkn for the incline railway,ôfi thé %reau kant mis., au courant du fait quý le Dépar- kThe 130ard haýving been infornice téni6rît des Travaux Publics a en sa' possession, 5 perfora- Depariment fiàs in its possession 5'9 tetfrý à yapce, dont l'achat Wa ý jamais -été autorý\",. pure-hELBe'of -which was- never uthor*zc. Sur proposition .4c. M. le. Con=iss-aird,..AÙicy,. àpjWý4 . e'ý par On Tnofjon ()f Ct\u003emnilssioner Ainey, sec M. le Commissaire'McDonald. il est McDonald, it Was Résolu: De donner instructioni au Député-Ingýénîéur en Resolved: That the Deputy Chý Chef de remettre immédiatement ces perforafeurs à leurs ed to iffimediàfely return the,ýe drIls, td thé propriétaires, M. C. E. Martin, d'autoriser Ile Surintendant of, Mr. C. E. Màrtin-'that the Purchasing dés Achats et des Ventes à demander deý prix. pour 5 per- b- authorizeà te ask for prýces for 5 iiew forateurs neufs, et de.demander au Député-Ingénieur en Chef, :tbe Deputy -Chief Enginter be reque - Steld comment il se fait que ces vieilles machines soient. en uga«,e it is that lheee ôld 4nachines are î wi sains queYathat en ait été alitorisé, chase thtreof1aving been aehcrized. une requête de mýýrchands de grain et foin, ' ýe il from grain and 6c-Sub itted-a petifio' P!ýi$r4nt que certains individus ou particuliers (lui ne Ïont complaining- that certain' persons, Aýho arc DaS de la Ville exercent leur commerce de dé-ý of the City, carry on treir.rttail.,tý de ou tail àu quAý Victoria, etce sans payerAe taxes d'affaires MM.'les ýýçhevins L. A. LapQinte et Giroux, soilt t Pier withont paying any busà'ness . týglx,*,ëllý ýau Bureau, àig ý qùe , PreJeu 8 Ald. L; A. Lapointle and Giroux as fi quelques-uns de9ýsignatairesde ladýte::\"- eetîtiOn aPP-caied. biefore tIÉ\u0026 quête. Sur propoýitiGti dt'm, le comm., it Issa a Aintf,, apptý par, Il M. le corimfssaire Mzýnà1\u0026 il rnisgioner ldcl)bileid, it was -é§olu:De référcrý au Si.,rifitendant dee Marchés ýoÙr.\u003c Res01Ved- 7 10 refei -qaiýd p:eflýCI(5ti tô fil rapport, et au Départemétit' et, Loi pour savoir dentof MarketSý for a report, and toýthe,,1ý 't ernpkh'er c'z genre de CÔDlmerce, ët dans l'affirmative,. . te know'whether the Ci tY nécessaire de faire amender les règlement$ - et dlIl 5 -kind of trade, and if zo, whcther it ig, P donner iiistruttione au Sujilitcndànt 'des âýr-' the by-la ýendéd, 'and, ýiîl the'rneUflt- ché8 de faiý* la collection d e la tàxek suivact les preseliptio l' ý ws art fi$ the Superintendent Mâýketj, to coJféqýt' du Règl=k£",
         "MUNICIPAL DE MON'rREAL MUNICIPALBULLETIN GF'MoNi-REAL rs of lots fOrmhlg s , e Une requête - de propriétdires de terrains sur 7.-Submitted a petition ftOm owne et bç \"Redpath\" demandant l'ouverture d'une rue de part of the Redpath pi'()PertY, asking that 'à stre èdnr à travers le Parc Mont-Royal, allant jusquà opened froin Cedar avenue, thrOUgh Mount Royal Park, in order that th, firemen lkedpath Crescent, afin d'ý.)bvier à l'in cý)\"'v éri ient to Redpath Crescent avenue, ty in the lýÏý les pompiers s'ils étaient obligés d'aller à un. in- rnay have unimpeded access to the abOve Proper 1 c'ettc propriéié. event of a fire breaking Ont there- ç d by 1 . ot, de M. le Commissaire McDoilald, appuyée On motion of COMInissioner McDonald, second nitnissaire Aiiiey, il est Commissioncr Ainey, it was ed: To refer the saine to the DeputY Chief En- De-référer au Député-Ingénieur en Chef, au, Su- Resolv 'ef of the gýýineet dent of Parks and \"des Parcs, et au Chef du Département des Incen- ýýaer Superinten rapport. _pý ment for a report. 7801i soumis 8-(26780) Stibmitted a report from the Médical Health 4-Hygièn, et un rapport du Directeur du Bureau Officer, recommend'ng that an additional appropriation de Statistique, recommandant le vote addi - tionnei de $ioo, pour le Contingent de son of $ioo be voted for the contingenc'es of his departnient. 1 PGýitiQn dé M. le Commissaire McDonad, appuyée On motion of Corni-nissioner. McDonald, seconded bY ,,,CJ,-tuissaire Ainev, il est Commissioner Ainey, it was faýre rapport au Conseil, recommandant le Resolved: To, report to Council, recommending that Crédit, a être imputé sur le budget supplémentaire, said sum be voted for the above purpose, ex-supplerrientary budget. 9 J. Brunet, il, Soumise une lettre de M. J, Brunet, en rap- 6765) Submitted a letter from Mr « ,7ý1e contrat pour la pose du granit, au Monument connectlon with the contract for granite, Cart-er Mollu- ment, de M. le Coininissaire Aili 1 ey, appuyée palý On motion of Corriiiiissiorier Ainey, seconded by Coin- i5tkàire MeDonald, il est missioner McDonald, it was De référer'au Surintendant du Parc Molit-RoYal Resolved: To refer the same te, the Superintendent Of Mount Royal Park for a report. -Soumis un rapport du Directeur du Bureau (26729) Submitted a report from the Médical HYiièlle et de Statistique, transmettant une liste Health Officer, transinitting a list of mllk stations, . and dé, Lait et recommandant de payer à chàcune recornmeiidýng that they he paid the following s uins, mentionnée cri regard du nom, savoir: nam ely: Docteurs Doctors $T50 Cartier, 305/2 -C. Chaboillez, 1. Ste-Hélène .. .. .. $j So Cartier, 301/2 Cliaboil.lez, Sq. 325 Thibault, 976 St-Deliis. 2. St-joseph . - 325 Thibault 976'St-Denif, aPtiste 325 DelVerchio, io66 St-l)enis. 3. $t7jean7Baptiste 325 DülVeccýo, io6ý St-Derîi8.ý s 275 Dufrèslie, 1781 Ave du Pare. 4. Enfant-jésus 27ý' Dufrme, 1781 Park Ave, oeur -Coeur. 15à Barrette-, 5o6 Maigonneuv'E. 150 Barrette, 506 Maisonneuve, 5._ Sacré 100 R. St-jacqlLies, .348 St-Andîé. 6. St-jacques ioo R_ St.jacques, 348 Si-André. I , Ice ' IMM.-Concepiion jýo Bourgocin, iffl Rachel East. Pti,)n x5o Bourgouin, logo Rachel Est. 8. St-Aiiselrnè -i5o Martineau, 328 Forsyth. i5o Martineau, 328 Forsyth, iw Archambault, ý694 Notre-1) . a- ioo Archambault, 2694 Notre-Da- 9. Stý-Clothilde nie wcstý me Ouesti 125 Hé . tu, 491 Bélallg,-r. .. .. .. 125 Hétt4 491 Bélanger. wî et- St-zo- St-Henri et St-zo- i8oi Notre-Da- tique 275 Archambault i8or Notre-Da- 275 Archambault me West. me Ouest. ioo Bélanger, .34o Beaubien. iz St,-E(lottard joo Bélargeii, 34o Beaubien. t9idr 25o L. Roux, 232 i4ai'o\" eUvcý 13. Ste-Brigide 250 L. ROUX, 232 MiaiSOnnèUVe. ;25 Hébert, 121 StadaCOn,2. 14. Hochelaga Hébert, 121 Stadacoila, in e 2oô GauthieT, 392 Amherst. 15. Ste-Catherire 2oo Gauthier, 392 Amherst. '125. Millier, 1800 Masson. 16 Ste-Phi'omèi-ie 125 Millier, i8oo Ma5son. u5 Cholette, 478 Gilfor'd. 17. St-Stanislas 125 Cholette, 478 Gilford. 150 Mi9naUlý 212 Visitation. 18. St-Pierre i5o-MignýUlt, 2T2 Visitation. soi R. Hébeýrt, 356 St-Deilis. ig, Bonsecours 50 R. Hébert, 356 St-Denisý :30. Ville Emard ýs, 232 BlVd Monk. Dubois, 232 Blvd Monk. telnt de Pau 21. St-Vincent de Paul 300 Central 22. Bureau Central, ýec. uýine 5oo Féminin- Frarç. 5oo CoUnc, 23. Local Council Soo y Sèttlé-, 24. University Settleý 250 ment 250, S'ÎtIéMent 200 '25. Ivrriey, Seulement 2W $1000 $5,QýùQ d,9ý, le'Cotiiniiuaire McDonald. 2ppuyée -on motion oi Commiesionci, M*D6nald.,. secondé à ýby salre Aiiiey. il est Aiti :it was 'V'ý\"'Wriser le pàienient dé ladite somme à être lZeeolved: - To authOrýze the oyment ý\u00265 de 1he saine toSe cbarket ag-ý'n$t tlie 112 crédit de $i2,ow vot' pour ýeý Ci-V voted for mýlk stations. 'M is, 11,a tapport du '01re\u0026,eîir, du BSrèali, iý---ý(,à6687) Subýniitë\u0026 à \"ýP, 'è et de Stati tique, rýcà=mandânt le wte IlWtji 'Offtter, nnel, pour lea maisons en qUarantai-ne, pViation fcr'houteg undoir q\"eiaàiw ý4.",
         "BULLETIN. MUNICIPAL DE MONTREAL 812 MUNICIPAL BULLETIN OF Mo P Sur proposition de M. le Cbnimissaire McDonald, appuyée On motion of Commissioner McDonald, M 1 par M. le Commissaire Ainey, il est Commissioner Ainey, it was ', 'Y Résolu: De faire rapport au Conseil, recommandant le Resolved: To report to Council, recoMff1,\"'ý_' vote d'une gomme de $iooo, à être imputée sur, le budget a surn of $iooo be voted for such purpase supplémentaire mentary budget. 12,-(26788) Soumis 1 un rapport du Surintendant.des 12,-(26788) Submittèd a report frorn the Parcs, recommandant le vote d'un crédit de $490, pour les dent of Parks, recoffimending that an apprO travaux permanents suivants à, être exécutés, sur le terrain $49o be v-oted for the following permanent de jéux,,au Parc Richmond, savoir: performed on the Playground, in - Richmond Poser un tuyau à l'eau de 4,pouces, 2oo pieds, à $i.So $350 Laying of a 4\" water main, 2oïo feet, at $11.50 Tuyau d ëgeuf en grèsý de 6 pouces, Ioo pieds, à 90c 90 Laying of a 6*' tile drain, ioo feet, at $0.9o « Achat et installation de fontaine 50 Purchase and installation of a fountàin Sýur -pz%çswço dc Mý le -Comqde\u0026%i4-e Aïam Gram wam econ PU, Qu, motion of C si le, it Ràoh,,ý Dý rùýýt C le Rë au, ý ç ý,if1 recomiý,=-dant. s 01) r el 0 report to Ç-ohneil, recoMp vote- du4ft 'crédit,. et Ye-1kâ fer theabove purp4?ý à la -he bý day làbor.ý Snbmùtçd a report from the le 1sfiýrt du, de Xý L., F.: 4cr,: Z', f\"'ý 24, he teur dès viandes, 846 rue Saint-valier. No.- \u0026;fi St. Va4ýuvOtt*L Sur propocsidmý-ikM le 'Commissaire McDonald, apptý)*,, par M. 4eir Ainty. il est Résolu-, De donner instructions..àu Surintendant des.Edi- ResolVeýf, - That, the fices Municipaux,, de faire droii à gs be instrucfedýto c x4-(26772) Soumis un extrait, du, procès-verW d'une 14--(26772) SubMitted air ex-tract, il-em- Séaùce d1l, G0118ell, tenue le 26 avril courant, questiort de Fé- a meeting of Council held-on the 26th Aprit, ch«win Vandelac, à J'effet de prier le Bureau des Commis- -ittM\"g a question P-ut b Ald. Vandelac, askifi saires d'informer le Conseil si c'est son'intention d'installer of Ccýmftilssianer's to i90rý -the Council Wh cette année, dans le Marché Saint-Jean-Baptiste, les châlets their intention-to inatall lavatories', thîs yeauX,,., de nécessité. Baptiste Market. Sur proposition de M. le Commissaire Ainey, appuyie par On motioýd of 'Cot#missioner Ainey, se--on4e,, hf. le Commissaire McDonald, il est missioner UcDonald, it was Résolu.. De référer au Surintendant des Marchés pour Resowed.- To refer the saine to the Super rapport, Maiýkets for a report. i5.-\u003c26582) Soumis un extrait du procès-verbal d'une, 15--(26582) Submitted an extract fro'm 'the séance du. Conseil, ténue le 26 avril courapt, à l'effet de re- à meeting of Couneil héld on the 26th',ý,pril 4, jeter un, rapport du Bureau des Commissaires, feconmiandant. jecting a report of the Board of Commission: le vote d'un crédit de $3,000 Peur l'entfetiende J'Hôtel-deý» appropriation of $3,0oD for the maintenance Ville, et priant le Bureàu de soumettre au Consp.1 un état Hall, and.lequesting the Board tô stibmit W' la manière dont les fonds votés en décembre der- statement showih how the funds Voted in nier, pour réparations, été., à YHàtél-de-Ville et à l'Annexe, last, for repairs g ont ét4 dépensés. been expended.etc, to' the City Hall and the sur ropositioît de M.-Je Commissaire Aiiiey, appuyée par On motion of Commiséoner Ain n îomtnissaire;'McDonald, il est loter lnc-pànald, ii wa Jtésohi, ý De rttférer au, Surintendant des Edifices Muitici- To refer e to the Sup eaur, pour fournir tes- renseignementi, demandés.. M-unicipal Eu4dings, with insiructîons to in, formation asked for. T\u0026-sur. r0positiýn dýe 1k.ý. Cýn;rnïs=re Ait ieye uyée 16ýOn ýpp: motion of Commissioner Ainé par M. le emmissaire McDonald, il est C\u003e r ommimsiohe Malonald. it was Résolu: De demander au Directeur du Laboratoire Munî- Resolved: Tô aSk.the Director of thé M cipal, s'il serait capable de stériliser l'eau, pour la, consom- boratbry, if he would be âble to sterilite the mation-de Yfiôtel-de-ViIle et de l'Annexe. sum and thé Annex. ption # t the City Ilall 17--ý(2754ý)'_ Soumise une communication dé IVýnion. des 1ý-(27543) Submitted a communication ,Musiciens, au sujét des concerts dang les parcs publics. siéians' Union ' arient the concerts to bt giv sqr proposition de M. le Commissaire Ainey, appuyée, pat On motion o f'Commissiotior Aineyi. sec-01ý\"- lê 1-ornmîssaire McDonald, il est rni-\"ioner McDonàld,'it *at. Pée01i;ý De référer gu Surintendant des' Parcs pôur rap-. Resolved: T putt o referthé. saine to tlh.é'SuP Parks for -a report. sâ4\"\"ý-yn extrait du d'une sëanté du. 'IS.-Subrhîttedan extraet fromthe rpinu'të$'' cIbnseil, àý'fýffýt de rejeter le.rapport du Bureau desý.cGmw ing (ýf Cotàiýl,'r.cjécting the report of the El missaireg, re«iZý 4t de permettre à la \"Harriýý A batiofil niesvoners, rec*mmendýng that the Harria Company,., une plate-forme dans la courý de la a1foýwed to erecta platférmin the G. T. Compagnie du (;rgnd-T teý-, . , rune, rue Atwa On motion of par M. le Comniiosair ' e Afi4yý il -eit Corr.misgionèr Ainey, it was 'Récolu: De faire à l'effet de réaffirmer Ëesolved: To tepôrt to, Council,'r le rapnortAu Ilur\"u, en date du X4ý,eZuranfe et re'comtnan- Port of the B\"rd, uhder date of ý 'th 1tuta il , dant que les conclusions dudit Yiîý 401mt approuv4\", mending that the s8rneý beappr-ove",
         "MUNICIPAL' DE MONTREAL 618 MUNICIPAL BULLETIN OF MONTREAL 'se'une lettre de M. D. J. Spence, architecte, of- ig-Submitted a letter from Mr. D. J. Spence, Archi- seevices Pour la préparation des plans ýde l'hôpital tect, offering his services for the preparation of the plans of the proposed hospital. sition de M. le Commissaire McDoliald, appuyée On motion of Commissioner McDonald, seconded by gý6n1Misaire Ainey, il est Commiss'oner Ainey, it was Dl référer au Directeur du Bureau Municipal Resolved: To refer the same to the Medical Hea!th de Statistique. Officer. 'Soumis un rapport du Département en-Loi, 2o.-Submitted a report from, the Law Department, 41111 compte de $12.50, pour frais de sténographie, anent an account to the amount Of $12.50 for short hand \"iz0ýMPte de la Commission des Incendies, et déclarant work done for the Fire Commissýon, stat'-ng that this ex- dép\"8e doit être imputée sur le Fonds- Contingent penditure should be charged against the Contingent of said Commission. de M. te Commissaire McDonald, appuyée On motion of Commissioner McDonald, seconded by ommissaire Ainey, il est Commissioner Aincy, it was .Dli'.'fOFrner la Commission des Incendies, en con- Resolved: To inform. th 1 e Fire Commiss-oner accord- ingly. Soumis un rapport de l'Architecte et Su- 21.-(26719) Submitted a report froin the Architect and Bâtisses demandant la permission d'assister Superintendent of Buildings, ask'ng for leave to attend \"tiOla de la \"i1ýationaI Fire Protection Association\", the Conventýon of the National Fire Protection Associa- X3 niai prochain, et des inspecteurs et Surinten- tion, to be held on the iith, 12th and i3th May next, and 'Ntiles du Canada et des Etats-Unis, le 14 mai the Convention of Inspectors and Superintendents of ew-York. Bu!ldýngs of Canada and the United States, to be held on the 14th May next, at New York. tion de M. le Commissaire Ainey, appuyée par On motion of Commissioner Ainey, seconded by Comý \"aire MeDoiip.1d, il est , missioner McDonald, it was J'autorisation demandée. Resolve d: To grant the authorization asked for. urnis un rapport du Chef du Département 22.-(26713) Submitted a report from the Chief of the recommandant le renvoi du pompier. Alphonse Fire Department, recommend.ng that Alphonse Rochon. POSte NO 31, Pour absence sans permission. fireman Of No. 31 Station, be dismissed for having absent- ed himself without permission. \u0026 311. le Comrnissaire McDonald, appuyée On motion of Commissioner McDonald, seconded by inissaire Ainey, il est Coinmissioner Ainey, it was approuver ladite recommandation, la présente Resolved: To concur in said recommendation, the Prendre effet, à compter du 19 avril, present resolut.-on to take effect frorn the i9th April. -Il- j3.-(26725) Submitted a report frorn the D'rectàr' of Sbutnis un rapport du Directeur de l'Assis- ---- ýue la ubvention de $25o, Municipal. Assistance recommend:ng that the grant -of Brewery is n', lui soit payée immédiate- $2ýO, voted io the Oid Brewery Mission,.be i;nmed!âte*ý Pald to the latter. de M. le Commissaire McDonald, appuyée On motion of Commissioner McDonald, -seconded b.- issaire Ainey, il est Commissiôner Aincy, it was 'PlItOuver ladite recommandation. Resolved: To concur in said recommendation. ý1ý0uniis un rapport du Directeur de l'Assis- M:z4.-(26726) Submitted a report from the Director of recommaMant unici eal:Asi\"otansc, recommending that the grant of $5co 1 que la subvention de $5oo, treýRI bispensary\", lui soit payée immédiate- voted to the. MoýntrcaI Dispensary, be immed'ately paid to Îhe laiter. ton 'de M. le Commissaire McDoria'Id, appuyée !1. motion 'of Cominissioner -MeDonalçf, seconded- by n1mi-ïsaire Aincy, il est Comnilssioner Aîney, it was approuver ladite recommandation. Resolved: To concur in said recommendation. ýsotùnise une lettre du Shérif Lemieux, àtf 25,-(267o3) Submitted a letter from Sheriff Lernieux, ell 'de deux enfants en bas âge, dont la mýxe anent the maintenance of two young children, whose moz 'asile des aliénés. ther has bèen committed to the lunatic asylum. de. M. lé Commissaire McDonald, appuyée On motion of Cornraissioner McDonald, seconded by Issaire Ainey,ýil est Commissioner Ainey, it was référer au Directeur de l'Assistance Munici- Resolved: To refer the saine to the'Director of Muni- cipal Assistance for a report. n rapport du Directeur de l'Assistance Muni- 26.-Subrnitted a report 'from the Dirèctdr of Mu[niçýPa1 4ndant de payer au Refuge Ouirnet, la sub-, Assistance, recommending that tJie -Ouimet Refuge lýç q;lia été votée à cette institution. pad the grant of $iûoo Voted to ia;dinstitution, de Mi le Coinmissaire McDcynald, appuyée Jon m9tion o'f Comrniss-'oner MeDonald, seconded Mire Aîney. il est CathniisàonerAiney, it Was OeWr -le paienient'de ladite suhvéntion de. Reseed: To authorize the paî=£àt of said grant of $0urais, un rapport du Directeur de . rA ssis- 27--(25871) submitted a from the Directar of: andant une aflôcation à -la Cýc4x- M'Inicipbl Assistance, tee omme. ing that a grant made. to.the Montenegro Red Cross. On' t4n of Cogirnimaer UcI),ônatd, iécündea : deS. le Commissaire McDolïald, eodyée' iËsaire Aîney C1=mýs'osCçr Ainey, it watt al ., il est l 1 ýl .. reco )Port au Conseil, recomhiaod\"t Resolvçdý àTd rýýft to coundl_ intricnds f . kat de $1,600 Soit votée, ladite, somme devant Iýc voted, the said sum to be charked le Montant de $200,OW que la Vill à ité wl.at t e aCunt of $,-00,OOQ which the Cit fi*\u0026 bet# 'ère senÎou, de charger au Fonds dFm- ýauthô:rýziý at't'be Ilaet session, to 'approprÏatt 74 thý ýür-ý [POSES in=ibnl in Art. 3jý i4 prévues à. l'Article de la Charte. SA of the 1 r_,haftetý =4 'tp khatge nt, 1 j Loan Fun4ý UL'r 4port du Mtecteurde 2\u0026ýý367jA) sýpëýtted ý a ýrepert fýref4 xhlt recSni nient l'O*lCation Muhet4jýâ1 As îe,ýg l'aný'ant le paie A6ue de la I\u003etovidenct, lit' of to, th 1îA*j la.",
         "BULLETIN' E MONTR7EAl-' ý014 90' e MUNCIPAL D MUNI CI PAL B ULLETI N OF --M. je CýLilillissaÎre McDonald, appuyée On motion of Commiss\"oner McDonald,'Se par M.. le Commissaire Ailicy, il est Commissioner Ainey, it was-\". ýRè,1ôlu f Dautôriset'-Ie paiement de la -sc;inine dtý .. $3oo. Re sôlv-ed To authorize the payrnelit of of $ý0o. ý4-(267o1) Soumise une communication de M. M. Làli- 29-(267'01) Submitted a communication gewaý, au s 'et de, la livraison de la glace, sur les trottoirs. Longeway, anent the delivery of ice on sidew Sur p ro position dé M. le Commissaire McDoiiald,, aj5pu3,ée on motîon of Corn ffi' ssio-iler McDonald, parM., le Commissaire Ainey' il est Commissioner Ainey, i t was, Résolu; De, référer au Directeur du Bureau Municipal Resolved:, To refer the.same, to the d'Hygi ý' e et de tatistiýue pour 'rapport. Officer for a report. 3o.-(26i8o) Soumis un rapport du Clýef de Police, sui- 3o.-(26igô) Subm'tted a report froid thé la lettre de M.- J. C. G. Contant, se plaignant du passage des lice, anent the letter from Mr. J. C. G. Coi1t4n_ý\", autýos-carnions-et des voitures du Département de l'Incinéra- ing of the traffic of motor trucks and of ve - tion'surla ruý-,Sainte-Famille, entre les rues Prince-Arthur i.cineraton Department on St, Famille -stùoçl\" etl'avenue des -Pins. Prince Arthur strect and Pine avenue. ;'Sutprdpositiofi -de M. le Commissaire McDonald; appuyée On -motion of:Commissioner McL)onald,,.$e ParM,.-Ilë Commissaire Aitiey, il est Commissioner Airrey, it was Rý.gclùl' iýinýîôrmer. U-.'Con.tatit èlWil ry a, pas de règle- lkesolved: To inform. Mr. Con-tant that the ment prohibant la circulation de ces voitures sur ladite partie' law prohbitýng the traffic of such vehýcles ë de la rue Sainte-Famille. 5t, Famfliè street. 3T.-(26592) Soumis un rapport du Chef de Police, re- .-,,31.---,(2659:?) -Submitted a repbrt from. thC-. commandant l'hicor'poration de l'Association dite: \"Associa- ýce, recommending that the \"Associat;on Pf tion Professionnelle des Employées,-de tureau.\" des :Employées de Bureau\" be incorporatedî SUY peýPýsitiôÈi-àe M. le ÈbÉiiinisàa'ire McDoliald, appuy e On motion of C 'mmissionér McDonabe par M. le Çommissaire Almey, il est. Commissioner Aincy, it was Résolu: De faire rapport au Conseil, recommandant d'ac Rèsolved: To report to . Counc;l ýccoWW corder ladite, incorporation. said association be\u003euicorporated. 32-(23463) Soumis un-extrait du procès-verbal d'une 32ý, (23463) Subraitted an extract f rom tWe,ý séance de la Commission de Législation, tenue le 22 avril a, meeting of the Législation Committee held z aq spj-et.d'.une lettTc; du \"Montreal ýWQmon's - CIubý', se pW- April, anent a: letter frQm the Montreal WQ.. compla.7ni g of the no'se caused by m1kffiÇ47ý grant du bruit causé par les voitures; de laitiers. n On motion of Ceyntniss'orier McDonald.. sle. Su prWsition de M. le Commissaire McDonald, appuyée par le ecinimissaire Ainey, il est Commissioner Aîney, it, was y un, proje kéýolu-. \"D'iiifdtincÉ ladite Association q 1 u il t Resoived- To inform. sa;d assocîation that \u003c pour faire la livr - aison du lait, dans l'àerès-inidi et of havîng the milk delivered in the afterno1ÉW1ý1, evening, is bein considered. 31 ý(26671) 'Soumis un rapport du Suriritendant de Ëo- 33-(26671) Submitted a report frolm tll,,e liceag ý spj et do déplacement des W1,29 de systènit d1aJàrnîèsý deùt of Police,',anent.the change of loc îatz0uil4týJ néccsýité par des poteaux sur la;:iue,,, boxes, necýýs.sitatcd.by the removal of' poles, Sainte-Catlaçvipe, et rccommandant que l'offre, de la Cômpà,-u'. therîne street, recommend offier nie ýdç Téléphone \"Bcll\",,pçur l',en1ý_veMent' d'es' ffls et fain Telephone Co,,to remoye the wires, and ýo I? n\u0026esýirès da'às' 1'insialleioli de atýid\"s recinired'in'the installatioti of certai t de $264.ig,' 'àoit acçýeé b,.0iteàý in ce au coû the su= of $264-19, be accepted. ,S4r',prçýpositioi). de M. le ConinfissaiTe McDon'ali, appuyée' On motion of Cdnimissioner McDon;àld, 8 paf Commissuire Ainey, il est Commissioner Ainey, it wag Réý.olu: D e -Iiirç - rapport au to riseil, recommandant 'lé RéW-vedl: To report to C ouncil;, recofflw vOtt de laditc EýtiÙife ýde tý264J9, mà être, irnPutëtj Par virtniert, thé 9 f 4 td,.,for the abc\u003e eur les crédits votés Pour l'entretièrdes chevaux, et daccepter the to' be varied. from the ap ' üpr,ýetiàp,' de la Coi-dpagnie de Téléphone: 'BeIY', de faire les tra éý!Fktîe tlàt.the offer frotn ïVe Bell Y»ýý sus-nientionnès. to dý d work,ý beaccepted. Soumis un rapport du Directeur de l'Aàsis. 34ý268a5)ý Subtnittéd a report froni the MiMitpale, recommandani le paiemeni de Jý ne n nit pýr Assi e, recommendin,ý that the,ý ai:, Yotéý à la \"Li Anti-alcoi5lf9lielý vote'd to the Anti-.alcoholic Leaglie, be.paid 0 Sur Prep*%ýfion de M.le Cotixetgsaire MéDonal4,:'\u0026,ppidy4 of Cointtiiéiotier MéDèM1 iney, it pa ke Ahiey, ï1ýcst ïrý1 ýieÊ -;\") ro b'autotýter'te 'vaietnèiit,'àe ladite Trat.thepaýMent of Baia $uni -(268o6) Soumis un rappýrt dzt Dir\u0026t sýsýitted a report ýýêrn àe - 35.- eur de 1ýAeii-,, t;w Municipale. , recomman4alit w paiement de, l' Municipal Assistance, recommendin the de C$eIGO. Výôtée à Itjflim Mlittre:11e ýeà de grant of $1oo voted to. thé \"Mu0geun îCt p1dyrcs of Montreze..",
         "deM eCommissaire eeDonald, apput () mo0tion of.,Commissioner McDonald, seconded by lms;%r Aine, il est Comenssoner Ainey, it was 40ýTierlepaement de ladite sýomme. Resolved: To authorize the payment of said sum. SUisun extrait du, procès-verbal d'une 36.- 26773). Submitted- an extract from the minutesant 4i4teu le 26 avril couirant,::(question- de a meetin of the Council held en the 26th A i itatio eAhl,à l'effet d'attirer l'attention du (usinutbAl.Bmethal).. call:ng the ateio sarssur l'emploi du papier à journaux, of the Board of Commi.sgioners to the use of newspapers * atils d'épicerie et de confiserie. for wrapping up groceries and paatt'y. odékle Cäinmiss'ire Met mald, appuyée On mnotion of Commissioner M!cDonald, seconded by 13artAny, il est Comirssioner Aincy, it was 5ýtstqzpurrppot Officer for à report. r eM.l omisir CO1ad ap 37 n mtion of Coram ssioner MqDonaldacne --air Aine, il st byCommssione 19neyi à 3~Resolted, That the meetag. beadgre 1,8 ~ ~ ~ ~ ~ ~ ~ ~ n *4w otaoré u3 ucorn,àdore ni h *t in ta t * *i * *. L N. SNECA, ; ;etry * ; Zý* U*",
         "Bf_1LLET1,Ný )4UNICIPAL,,DE. MONTREAL -0 -01 'MUNICIPAL BULLETIN OF- COMMIS81ONS SPECIALIES- 8PECIAL COMMITTEES Cbnimission Spéciali re propriété Collard Specal Committee re Collard Pr(\u003e]ýe Compte rendu de l'assemblée du 5 mai igi5, a.m, Report of meeting held on the 5th MaY,,, Sont présents. MM. les échevins Therrien, Giroux, Mé- Prescrit: Ald. Therrien, Giroux, Ménard,,,, nard O'Connell, wel\u0026n. weldon. Soumisé et -lue copie ý de la résolution du Conseil, en date Submitted and read a copyýof the resolufÎàtJLL\" ýuý3 du'cOutant,, constituant cette Commission. dated the 3rd instant, appo.nt*ng ýhis Cprùà',ý,\u003e Déposée aux archives. Fiiel of record. Sur proposition de M. l'échevin Giroux, il est- 'On motion of Ald. G-roux, it was 1ýésolu: Que M- - réchevin. Therrien soit choisi comme Resûlved-.ý That Ald. Therrien be appoint président. i i lui a été transmis par The Committee cons'deredý La Commission étudie le rapport qui ýthe report t le Conseil au. suJet dé l'achlat de la propriété Collard . pour them Éy C \u003e neil ou anent the purchase of thé:: l'agrandissement de la station de Pompage de la rue Ciýig. PertY, -for the extension of the Craig Si Station. Elle prend aussi connaissance d'une lettre de M. R. W. They aleo, took cognizance of a letter frolli\" Molý,on, propriétaire, et de la Compagnic'du Pacifique Cana- M.olson, propýietor, and the Canadian Pac.fic dieil,,. locuaire, d'un terrain situé à Pouest de la station de tenant of a plece of land situated west of PQmpaýg;e' et après, ssion, il est 1ationý and after discussion, it was RWIu. -la présente séance soit ajournée à demain le Rtsolved: That the prescrit meeting b e .6 du, tàurùlt, à 2.30 P.n 1 1.1. et que d'ici là, les renseignements til to-moxro*,) the 6th instant, at 2.3o pni. an soient Pris sur la uo\u0026ell)ilitè e\u0026,chéter lý,terr2àn plus haut. Meantifriée fiquiries be made as te the Pýs5i mentionné aux ris d'agrandir ladite station delwmpàge, chuing the abové mentioned p'ece of laiid fe\", àement of said pumping station Ajournement. Adjourned. J. L GAUTHIERi J. E. GA7 Secrétaîre. Cýomrniiaion Spéciale re élarghmment du Chemih Côte des Neigcs Special Comnifttçe re widening of Côte deS Compte: rendu de l'assemblêe du È mai 1915', pan. Report of meeting held on the 5th réý t vins Lavergne, Mênîrd Ci- Pregért- Ald. L er c, Mé rd, -rôýý s Mý les éclie na Gý rouXý 1-foulé, Vandelac, Ward et L A, Lýapoiiitee d età,-, Wâýd ààd L Aý.,1,apointe. Souîràse et tue une résolution du Conseil. en.. \u0026ate du :ý6 Subraitted andreïd a resolýtion o'f Cou airil demier, consîituant cette Conimisjioti. 26th April last, àppointi.ng this'Côrnêiittèe\"\"-ý' M, l'échevin L. A. Lapointe est choisi comme préside-nt - Ald, L A. lÀpoînté wàà' 1 d Ch Soumis et lu'le rapport du Bureau des Commissaires, 9ouý Submittedýàn-d reaý the reportJr0m the =s à'cette Corýmission, et recommandaut l'expropri'a de f missioncre tô this Comniiitee, reéoiiimeildi' qtertaines lisières de terre situées sur W Chemin C dès_ priation of certain iBtrÎl\u003es of land situeed s Road. -ýýJwksý discus5iýn1 Afterdi wFoien, it W, às. On motion of Ald.: War\u0026 \"$tw ýpr0P0sitio dé X l'échevin Ward, il est Resolved: That- this meetfng he a jour k4týItÀ-, Que cette C n=ission , Wàjourne a\"bt Ieï\"nrmhres la composant, Àront, vend.rédi prochain,. lé that the.rnenibers shall 0 du eý 4 'l i heu-res. de l' aut-=idi, Visiter lés. lieux cality on Friaky iextý the 7th instant, iu, ofin, de sur, la question à Vêwde.ý Êàsitiàh te dýiýjiss1 the 4uestion thorough knowledge of th el facts. e GA",
         "1 .N'Pci1 a uet du rapor du Bueau des Spca Caommte r rp t om heBard o oms léarisemntde l'Aqueduc the widenin of the Aqueduct. rend del'asemlée du ma ig5, .m.Report of meeting hëld on the 5th May 1915. te N Lponte, Rochon et Breu. te, ,NL Épone e o ýadBreu ýh ëA.Lpite sonmet un omncto e Ad .Aý-pýnesbmtied aco mnatn rn iýsair Côé a1uet-el9em necnene010sinrC t aette reetcna eài th Por du *u a dè -omsars reoto h or fC m isoes Uliat*o es déoé au arhvs h Édcm uiaýnwsfldo eod i0l sajure los fi d epemetr ax ne-. . T e om iteethn djurnd n rdr o nalet; ;--lasmled ueu e omsars m r'''st tei h etn fteBado o ms ase*lé la qusin-élarnismn e soes sth usino h nagneto h q de l'tbism n de bolvad doi êtr *icu *uc an*fteetbîh to olvrsw eds cussd, a suc meein* ý77",
         "CONSEIL MUNICIPAL -CITY COINCIL Report of adjourned special meeting hel Compte rendu de l'assemblée spéciale ajouriiée du 6 mai igi5. MaY 1915. Son Honneur le Maire, M Médéricý Martin, Occupe le f au- Ris W\u0026Éhip the Mayor, Ur. Médéric teuit. Chair, Sont égents., mm. les échevins L A. 1,apointe, X La- Present: 'Ald. L. A. Lapointe, N.- pointe, Mrd, (YCoiinell, Boyd, Bastien, )4ayrand, Turcot, OConneit Beyd, Bastien, Mayrand Turc Mandonald, Giroux, Biumenthal, Larivière,.Houlé, Ménard, GÎroux, Blumepthal,. Larivière, 'àé' Min, Rubenstein, Vàndelac, Weldon, Leranger, ion, Dubeau, tein, Vandelac, Weidon, Loraýn er, litidh' Therrien, Denis, Chartrand, Et arbeau, Dubois, Therrien,' Denis_ Chartrand, Ele, choni.., Pauzé, Lavergne, et MIf, Ainey, uôté, 1-1-ébért et McDonald, Ws, Paùzlé, Lavergne and Messrs, AintY 1 Commissaires. and UcDxmag Commir-sioners. VETO DU MAIRE MAYOWS VETO. 1ý11e Greffier de la Cité soumet au Conseil, comme quesý i,-The. City Cierk, as a matter of rl\"r, tion de privilège et d'urgence, un rapport de la Commission g«ey, subtùittéd a report from Spec ai C' Spéciale chargée de faire rapport sur le r du Bureau pointeà to report on report of Board of C' des Comniissairesý recommandant lýackat proprié- recommen in té appartenant à M. 1. Collard, i di the p\u0026chase of a certain -Pr Mr. 1. Collari M.'l'éch. GIROUX, appuyé par M. l'écli. MENAP.1), Ald. GIROUX movedý seconded by Àldý Itoýose1 Que lýétude: de cette question soit ý fixéê -à 4 That considération of safd question be taký heres. , pým. oýclock p.m. 'Le Cotiseil se partagé sur cetté prbpositýon: -The Council àiv-,ded thereon: Pour.: Mayrand Turcot, Giroux, 'Houlê, Ménard, Van- Yeag: Mayrand, Turcot, Giroux, Houlé, delac, Loranger, Îýàeau, Therrien, Chartrand, Ro.chon--ii. delac, Loranger, Dubeau, Therrien, Chartr 9 Contre: Lý A. Lapointe, N. Lapointe, O'Confiell, B\"eni- Nays: Lý A. Lapointe, N. Lapointe O'Cû4.'ý Macdonald, Blumentbaj, Làrivière, Rubenstéin, Weldop, De- ..Macdonald, Bluinenthal, Larivière, 'kubtnst nis, Paiizé-il. Denis, Pauzé-il. Les voix étant également Partagées, Son Honneur le maire -nt contre ladite ; tion est en M The votes bOng equally d:v, 1 donne son vote prépandéra Mo Qui ayor gavé his casting vote against W4 conséquence rejeté,-- therefore pissed in the negative. Ledit ra, t dé la Commission Sp4ciale,ý,étant lueý Saidrépott 01 saýd Spécial Committee bel M. l'éch. THERRIEIJ, appuý,é par M, l'éch. CIIAR- Àld..TI-IFÈPIF-N moved, seconded b'y TRAND, . 1 TRAND, ]Propose. Que la Règle Ili des Rgle$ dw-conseil soit sus- That Rule iii of the Rules of Counc] be 9 pendue et que ledit rapport, de la Commissio, Spéciale, main7 that said report of the Special. Committëe: t«ant. devant k CSseil, soit rç,ýu et adopté, thé Council be received and adepted. Et un débat s'engageant, M. réchevin ûConnell soumet une 1eÈfý,e de M, F. W. Môlson, renôuvelakt ]'Offre faîte le And a citbate arising, Ald_ô, onneWgu frôrù Mr P. W. Mýlson, rene ffngý offeiý àf 17 O\u003ctQbrë 1913, de vendre à la Cté' éer'«'JPe Propriété PoUr lPl 3, tô ;à t, the City certa pro rty Ae la litâtio-h dé pSn ~. .:.de la ý'rue:: cmîg- the:Craig strý1çet Ea M Est. et Ea u pi ng Et, un nouevau débat eenliýàýàti And a furiher debate arisinge M. réch. MF-NARD, appuyé par M. Péch. THEPMEII, Moved. iv ameftdinent.by Ald. MENARZ', Propose en Ald. THEkRlE.Ný Amendement. Que ladite motion etle rapport y relatif That said ort and ra(ýt.ion be a soient référés de nouveau à une Commission composée de .ýCo=n-littee coinlicsed of Ald, O'Con egll, ý MM, les échevins UCotinell, Therrien, M4nardý Weldon et nard, Weldon and Giraux, and ýhat the Groux, et que la séance de ce Coàftil. soit ajournée er la Council bc adjourned on the niain motion motion principale et le raport y relatif, à mercredi proch*ain, ebnnected therewith until Wédriesday'ney.\"4\",, \"le lýý 4u courant, à 4 beùreâ,p.in. \u0026tant, at J o'tlock p.in.- L, K LAPOI NTFý appuyé par Mý,réêh. VCON- )Xo,#ed i suJýýam 'd 1\u0026,I- XI= ' propose en li eft ment b Am hy Al-d.'OICONNtLý eMemenf. Vu les faits nouveaux e oint été vàis whercai lhew facts have corne Wôreý devant, k, con*eil, et vu, les. offres de.terýin_9 qui viennent à new site has been offere4 to the CftY'JJý, ýp2r M. F. W. MoIson, qu'il soit on, be it è pâe approuver de muveau U résolatio'n ResoJvý\u0026 17hat the tesolgtion adôptedý ad4tée \"Ëons6l. le 23,ayril igi dmar*der au et 5. et de APr;! IÇýf5 be not -approïred, aýnd::that., the Dureau dei ou lni\u0026sjoners be . . :::: t Cdiýmifflireý de remettre de ri veau à l'étude in éc tequested ý to -akai \"nsid6ç ladite qMtiýM tedit =e44çee0t,éýý nýs'aux VOL-, le CbÈMI -\u0026=«dment.beÎng pu f*:p9r Said ýsu.b couii pour L A, Lapoifttei 'Ný 14wnte, Ward, O'Cormelt L A. I-apointe, N, L-abointe, -,Bov(le Bastiei1ý Macdonag 81unwMffia Utiviér,, Ruhct)ý 1ýoYt, gustîà Macdonald, BI-dménth, tttîni Vandelac, Weldon, Hwhion, beý's,, Elie, Rixhon, bengtein, Vanâçlac, Weldon, HàýhiQ1Î,ý pau?\u0026 La.vergne-i\u0026 çhoý4 Pauzé, u*ýerg\"-, X\u0026",
         "... -MUNICIPAL DE MONTREAL 619 MUNICIPAL BULLETIN 01- M014TR-AL '1ýkyr2,nd -' Turcot, Girou 1 x, Houlé, Ménard, Lo- Nays: Mayrand, Turcot, Girou,, Houlé, Ménard, LO- . I u, Therricn, Chartrand, Dubois--io. ranger, Dubeau, Therrien, Chartrand, Dubois-io. -amendement est ainsi adopté, et il est So it was carr.ed and 1lýn conséquence. Resolved: Accordingly. ýeur le Maire ayant quitté la salle du Conseil, M, His Worsh-\"p the Mayor having left the Council Cham- Maire-Suppléant, occupe le fauteuil. ber, Ald. Macdoiia!d, Acting Mayor, took the Chair. eelhMt Unanime du Conseil, lcs-\u003eaffàiresýde tou- With the unanimous consent of the council, the follow- tý3ý :sont expédiées: ing\u003ematters of routine were transacted. PETITIONS. ribuables, au sujet du poste d'auto-taxis sur la 2.-From ratepayers, stand for motor car s on Phillips Place. 'aU Bureau des Commissaires. Referred to Board of Commissioners. s1Pýiation Catholique de la Jeunesse Cailadieiiiie- 3.-From \"Associat«oii-Cathblique de la jeunesse Ca- ttftt le Conseil à assister à une conférence qui nadiènne-Françaisc\", invýting Couricil to attènd a lecture ée par M. Henri Bourassa, le ig (lu courant. to beý delivered by Mr. Henri Bourassa on the igth instant., fti(ýn de M- l'écli. L. A, LAPOINTE, appuyée par On motion of Ald. L A. LAPOINTE, seconded bY Yb, il est , Ald * BOYD, it was 'Que ladite invitation 'soit- acceptéc avec remer- Resolved: That said invitation bc accepted- -With thanks. _ant Général de la Compagnit des Tramways de 4,-From General Manager Montreal Tramways Co., re siliet desý, arrêts de tramways. car-stops. archives. Filed of record. REPORTS. No 1 sui- la liste des rapports à être soumis 5-No. i on the list.of reports tà bc su-brnitted by the des Commissaires, savoir: concernant ýl'ouver- Board of Commiss-oners, viz.: concerning the openirie of Drûlet, n'est pas soumis au Conseil. Drolet street, was not subinitted by the Board. W. des Commissaires, à l'effet de voter un, 6.-From Board of Comrnissý\"dney.sl. Jor an appropr,«a- pour ]eýFonds Patriotiquc Canadiien. tion of $30000 for the Canadian Patrotic Ftind. de NL l'érh. L. A, LAPOINTE, appuyée par On motion of Ald. Ic.. A. LAPOINTE,, acconded by ARD, il est Ald. WARD, it was ledit rapport soit reçu, et adopté. Resolved- That said report be received and àýO'Pted..' P\u003eu des Commissaires, à l'effet de voter un cre- 7.-From BQard of 'cQnlni\"ionrrs, for an appropria- Po r la construction d'une fosse Imhoff, dans tion of $zýooo for the construction of an Imhoff pit, Ahuntsc Ward. On de M. l'éch. L. A. LAPOINTE, appuyée par Onmotion of Ald. L. A LAPOINTE, seconded by STIEN, il est Ald. BASTIEN, it Was ý12 ledit rapport soit reçu et adopté, pourvu ce- kesolved: That said report he receýYed and adopfed, ';ty«nt de dépenser la somme de $2,ôoù pour là Dmv;dcýl,, however, that the sum of $2,0ro bc not expend- -4'liné fý\u003esse Imhoff une étude soit faite par les ed for t . he, construction of an Imhoff pit until the City En- la Cité et par le birtýcteur du Bureau d'Hygié- gincers -and the Medkal Health Officer have ascertained Oir si la construction de cette fosse aura pour whether the construction of such pit would have the effect disiMraître les mauvaises odeu . Il h of sup ng the bad odors from the SewàgeFàrm; the rs qui s ec. appelit pe58i d'épuration.-Les afficiéts rntwicipàux ci-dessus above Civit Officiais to bé furfherniore instructed to tho- faire une étude complète de là 4uestion'de roughly consider the question of ýtfie nuisanèe cauàèd 1 bY 4ulêe par la ferme d'épuration du quartier St- the Sewage Farrn of St. Den'«s Ward, 'and to 8uggen the Çllier les mesures à adopter pouf remédier à measures tc, be adopted in order to remedy the state, of Ift dont les citoyens du quartier Ahuntsic, se things complaîned ofý býr'the -citizens Of Ahuntsic' Wird. eau dés Commissaires, pour faire un arrang From Board of Commissiloners, -to arrange with th t Light. Heat,\u0026 Power Co.\", pour la Montreal\u003eLight, Heat \u0026 Power Cà. forthe laying bf an 1ýte principale dans la rue Chanibly, additional 'gag main on Chgmbly streët.- M. l'éch. L. A. LAFOINTE, appuyée pIr On motion of: Ald. L. A. LAPOINTE,, AtrRAIÇD,.îl cet Ald. CHARTRAND, it war, ledit, rapport soit r et adopté ilesolved. 1hat said ýeert be recciYed and %dQPttdý il des CO andant un crédit de 9.--Frôm Board of -commissibners for. aYàý appmp.r-.a- ý8Ptý'-tiM de certains édifices. - tiün of $6oa for the intpection of certain bW-Idiilgs-.' on de M -réch. L. A. LA POINTE, appuyée par On motm* of Aldý L. -Aý LAP(jlx.= ý:-.seeondéà:l bî A1,dý TURCOT,-it ýeOpgeiI cr,ýt que la Ville 'a (les fonctionnaircis Res(Aved: ý T haf, ineemitch eg tJiý,touna; i-5 Of ôpitilon le travail requis pour, 40pner effet tLat t Çan perý0rM thb ins ë tine referrëd du R4,,1eýàiénît No ý14, à qu'il n'eýt pgs n\u0026 to in the. above rep(ýrtý in order te, gvé cr,:ýtý to- the ' ýqM- nsk4uený de dépenser' '..cvÎsions of B5r-lawýNo. ýi4, and at It is iý0nëde un-- _mýrîtant de $ th \u0026B, électriciens de reforc to, appropriate saidi amou t of wtth mft , 1ý ledit rapport -sou tion, sald report be rcjectedý ti\" Commismircsý àý l'effet a eoeý-'Mer 1 e' poue _ ivife la tba' «Ç à la dernande -de, Wzý\u0026 ti",
         "BULLETI'N MUNI 1 CIPAL PE -MONTREAL 620 MUNICIPAL BULLETIN, OF, MO C_ i i.-Du Bureau des Commissaires, à l'effet de voter un, ri.-From Board of Commissioners, for a. de $.ýào, re sondages préliminaires en rap r tio of $5oore test borings in connection Wl tunnel projeté sous le Canal Lachine. tunnel undér Lachin'e Canal. Sur proposition de M. l'éch. L. A. LAP01JýTE, appuyée par On motion of Ald. L. A. LAPOINTE, M. l'éch. GIROUX, il est Ald..GIROUX, it was Résdluý Vu que, dans la résolution de Conseilen date du Resolved: That inasmuch as the resoluUQ», ii janvier i9iý à l'effet de voter un crédit de $1,5oo au sujet adopted on the j ith january. last, in virtue of de la construction d'un tunnel sous le Canal Lachine, il a été of $isoo was voted in connection with thé Pt- formellement stipulé que ladite somme de $r,5oo devrait coti- riel iinder Lachine Canal, it was formally et' vrir toutes les dépenses à encourir pour études préliminaires, said appropriation of $isoo would cover all sondages, préparation de plans, etc, ce Conseil se voit en con- for the preliminary examinations, boringe, Pl séqueiiee forcé de rejeter ledit rapport. plans, etc., the ouiicil is consequently obI 19 said report, I2.-Du Bure au des Commissaires, à l'effet de voter un 12.-Frorn Board of Commissioners, for crédit de $500, re pension du constable J. J. Hackett. tion of $5oo re pension of constable J. Le Bureau-des Commissaires ayant demandé la permis- The Board of CoMmissioners havJng 17cq#, Sion de iêtirer ledit rapport, sad, report bewithdrawn,, ýiur proposition de M. l'éch. L A. LAPOINTE, ap yéepar On motion of Ald. L A. LAPOINTE, M.\u003e Yéýhý WARD, il est pu -Ald. WA-RD, it was Résolu:' -De faire droit à la de t man de du Burcau, desý Com- Rîeso1v-ýd.. That said report of he missaires, Qners complied with. .13,-Du Bureaudes Çomrnissaircs, (au nombre deý-.2),,4 ià.ýý-FroM Board of Commimioners (2 l'effet de vdfer un crédit de $4oo pour déléguer le Maire et an appropriation of $4oo to send Mayor al. certains fonctionnaires à New-York. cers to New Yorký Délibération remise à la demande de M. l'échevin Giroux. Consideration deferred ât the requesÉ of 14.-Du Bureau des Commissaires, à l'effet de voter un i4,-Froui Board of Commissioners, for crédit de $igo pour réparations à. l'ascemeur de l'Hôtel-de- tiDn. of $i9o, îûr repairs, to City Hall elf-ýV'at Sur proposition de M. J'éch. L. A. LAPOINTE, appuyée ýar On niotîon,.of Ald. L. A. LAPOINTE,... M. l'éch. O'CO-NNELL, il est Ald. O'CONNELL, it was Résolu:.. Que IcetrapiRg . t soit reçuet adopté_ Rescived. That said ýefflt be received', Blireau des. Commissaires, :à ;eeffet de. ',voter un r5,-rrom Roaid. of Commissioners, for crédit dé $2,25o, pour le Département des Parés. ticin of for theP,4rks Depaýrtnientý ý6,ýDû Bureau des Commissaires, àA'effet de voter 'un 16.-From Board of Coi=issioners; :jar crédit de $igoo, pour le Département des i-ttrcs. ton of $igéa for the Parks Departmeatý 17 -Du Bureau des Commissaires_à J'ef f et de voter, un i7ýýFro;n Board of CommÏsaipif1érsý f or 'crédiî de $64o, pour le Département des Parcs. tion of for fhe.Parks Department. j8_e-Du Bureau des Commissaires, à l'ef f et dé voter un iS-Frota Board, of Commiseioners, to V crédit de $!OSw, pour, fournitures pour le Département de -$10,8bo-for supplies, Road De rtmeat 14 Voirie, Délibération remise à la demande de M. l'échevin Aý Congde.ration deferred at'the requést of, pointe. 1ý . ).-Du Bureàij des Commissaires répondant à 'Une ques- 19-Irrom. Board of Commis,,ýio'ners Îti t entretien des chevaux, Dépaitement de lIncinération. tîoxi:re horsekeep, Incinération Depà.'rtmeýt Déub6iaiion r'emiee, à la demande do M l'échevin Gifoux. ConsýderauGn deferred 'at the request, 'of' ào.-Dtl Bureau des répondant à une qUeS7 ý20ýFrom Bouiýd of Commi9sioners', réi) tion re fourniture de macadam. tion,'.re.SUPPJYL(ýf rnacadam. ý2rýtý,-Du Buruu des Commigsaires, répondant à iiiiie qucs-ý 2T.-From Boàrd bl -ni re dette de la VI It tw ion- re City's'debt. SùvProPoMtio:n de M l'\u0026fiý L. Al 'LAPÔ1'ýZ ÉÉ' appuyée par On motiônof Ald. L A,,. LA ljOiNTIý, M.ý l'éch. WELDON, il est Afd, ýVELDON,ý.it eàs Uésolu: Que iesdits rapports' soient re'çus',èt que ýGWés Resolvéd. Thit said reports be receý en.SCrient trallSnliSeS aUX éChe'ý'inS int\u0026eqsýé5. and that éopies théreoi be tratiýin.itted to,11- 22-Du 'Bureau des Commissaires soumettant un rapport . 22i-Froin Board of ýCommi9siGners, Ëe, du Déprité-Ingénietir. en Çhefl te. éfargiýscment du. Chemin of Detmýty-. Chiei. Engineer,' re widening Of geq Road. 'ut pro, osition dt:11. l'éch. 1- A. LAPOINTE,,,Pppuyâ Par On motion of Ald L..A., LAPOINIM\"ý' ýOCHOýT, il est Aldý ROCHON. it wàs Jîýlt:,: 'Que'ledif rapport soit xeçu et adopté. Res'olvèd: 'rfiat taïd repqrtbe reccived des Commissaireg, à: 23.--ý_FroW Énard qui cQ= i5sýL ers, t0ýý D4ieý*ý remise à, la -demande.. à .'K J1ýc\" Ccoa- coùsia ra 11efeý1 e tioli ed ât the.request'e .4--Du- *ýge ýf\" chtno, 1s\"iregi a: lgeîfýt, dé per-rnèitte Po la MocýJý - Light, 1jeat \u0026' Power Co. to, erect 1ý, Reat \u0026 I1,ý)WEr Co, de planter des Po- tf teau Sur A. LAPOINTÉ, appuyée ear On môtion of Ald. L A. LAPOIN,= M. l'éch. VANDELAn Ald. VANDELAC, it Was Résolu: Que ledit' \"-izu tt -ado%é,. Resôl-ved- That Biid'rtPoré ble 't«eý F V, des reffet de pctmeftre 25,---From Boud ýQf Cern Xontreal Public Service treal publit Scvice CQrpdfaýt, tiy",
         "IN MUNICIPAL DE 621 MUNICIPAL BULLETIN 'OF MONTPZEAL n de M. l'éch. L. A. LAPOINTE, appuyée par 011 ýioiJi of Ald. L. A. LAPOINTE, seconded by IEN, il eA Ald. TW ý1EN, it was Oue ledit rapport soit reçu et adopté. lýesolved: That said report bc received and adopted. .-.-t'oreau des C ' ; to allow the fol- ommissaires, à l'effet de permettre 26-From Bbard of. Cbmn1:ssionerý- es dont les noms suivent de maintenir en place towing persons to matntain coal shutýs, Vaults, etc., (a) 4-charbon, (les vefites, etc.: (a) Université Mc- McG11 College Univers\"ty; (b) Mrs. P. Labelle; (c) Mrý P. Labelle; (c) M. E. W. Caverhill, Caverhill; (d) Estate Fox Boxer; (e) Mr. Alfred -ie Inini n Bank; (h) Mr. Fishel Sh;p; (9) Do Boxer; (e) M. Alfred Dalbec; (f) 1U. Fisi (f) 0 r1linion Bank; (hý Redmond Co.ý Ltd.; (i) M. Redmond Co., Ltd.; (i) Mr. Joseph Picard; W 0t:S Fen- d,,(j) Otis Fenson Elevator Co., Ltd-; (k) Som Elevator Co.; (k) Rý)bert Reford Co.; (1) The Mott d dý .; (1) The Mott Co., Ltd,; (m) Cempagnie Co., Ltdý; (ni) Cie Papier ROI land; (n) Mr. S. Villeberg. (n) M. S. Vineberg, On motion of Ald.' . L On de.M. l'éch, L. A. LAPOINTE, appuyée par A. LAPOINTE, seconded by ENSTEIN, il est Ald. RUBENSTEIN, it was Queleclit rapport soit reçu et adopté. Resolved: That said report bc reccived and adoPted. .,c(ýmMissioi1 Spéciale, Te reconstruction du Mar- 27-From Special Comm--ttee ' Te recoiistruct:on of St 'I'ntoirlex recommandant d'approuver le rappoi Antoine Market, recommending the apprval of report Di CeInfnisýaires à ce sujet. Board of Comm'ssioners in this connection. il 1 'týSHION, appuyé par M. l'éch. N, LAPOINTE, Ald. HUSION moved, *econded by Ald, N. LAPOIN- TE, Que ledit rapport soit reçu et adopté. That said report lie recewed and adopted. Se Partage sur cette proposition The Couricil d'vided thereon: O'Conneil, rinell, Boyd, Macdo- Lapointe Yeas: N. Lapointe, Ward, O'COI Ward Boyd, Macdonald, nald, Blunienthal, Weldon, Hushion, Elie, Dubois-10. Hushion, Elie, Diibois-ioý Lavointe. Bastien, Mayrand, Turcet, Gi- Nays: L. A. Lapointe, Bast cri, Mayrand, Turcot, Gý_ cy Roulé' Ménard, Rubensteiii, Vandelac, Lo- roux, Larivière, Hou'é, Ménard, Rubenstein, Vandelac, k Therrien, Denis, Rochon, Pauzé, Lavetgiie- Loranger, Dubeau, Therrien, Denis, Rochori, Pauzé, La- sition est ainsi rejetée. So ît passed in th e negat1ve. ITIONS. QUESTIONS. (ýuesticùs sont vosées au Bureau des Coin- 28ýCertaîn questions w Board of Coin- Prière d'y répondre à la prochaine assemblée missionçrs with a request tIiýat they reply thereto for th\"ý (a) M. l'écIýevin O'Co'riiell, Te réparations next mecting of the Council, by (a)-Ald. O'Connell, re la Tué Wellington; (b) M. l'échevin Ward, Te repairs to, W 1 ellington itrect pavement;,, (b) Ald. Wàrè, réýhe1le des Salaires Raisonnables-, (c), M. re adjustnient of fair wagé scaW, (c) A1dý Elle, re esta- i- te établissement dýun marché dVs la partie blishment of a market in the western Part of the City. MOTIONS. sition de M. l'éch. LORANGERI appuyée 29.ý1On motion of. Atdý LORANGER, s econded by Ald, il est DUBEAU, Iccorder un m is de congé à M. l'éch. Pauzé. :Reso1ved'ý That one month's leave of absence be, grant- 'ed to-Ald.-Paazé- Position de M. réch. L. A. LAPOINTE, ari- 30.-;-ýOli motion of Ald. L. A. LAPOINTE, seconded by \u0026h. BLUMENTHAL, il est Ald.ý BLUMENTHAL, it was le Greifier de la Cité «,ýôit prié de renouveler 'Resoived: That thý City Clerk bc ii-istructed to renew Par le Bureau dcs.Gommissaires d'établir the r.equest made by the Board of Comm!ssýoncrs to tie 4n\"Ways ý'à. rangle du Bot;,kvàrd,' Saint-Laurent Montreai Tramways Co. to establish a car-stop corner of St. Lawrence Boulevard and Roy Street. Mitiyn de M, eéch. MAYRAND, appuyée par 31.-On moton of Ald. MAYRAND, seconded by Ald. RGNE, il 'est LAVERGNE, it was _eue li nuisance, cailsée var les Ab-attâirs de Resolved,. Whereas the nuisance caused by the Eastern îA',ýýter,. et cause -des dozmages, sérieux ci Abattoirs still exiSts and 'is caus4ng serious and constaÙt damages to the citi=\u0026- -des corn Missaires sciit prié de dorrer ins- That the Board of Commissioners be reqù\"ted, 16 1n$ý. ternérit en\" 1,,6*, et au D9,13artcment d'Hvgilène truct the Law and the Health Diepartrnents. to take 49 actions nu', rolit Co tre., com- lËany actions as they can against the C-oýÉpany. ýýti1 'thé ce que laffi ister. en abated., 'te ntiisance ait cessé eex uld nuisance bas be 1)ýUtEAIJ, appuyé par M. Féch.. LORAN- 32,-Ald. DUBEAU moved 'seconded by Ald. LOÉAN- GERý ,tl, ,wiet dela i-nustroction de la Bibliothèciue That the Boàrd,.of Camuiiss;oiiers,, in tonnectIon with tir the construction of the public library, bc reeêited, to ep des ÇcmmiSs1ýiTý-% Soit Prié dé subs- de QUiMnst W , le.grank de'1ýa Province de substitute granite, froth *e: provi 01 Qijeb-ec - foi, QuettIstown Stone, ,Qiyouy (iÉ Ald. Girouy-. 1 aske4 that coneid«lktioi o f \"id 'In 1 otion lie tuatide cmê l'étude de cette -motion as, rîfcých 8 i:nè assemblée, ý et Von permet qu'elle doetTC(l until nexi. eceting, and the 519me W owe-d Itb', l'Our Wmme avis de motion. remiain on. the order of the day as a notec of motion, 11ýOTIcE 0 'MÔT1ONý ý33 Ald, #ae é, Te se",
         "BULLETIN MUNICIPAL DE MONTREAL MUNICIeAL BULLETIN OF MO ORDRE DU JOUR. ORDER. OF THE DAY. 34,Le ler ordre du jour étant lu, il est oidonné de le bif- 34ýThc ist order of the day being read,'tI111ýý , fer. Orderéd: To bc struck. 35.-Etant lu l'ordre du jour, à l'effet de prendre en.délibé- 35-The order of the day bcýing read to, t'alion des rappôrýS du Bureau desCcrnmissaires, (a) recoin- ports from the Board of Commissioners (a mandant qu'une somme de $66,W9.o6 soit votée pour lýs ex- 979-06 for an n m, propriations; (b) to, aM, propriations annuelles; (b) recommandant que ledit rapport, re annual expruoaplr,2iaxtions. re. expropri ' ations- annuelles, soit amendé, Sur proposition de M. J'éch. L. A. LAPOINTE, appuyée par On motion of Ald. L. A. LAPOINTE, M. l'éch. DUBEAU, il est Ald. DUBEAU, it was Résolu: Que ledit rapport soit adopté. Resolved. That said report bc adopted, 36.-Etant lu l'ordre du jour, à l'effet de prendre en dé- 36.-The order of the day bc ' :ng read to c libération -un rapport ý du Bureau des Commisýaires, re uf f re port from the Board of Cornmissiorrers, Fe de Son Honneur le Maire de mettre un yacht à la disposition W017Ship the Mayoi te put a yacht at the di9p, du personnel de J'Ile Sainte-Hélène, St. Helens ' Island. Sur proposition de M, l'éch. MAYRAND, appuyée par M. On motion of AIdý 31AYRAND, l'éch. WARD, à est WARI), it was ý7 Résolu: Que ICItrapport Eoit rejeté. Resolved That said 'report he. rejected,. (M. l'échevin, Ël=çnthàl,, dissident.) (Ald. Blumelàthal dissenting.) 3\u003eý__mEtant iulvoýt\u0026e du jour à l'effet dé preiidic en'déliý 37-The order of the day being-reàd to bération ûhrapport du Bureau des Commissaires, dernahdànt Port froin the Board of Commigsioners fcr un crédit de $6,ýý pour la construction d'un égout, dans la tion of $6,5oo for the construction of a rue Benny, Street. 'A ce sujet, soumise et lue une communication du Dýparte- In this connect-on ' Submitteýd and rè-'4di a ment, en Loi,. en date du 21 avril dernier, relative, à la légalité from the Law Depatment, dated the :zist Ap dudit rapport làtîng to the legality of said report. Sur proposition de M. Vérh. L.' A. LAPOINTE, appuyée par On motion of 'Ald. L. A. LAFOINTE, e Miý Féch. O'CONNELL, il est Ald. O'CONNELI, it was 'esolti: Que ledit rapport soit rejeté afin dé permettre au TÈat said report bc rejected. Ift, BUreau des Cbtmmssaito de prendre connaissance de la corn- c ýpoaýd, of Commissioners mey have t4 ýÈ Départment en Loi à ce sujet. o nsi ering the cornrnunicâtîoh froin the thent in this connection. (M. l'échevin Macdonald, dissident.) (Ald. Macdonald dissentingJ e.-Etaht lu l'ordre du jour, à l'effet de prendre en déli- 38ýThc order of the day b4ing read t.0 c pport du Bureau des Commissaires, dern bératwn un ra, andant port from ýic Board of Commissioncrà for un crédit dc'ecoo pour nettoyer les ruelles. tion ôf'$6,om to cleau lanes. mosition sl[w de M l'éch, - DUBEAIJ, appuyée par M.! 0 é ýpro n -motion of Ald. DUBEAU, seconded býr y chi il est it was 'dit rapport soit adopté. Résolu. Que le Resolved: That àaid reýort bc .(M. l'échevin Lý Â.:L4poiiite, dissident. (4d, L., Ai Zepoilit' di -ýýL e iËèine ordre du jouf éfant lu, i 0 1 est 39ýThe i5ýh î rder of the day being read\u003e né; QWilsoit bifféý Ordémd.- Tobë'struck. l'ordre du plir, pour. prendre en délibération do. -The .,order of the day being read to Co, un, aviS: de diotion de, M. 1 échevin Laranger, à l'effet d'ujou-,. tÎce of Mtico by Ald.ý.LÔraiûger to add a- ter une certaine règle (ilib) aux lý,èglCs du Coniel'L (111B) :to the, kuled-of Council. s propo$1bon dz M.Téch. LO.RANGER,ýappUYie1par K JùG\u003eÈ-ýe.. L _Aý LAPOINTE. il est LORANGER, s«of1ýý le4i de. motieu soit rMYQY,4'ýà la izam, lkesofved: liat .t said n tice of otféti býe\" 41-Etant IU,-Pofdre du jout, :Pour 1 41izý-The ordêr-of the day beingtea-à to* ýe un avis de motion de' M l'échevin ointe,' à,]'efféf to d'ý.ý.mendcr le Règ1ement Xo .31ýý,1re. magasms de No. 356 ré Junk: stores. Sýr rdopoiltion de k l'éch. L. A. LA POINTEj appuyée par cil %notion of Ald I. A. tAFOINIre, M.- WARID, il est - 1 1 . ý . * Ald. WARD, à was Résolu. Que le Greffier de la- Cité reçoive itistructÎt34i de Resolved: irhat - the C'ity Ckrk bc i gttu rý4igcr un projet de règlement en conséquence, et de le th Y $OtL-: - hy4aw accordingly, and to submit mê*re à la C\u0026MMi\"ion de Législation pôur Qu'tile aPpf0Uý- :Iati,, Commiftce appro-yvo d 1 ' leffient dýV 31Èý, ledit projet de rég ant, cependant, Conserver verthtless texerainità rank on. or 40n re lordre du j'out. 4Z-1,1- lKrne 'ordre du jour étant lu, il est gn 4 e f8th orderai the dày bàýý rea\u0026 ýýdo4pi Soit biffé vu l'opinion du Dépa\"enje#f ýen 'Oiciéréd:' Tb bc struck,,ilà viéiv of' the LOi, gn dW,ýý, 301, aVriIý dernier. , , 1 - - .1 .1 . .1 La*. of fhe 3éth APYR lamf, 43-Les. ý9èM* et 2pème itèïil de Fordre du jour elirit Ittà,' ýnd 2oih,,orýdçrs of the, il est Résold, ; Que ýle\"Gjwiûtr de la Cité'teçbiVé iftýtrUctiorî 'de botvédi Týat' the Cify Clek be * des projetý ý4e règifflents CH: =Sëquencz et de es. Wla\" àdcordwgly,' aTi4:ý-f6 àive the sa inscrire sur Jetdfê du ymr,- 01,Lder Oîthe day. 44-Etartt lu l' dre du jour, à PCliet de lire une 1 ère, #.Oc -Th, er 2ýtuè et Uri ... 44, crd 3ëme fois un projet le. of the day being reed ÎIW -Réglement Na 504, te can1=8 a4tO' and 3rd reading of a by-law to amend ýUt0-truck8, 841d by-laW wa* accotdinely Le dit projet de: règlelhent Cst'en. goý -je jet -",
         "MUNIÇIFAL DE MONTREAL 023 MU141CIPAL SULLET1N OF MONTREAL tid- de M l'éch. BOYD, appuyée par M. l'écli. On motion of Ald. BOYD, seconded by Ald. L. A. LA- INTE, il e*st POINTE, it was spended and that said Que la Règle 84 soit suspendue et'que ledit Pro Resolved: That Rule 84 bc su 'n'ent soit maintenant lu une 2ème et une 3ýme by-law bc now read a second and third time. Procède alors à l'ét ude dudit projet de règle- The Council thereupon proceeded to consider said by- lecture, et les section$ 1, 2, 3 et 4 étant lues, law in second reading, and Section$ 1, 2, 3 and 4 being read, the saine were agreed to. cvi il Ward, dissident.) (Ald. Ward dissenting.) et de règlement est ensuite lu une 2ème fois et Said by-law was then r . ead a second time and agreed, t.o. ard, dissident,) (Ald. Ward dissenting.) ý'tiÔn de M. l'éh. BOYD, appuyée par M. J'éch. 'On motion of Ald. BOYD, seconded by Ald. L. A. LA- IXNTE, il est POINTE, it was 'J'41e ledit projet de règlement soit maintenant lu Resolved: That said by-law bc now read a third time. Itit de règlemcnt est alors lu une 3-11nz fois et Said by-law was accordingly read ?L third time \u003e and agreed to. Ward, dissident.) (Ald. Ward dissenting.) 11311 de M. l'éch. BOYD, appuyée par M. l'éch. On motion of Ald. BOYD, 5ecçnded by Ald. L. A» JýA- NTE, il est POINTE, it was e ledit règleme . nt soit numéroté, enregistré et Resolved: That said by-law bc numbered, entered and 'qeil 1,0;t revêtu du sceau de laCité, signé par copied at full length, and that it bc sealed with the seal of Çiref fier de la Cité et déposé sous la garde du the City, signed by the Mayor and City Clerk and depo- ci:téý sited with City Clerk for security. lu Fordre'du jour (a) à l'effet de prendre en ý 45.-The order of the day being read to consider (a) -ý19'ra'Dport du Bureau des Commissaires, re cons- report from Board of Con-imissioners re erection of'a lpa$srrrlle zuýdessu5 de larue Vijiet, ledit rap- bridge across Vinet street, said report was filed of record; ýa'Ux archivrs; (b) à l'effet de lire une ière, (b) ist, 2nd and 3rd reading of a by-laýv to amend By-law c 3èmé fois un projet de règlement amendant -NO- 547 re Thomas Davidson Mfg. Co., said by-law was '547, re \"Thos. Davidson Mfg. Co.\" accordingly read a first time. ýý'rèeleMent est en conséquence lu une ière tic de, M. I'kh. N. LAPOINTE, appuyée par On motion of Ald- N. LAPOINTE, secondcd.by Ajd. ONNELL, il-est - - O'CONNELI, it was e'4 Règle 84 soit suspendue et que ledit pro- Resolved: That Rule 84 be, Ouspended and that said e\"t%$.Oit n1zintcnant lu Une 2èrnc et une 3ème by-law be inow read a second and -third tizne. ýý-ëdc 41ors à l'étude deit projet de règle- The Council thereupon proceeded tc, co nsider said by- P.t4re, et la section i étant lue, elle est agréée. law in second reading, and. ýigJenîent est ensuite. lu une 2èrne' fois et Section , being read,, the same mas agreed to. Said by-law was *en read a second titne and agreed to. n de M. l'éch. N, LAPOINTE, appuyée par On motion of Ald. N. LAFOINrE, seconded by Ald. tLL\"-il--est O'CONNELL, it was l,ýdit projet de rZglemeiàt soit maintenant lu Resolved: That said by-law bc now rèad a thîrd bine. '491-'téSlement est alors lu une 3ème fois et Said by-law \"à' acéordingly read a third time and agreed to. 01, de.M l'éch. N. LAPOINTE, appuyée par On motion of Ald. N. LAPOINTE, secèiidçd by Ald. il est O'CONNELL, it was -P'l'eý ledit règlement soit 'numéroté, enregistré et -Resolved: That said by-law -bc nurnbéred, etitèred and *01t, re vetu du- sceau de la Cité, signé par copied at full length, and that it bc $ealed with the scal of de la cité et déposé sous la garde du the Cit-ir. signed by the Mayor and 'City Clerk and dePo- Cité sited with City Clerk for security. 14 l'ordre du jour, à l'effet de lire une ière, 46.-The order of the day being read for the ist 2nd and ýc ýèMe fois un projet de règlement régissant 3rd reading of a by-law to regulate buildings on Cherrier -qlzs édifices sur la rue Chetrier, street, said.by-la.w was accordingly read. a first time. tde rèeement est en conséquence lu une ière dý M. l'éch. DUBEAU, appuyée par M. On motion of Ald. DUBEAU, sec jonded by Ald. DE- est. NIS, it was la P - pended. -and that said _41e 84 soit suspendue et que ledit pro Resolved: That Rule 84 be sus t StAt maintenant lu une 2èmeet une 3éme bY-law be now read a second andiffird time. 1)e4ýCIède alors à l'étude dudit proiet de règle- The Coûneil thereupon rocteded to consider said hy-. letUrc, et la section i étant lue, elle est agréée. law in sec6ndýreading, anf de règlement est ensuite lu une 2èmc fois et Section i being read, the same was agretd tO. Said by-taw \"s then rýad a ftcdn.d.ti.me knd air\"d Pàý on dtý M. l'éch. DUBEAU, appuyée par M. On rnotiýn of Ald. DUBEAU, se . COU\u0026d, by Ald. DE- est ýqIS, It was 111dit 1 projet, de rýgle=ent soit maintenant. lu ke.,tolvéd. nat siid bý,law be ýftaw CWd a thi rd 1 tit\"t,, règlement égi aloi ýs et said a thltd tiftte \u0026»d 8 lu une 3ýmL\u003e 101 by-iaw wu *QÇ.Qrdîngly rcad agr Ille \"d toý",
         "eULLEMN -MUNICIPAL, DE MONTREAL MUNICIPALBULLETIN -Sui* prQýosition de M. Eéch. DUBEA'tj, ýappupée par M.' J ()n -motion EAU, secondêd' l'éch. DENIS,,if est n of. ýAld. DUB NlS, it was, Résolu:_ ledit rýglem euý,'_, soit num\u0026oté,_ enregistré et Resolved: -That said by-làw bc r . iumbe copié au long, -qu'il - séit revêtu du. £ceau de la Cité, sigrzé -par cWed at fýlI Ienith, and: that it bc sealed le Maire et le Greffier de la Cité et déposé sous la garde du the City, signed by the Mayor and City -Greffi.er,-de. la -Cité. sited ýv-th City Clérk'for security. 47--Etant lu l'ordre du jour, à l'effet de-lire une ière, une 47.-Theôrder of the day being -read for',*6 2èMIý Çt-gPe -3èMe, fois un proict de rèeemerit amendant le 3rd readin-g of a by-law to amend By-laW\u003e N , , - Rè;ýlement No 50, re vitesse des C'hevatix -sur le cl,-emin--de ing on Lachine Road, sad by--llaw ww aa ss aace ce - Lachine. a first time. Ledit projet de règlement est en conséquence lu une- ière, iois. 48-Etalit lu l'ordre du jour, à -l'effet de lire une lère, 48.-The order of the day being read for Utle.2èMe et'une.ý3ènle fois-,Un Projetde règlement amendant .3rd réading of a by-law tô arnend By-lae, le Aègleméni -No ý'È25 concernant le paiement d'une indemnité cerning the payment of an indemnity tO' à la famille de feu le pompier Trudel. late fireman Trudel, said by-law was ý accqrdý ýe dit projet de règlement est en conséquence lu une Iêre first time, fois. Stir piropësitiÔn ae 'M. l'éch. L A. LAPOINTE,,appuyéepar ôn motion of Ald. L. A. L AP011SITE, M. léch. C!CONNELL, il est Ald. O'CONNELL, it was Résolu: , Que la Règle 84 soit suspendue et que ledit pro- --Resolved: , That Rule- 84 bc suspendé, j \u0026:eèglement soit iiiâiiitenaet n lu 'Une, eème et ýpe ý3ème by-law be now read a second and third fois. Le Conseil procède alors' à l'étude dudit projet àe,.,.,règle, The , Council thereupon proceeded; te Wëiit en jème lecture. et le pf'éa\"ule, et lés ýéctI0ns 1 et :z law. in second readingi and étant lus, ils sont agréés. The preamble and sections i and 2 b i'Ving Ledit projet de règlement est ensuite lu. une ýèn1e f Ois et were agrecd to- Said by-law was then read a second, timl-, Sur proposition de M. l'éçh. L. A. LAFOJNTE, appuyée par On motion of Ald. - Lý ýA. LJýP0IN= ýM. l'éch, O'CONNELL. il est Ald, O'CCINNELL, it was -Résolu ' ý DIM ledit proi-et de- règlement sýit maintenant ju Iesolved: That said by-law 'bc now r une 3èrne foisý Ledit projet de règlement est alors la une àëMý fo's gaid . by-law Was accýrdingly- read e t agréé, agjýeed toý U ...-Sur Proposition de M. l'éch. L. Ai LAPOINTÈ, ée pat Cni 'tn'otion orf Ald. L. A. LAPOTIýZTF, M. l'éch. O'CONNELL, il est Ald.,O'CONNEIýL, it was 'Résolu. Que'lçdit règlement soit numéroté, enregistré, et Re'sè'lved. That said by-law-be nuilibére copié au.jong,.,Quil \u0026Qitý revètu du sceau de la C'té,- signé-par copîéd at full length, and thi(t ' ' be Èëaled' lé Mairc et le Greffier de la Cité et déposé sous la ga,0e du ýthe City, signed by the Mayor and CÎtY Greffier de la- Cité. -th City Clerk for security. 4qý-Les 23ème, 27ème et ý6èffieI ordres. du dur' étant lus, 4-The 25th, 27th and 36th orders 0ýý f il, est read, thé saffiewere .(_ý0Ydonné, Qu'ils soient biffés. Ordered. To be struck. ýSVr Dropositiov de- M.-réch - L. A.- LÀPQINýrË, appuyée par On motion of Ald. L. A. LAP0IN-7ý M.'l'éch. O'CO'-tTNELL, Ald. 0'lCONNELL, -£onseil sýgj ourrk, -4ourned The Couneil DAVM, Greffier ýIé f2ýýcitë. RENE BAUSET, -City, tjetlL. ïï ...... ...... A",
         "'e-ý)\u0026UNLC1PAL DE M'ONTREAL, U5 MUNÎCIPAL BULLETlN OF MONTREAL ý1ýýAU DES COMMISSAIRES BOARD OF COMMISSIONERS P! Üllu dé l'assemblé(ý du 3o avril igi5, a.m. Repoit of meeting held on the 3oth April igi5, a.ii s Present.- His Worship the Mayor in -Maire Président; MM. les Commissaire the. Chair, and Messrs. Hébert and Ainey, Commissioners. séTies de mandats, vérifiés par le Con- Subrnitted two ser'es of warrants, verified by the Citý 11Ç'de la Cité, au montant respectif dt $26,- Comptroller and Auduor, amounting respectively to -suiyalit listes cgrtifiées. 318.81, $7,2o6.5ýý, as per certified lists. le Commissaire Hébert, appuyée par On motion of Commissioner Hébert, seconded by Coin- r, Ainey, il est mi.ssioner Ainey, it was autoriser le paiement. Resolved: To authorize the payment thereof. 't'iOn'de M. le Commissaire Hébert, appuyée 2.-01-1 Motion of Commisýioner Hébert, , seconde« by, iý - saire Ainey, il est Uommissioner Ainey, it was 0, er les réquisitions suivantes. Resolved: To approve the follow'ng requýsitio11s. Nos 98, 89. Mun-.*cýpal Buildings: Nos. 88, 89. Markets: No, 41. 94, 95, 96, 97, 98, 99, 100, Io,, 102, Ioi, Parks: Nos. 87, 91, 94, 95, 96, 97, 98, 9), ioo, ioi, -i w, 103, 104, 105, 106. st4ie 1 -No Hýgýer1e and Statistics: NO. 3. 62, 6-3-_ Incineration: Nos. 62, 63. Police: Nos. 75, 76. ouest) No 32. Sewers ý (West Division): No. 32. Est): No 59. Road (East Division): No. 59. -Nýorà): Nos 171, 172, 171 Road (North Divýs:o1j): Nos. 171, 172, 173- 'TnIeterie: No 25. Printing and Statýonery: NO. 25. 'tiOn de M. le, Commissaire Hébert, appuyée 3-On mot;On of Cominissioner Hébert, sécoff dQ4 by iàsaire Aitiey, il est Commissioner Ainey, it was tOr tser le règlement des réclairÉations Reso:ved: That the follow,119 clailns.bè settled 9 ýdc Réserve,. Resérve Fund: 1%té G'l'aÊs',- - vitre brisée $47-40 tAoi. New York P:at' Glass--.Gla:ss broken ý$4 fi,1.\u0026 Power Co., - effets détrtiits 6.oo M. L. 1ý- \u0026 P. co.ý-'GOods déstroyèd 6.oo -chute 20.00 96os. J. R. E. Durecýher_Èall 20.00 perte de salaire Exoo 96o3. Eugène Fréchette Los$ Of salary 10.00 ''Sàbotiri,, - chute 40-00 9 1 587- Williain.Saboein-Fall 40ýO0 perte de salaire 20\u003e2.Î -962s.. Noé Patry-Loss of salary 26.25 Claims rejectedý 9571, 9459, 9540, 9588, 9539, 9459, 9561, 9552, 9540, 9475, 9582, 95e 96w, 9567, 9501, 94*75, 96o2, 9611, 9612, 9552, 9523. 9582, 9586, 9523. 't'on de M. le Commissaire Hébert, appuyée 4.-On motion of Coffimissioner Hébert, seconded b . y is-'Rire Aincy, il est Commissioner Aincy, it was riser le Surintendant, d es Achats e 1 t des Resolved: Tha t the Purchasifig and Sale§ Agirit 1 bé 5 perforateurs à ýiàeeài, tà ýOmPa\"g1iie author:zed to purchase 5 steara drMs frorn the Mussens, Prik de $17j.50 chacun. .ýLtd., at $172-50 each. ct etc . de ý M . le Com . r 1 niissai 1 re Hébér t pour 5.-Subtnitted the accoun t of Cornm- 1 s . s . ton .1 e r Iléb 1 ert fo r à .1ýçw-York, les 28 et 29 -avril courant, en his travelling ýxpenses to NewY-oýrk; on the 28th and ýý9.th rutit de $6,ioooào. April Înstant, in conÉect; en. with the - loan of de M. le çomrnissaire Ainey, appuyée par n mcdian of Commissîoner Ainey, secohded by- com- fïýkit. il est nfissionerliébert it was -er.::Ie paiement dudit-compte,,-au montant Resolved: To authorizé the payme-nt,ý of: said account amounting to $71. un rap ý6ý(26o8ý) Submitted pijrtý frïew the 'City Cý6tnp-. dit, Contrèleur et Auditeur des relevés dés dépcfik.sý des délègz- trol-er ane, A114itor,,-,transuzit stattui fs of. the le,%.,aùbéei 1913, 1914 et 1915, penses of the delegatons to-ýýInligIbcc, ducinng, qýc years 1913'.1914 a ýÔn rmition of CommissionerýHéb M 9tcon Y7 le Commissaire Mýert, appuyée'p r Cà=' est VOýr le t Resoýved- Thaý Wd report bé reeeived. unt. coMMýMxcat1on, de, Pel*h 7,----ýe6649?, SoUmitted e\u0026 ù r ý P ecé,of\"lazid, dî pompie Wý f1ýt the crutipu qi 4 polijee",
         "BULLETIN MUNICIPAL DE MON'PREAL M MUNICIPAL BULLETIN. Or Sur proposition de X le Commissaire Hébert, appuyée par On'motion of Commissioner Hébert, secO M. le Commiesaire Ainey, il est missioner Aincy; it was Résolu: De, référer au Chef du Départernei . it des Incen- Resolved: 1 That the saine be.referrrd t*,, dies, et au Surintendant de Police pour rapport. the Fire Department aný t, the Chief of lO port. Les minutes sont approuvées. The minutes were confirmed, 8.-(05762) Soumis un rapport du Trésorier de la Cité, 8.-(26762ý Submitted a report ftOm the recommandant de faire voter les crédits nécessaires pour rer, recommending that the necessarý a r payer le prix d'achat des lots Nos subdivisions 374-375 du voted to pay the purchase price of lots NOs1ý, tel- lot NO 400, village de la Longue-Pointe, vendus par le Shé- ý75 of lot NO- 400, Villa c of Longue Pole, rif, le ý-- du mois d'avril. 5herff on the 22nd Apri e CO Sur proposition -de M. le Commissaire Hébert, appuyée par On motion of Commissioner Hébert se 7p K ýe Commiseaire Aincy, il est mis5ioner Aincy, ît war, Résolu: De voter à même le Fonds de Réserve, rur les Resoived: To vote ex-Reserve Ftindý. fins mentionnées dans ledit rapport, une somme de 469, reý mentioned in said report, a sum of sc6ý,.r pýése;itant le coût desdits lots, cost of said lots. 9--(26775) Soumis un rapport du Surintendant des g.-(26775) Submitted a report f rom Achats et des Ventes, recommandant la remise à M. joseph and Sales Agent, recommending that, Daignault, d'un dépôt de $27.5o, en rapport avec la démo- gýauJt be refunded à deposit of $27,5dU14ýý: lidon dÙne certaine bâtisse. with the d'molition \u003eof a building. Sur proposition de M. le Commissaire Hébert, appuyée par On motion of Commissioner Hébr-rtý 'If 59 M. le Comminaire Aincy, Il est mîssioner Ainey, lit was Résolu, D'autoriser I;î remise, dudit dépôt, Resolved: That sad deposit bc refiCie, 1oý(M763) Soumis un rapport du Trésorier (le là Cité, 10.-(26763) Su.brii'ýtted a report fr6rn ýtl1c', demandant l'autorisation de déclarer que la dette de la \"Tooke rer, àskinLy' for authorization to malce Er S. Pý, Ltd.\", en vertu du Règlement No 105 de la Ville that the debt of the Tooke, Brog. de, Saint-Heiiri, est maintenant régléc à $9,000. oÉgBy-law No. io5 of the Town of for $9,oco. Sur proposition de M. le Commissaire Hébert, appuyée, par On motion of Commissioner Hébert, 0e 14. le Commissaire Ainey, il est missioner Ainey, it was Résolu: De recommander au Conseil d'accorder l'autori- Resolved: That a report be made. tO sation demandée. mend'ng that.sald authorization bc gmnt (26781)' Soumis lin rapport du Surintendant des 11.-(26781) Submitted a report froln Achats et des Ventes, fecommandant la remise, à MM. Me- and Sales Agent, recommendiýg that Coll B - ros. \u0026 Co.. dýun dépôt d2 $i2o, en rapport avec la four- Bros. \u0026 Co. bc refunded a deposit of $1-4'\" niture d'huiles, durant.l'année 1914. nection with the contract for the $UPPIY, 1914. Sur vroesition de M. le Commissaire Hàert, appuyée par On motion of Commissioner Éc'btrt, à,ýeçQ M. le Commissaire Ainey, il est missioner Ainçy, it was 'Résolu: IYautoriser la remise dudit dépôt. RcsoIvedý. That said deposit bc riifppo. 1,2.-Soumis le dossier, au suiet de la réclamation Patrick 12.-Submitted the documents anerit Hàrrîgaîi, ýpour accident, lorsqu'il travaillait pour la Ville. rigan's claim, owin to an accid\"i whiéÉ''b.4 the Cg workingfor ty. Sur proposition de M. le Commissaire Hébeit, appuyée par On motion of Çomiiiiseioner Hébeft M. le Coifimissàîre Ainey, il est missioner Ainey, ît was -Résolu: D'autoriser le règlement de ladite réclamationi à 'Regolved- That Wd claim bc settled même le Fonds de Réserve, sur paiement au deniandeur dýuiic by payiùg to thé plantiff a sum of somme'de koco et de donner instructions au Tr sorier de é. City Treagurer be instructed to réquýrea ýla Cité (Vèxiger une quittance finale'. claim. 1jý--,'-(26779ýý Sovnýis un rapport du Département en Loi, 13ý(26770 SubmItted a report from au sujet de lz Mêlamation. 103. 1ýOd*ntsk4 vg La Cité de inent,.,ançnt a clainai from JO$ Montreal, pOùrý 4 îW ýfor dàtnàgës. Sur proposition de Mi. le Commissaire par On motion of Cammislio=r1lébertý# lc _ Çqý.iMiss;iire Aitiey, il est missioner Ainoy, it.was ..Réelu:,,--D'autoriser le règlement de ladite réelqmattoil, à Resolved. Thut . saidt c 1 laliai te .1méihele ronds de Réserve, sur paiement au . demandeur d'un4, by pýyinf; to the pluintîff the suffi of $ý75, $onirne ýdç. $7s\", sans frais.,- '14.-(267.-g) ýýumi5 un rapport du ýuriîite1idant des X4----ý(ý6754ý S11bmîttcd a report froM, Aehatg erdes, Vehtés. recommandant là remise. à là e'Canadà dent of purçýhase âOn .,Sales., rzco ýron. Corporation Ltd.\", d'une -balance de dépôt, de $2..o ' en 'nada Iron Corporat!on Lpi. be're 1ýAppprt avec le contrat pour la fourniture \u0026 tuyaux en font'e, the deposit made by them in con ection diirant l'gnxiçe. igi4. traici for the stipply or etst iron p'Pe8 1914, natnely: 45a. Sur propOsition de M, le commissaire Hébert appuyêe par On motion of Comrni\",onc.r llé,btst, 0M Ainéy. il en Aîne),\u003e it w4s D'autoriser la rettIL-e dudit dépft Rgsolvéd: rO concur'in saie r(cotumeriO 5--'(26740, 26741) Sournises deux communicatîons,ýu 15-(26740-26741) Stbinitted t-vý'O 'c0n1tý ' ' \"I'é, Pro9fèg Duvrier\" et du ý \"Club OwvrW Mont- 4). the new.ipap« \"Le er(ýzrè\u003es e0417 1Semý4a\u0026 d'être mis sur I\u0026 liste de.:ceuxýe rce- Motilit Royal Labor Club', asking that ven the list of tho,%e to whorn the ýcýpe\" t le Mail- Sur à mý le, Commimiré'.Hébért appuyee par On M vo est mlïiî1ýrier Abieý, It wan Réolu; De. ré f ýàù \"BýilL-bn Munýçip 1keeolvcdý To refer the, saWeý to eb avec. instructiOOedc fair drJGýit ýàrý' deîaý '.:. Munidfpai liultetih etÈ îrrstiuctions të",
         "ilv MUNICIPAL DE MON'fREAL 627 MUNICIPAL BULLETIN OF MONTREAL rôleur et Au- 16.-Stibmitted warrants, verified by the City COmP- es mandats, vérifiés par le Coilt Cilë,\u003e au montant total de $69,7W.48, suivant liste troller and Auditor, aggregating $69,790-48, as Per certified list. bitill, de M. le Commissaire Hébert, On motion of Commissioner Hébert, se issâire Ainey, il est appuyée par missioner Ainey, it conded by Coin- Antori.%er le paiement. Resolvea: To authorize the payment thereof. ý310U-ise une interpellation de M. l'échevin 17.-(26771) Submitted a question put by Ald. Vandelac ý'-ýUîet de l'installation d'une clôture en fer, au- anent the erection of an iron fence around the basin in de, la Ferme Fletcher. Fletcher's Field. n de M. le Commissaire Ainey, appuyée par On motion of Commissioner Ainey, seconded by Corn- te Hébert. il est missioner Hébert, it was e référer au Surintendint du l'arc Mont-Royal, Resolved: To refer the saine to the Superintendent of Mount Royal Park for a report. s'O U IS.-(2676i) Submitted a report from the Superinten- àatrnis un rapport du Surintendant des - ar- l'achat de 5o pieds de boyaux à incendie, dent of Markets, recommending the purchase of Bo feet !ÉýÈ abords du Marché Bonsecours. of fire hose to wash the approadhes of Bonsecours Mar- ket. On (le M. le Commissaire Ainey, appuyée par On motion of Commissioner Ainey, seconded, by Corn- 'ýaire Hébert, il est missioner Hébert, it was ,'ýýtéférer au Chef du Département des Incen- Resolved: To refer the saine to the Chief of the Fire ý\"b'r S'il lui est possible de fournir lesdits boyaux. Department, in order to know whether he is in a position to supplv sa:d hose, .'SOUMiS Un rapport du Surintendant des Mar- ig-(26693) Submitted a report- from the Superintetl- 'dant l'achat de '3 fontaines-abreuvoirs, pour dent of Markets, recommendi-ng the purchase of 3 dirink- r*Eclours. ing fountains for Bonsecours Market. tion de M. le Con, missaire Ainey, appuyée par On motion of Commissioner Aincy, seconde-à by Com- ýire Hébert, il est ri-iissioner Hébert, it was référer à l'Architecte de la Ville à au Direc- Resolved: To refer the saine to the City Architect and Ï, Municipal d'Hygiène et de Statistique, pour the D'rector of the Hygiene and Stat.istics Departinento for a report. 'ýýaire McDoilald prend son siège, Cornýaissioner McDonald took his seat. 2o.-Subrnitted reports, from Supe \u00263 rapports du Surintendant des Parcs, re- the rintenderit of vote de certains crédits. Parks, recommending that certain appropr'at*ýons bc voted. air de M. le Commissaire Ainey, appuyée par On motion of Commissioner Aieey, ýsecondËd by Com- e Hébert, il cet missioner Hébert, it was recommander au Conseil le vote des crédits Resolved: To recommend to Colancil that the f 01low- ing sums bc voted: de travaux permanents, , à la i' For the carrying out of permanent w6rksy s ý r 1 e Parc Baldwin .. ._. .. .. .. bv day labor, on Baldwin Park ., _ .. .. $4275 ution de travaux permanents, à la 2' For the carrying out of permanent works, Illf k Parc Monahan .. _ .. .. .. by day labor, on Monahan Park - - .. .. .. 1,000 *écution de travaux Permanents, à la 3' For the carrying out of permanent works, Sur le Pare otre-Dame de Grâces 750 by daylabor, on Notre-Dame de Grâces Park 750 de trà'Vaux permanents, à la 4' For the carryiiig out of permanent'works, sur le terrain de jeux, rue St-Ferdi- by day labor, on playground, St. Ferdanand ý.- ý ý i .. .. ., ý. - .. .. .. .. .. 11550 street 11550 UtiOn de travaux permanents, à la 5' For the carrying out of permanent works, le terrain de jeux, Parc Dufferin 820 by day labor, on playground, Dufferin Park 82o sur i de travaux perrrianentg, à la 6' For the carrying out of permanent works, e terrain de jeux, Pare Gallery 410 by day labor, on playground, Gallery Park 4iO 1011 de travaux permalierfts, à la 7 0 For the carry-ing out of permanent worke, k terrain de jeux, Marché à Foin 6o5- by day labor, où Playground, Hay Market utict de travailx permanents, à la 8' Fer the carrying out of permanent work4, sUr . le Parc Monk, quartier Émard 175 by day labor, on Monk Park, Emard Ward 1,75 on de travaux permanents, à la 9 For the carrying out of permànerit works, \"Ur le Pare ThibaUdeau 165 by day labor, on Thibaudeau Park 165 iio'n de travaux permanents, à la ici' For the carryin . g out. of permanent works, - le terrain de jeux, dil Carré Pa- b day labor, on playground, Papineau 580 yquare 580 utiOn de travaux perMMents, à la Il' For the catr-ýing out of perwallent warke, ZUT le terrait, de jeux, 'du Parc La by day labor, on playgrouTrd, La Fontaine Park de travaux permanents, à la out of permanent wb-rks, LaFoutaine, (talus, ni- 12 For the Clartying ,eUt le Pare b'.7 daý labor,.otl La Fontaine Park (SIOPt, gamni etc.) 2,865 levelling, sod, etc.) .. .. .. .. ..... .. .2,865, taP Ott du Directeur du Bureau Municipal 2I.--Submiitted à report from the Inire'ctor-'c)f the _1Wý el recommandant le vote d'un cré- siene-and statistici lieparthient, rrtouittitnditig thut zf', Plans et devi\u0026, Pour l'HÔPitRI des appro riation bc. voted for illic PrePatafiën ëf- PWns efid, 'ép Zatione for the, proposed Tuberculosà Hutpitoi le COMMIssaire UcDonalà, »Pule motiod.of Çetàmissiaýtr Mc uolffldl -îte\"dM:1ý Ain'ey, T 1 -est Ainêy, it waà -'au Conseil le vote WM dý, 'ro recommend to C(xinail tbi\u0026t et I;rèparatiýon deplans P-réHmitlàilret. 'Pritti= oî e2,500 be veted fer tue prtparation of.1p\u003c nary plans.",
         "MUNICIPAL DE MONTREAL 'W ;MU NI CIPAL ý13ULLETIN'. \u003eM?7ý 'Soumis un rapport du Surintendant des '22.-(26827) Subm:tted a report fron'l Par cý, recommandant le vote d'un crédit de $1,875, pour la dent of Parks, recQmmending that. an- a.- construction de -puisards, 'nécessités par suite de l'étab1isseý $1,875 be voted for the constructic, ment de.4 châles de nécessité, dans l'Ile Sainte-Hélène. sitated by the establ:shment Of 4- 19 Island.' Sur proposition de M. le Commissaire Ainey, appuyée par On motion of Commissiolier Ain M. le c6rnrilissaire Hébect, il est ýniÏssiüner Hébert. if was Résolu: 'De recommander au Conseil le vote de-ladite Resolved: 'To rècoffimend io Coùýcil somme pour les.fins ci-dessus. voted for the abovê 1jurpose. 23._fi26826)ý .$,QUMiS Un rapport du 'Surintendant des 23.-(268.ý26) Submitted a report ýfr-_qn1 Parcs, re(forrunandant le vote d'un crédit de $2,5oo,. pour con- dent of Parks,_ recommetiding Ïhe, an aP ,tiner à-fairf, de nouveaux chemins dans l'I'le SaintèýHélène.ý $2,5oo be voted formaking nèw 'Island. Sýr Proposition de M. le Commissaire Ainey, appuyée par On motion if Commiss;oner Ainey, secO M. le Commissaire Hébert. il est missioner Hébert, it wag Résolu: De recommander au Conseil le vote de ladite Resolved: To recommend to couricil somme- pour les fins cidessus. voted for the above'purpà'se. 24-S.ur proposition de M, le Commissaire Hébert, apeiiyée 24-On, moton of. Commissioper-Héb par Me -Ie-Coininissaire McDoiiald., il est Cotnniissîôrier McDonald,,it was Résolu. ' Qûè les résolutions du Bateau, en date du 27 Resolved: That the résolutions of thýe, mars et du ig avril, 1915, à l'effet de recommander l'achat 'de certahis'lots pour l'ouverture 'de la rue Drolet, dé l'élar- date'Of 27th Marchý and igth April 19ý5, gissemçnt de la rue Saint-Denis, etc., soient reconsidérées ýet the purchase of certain lots for the OPenl sein é$ , street, the wdening of St. Denýs street, ee' -re ý,ýà.»utes fins que de droit. sidered and annulled to all intents and Pl\" Il est, en outre, Résolu Que rapport, soit fait au Conseil, récommandant It was further Resolved: That a - report be inade'to .que la résolution duConseil, à l'effet d'adopter un rapport -mending thai the résolution of Councl, du Bureau, en date du 27 mars 19,5, concernant l'achat de' port from. the Board under date o . f 27th' certains lots de M. S, G. Laviolette, soit reconsidérée et res- cernn - ý - 1 g. the...purchase of certain lot§ cindée. VIO ýýttý, be reconsidered and annulled. :25.ýSoumise une communication de la \"Canadian Autobus 25.-Suhm;tted a communication fran) Company, Limited\", invitant Son Honneur le Maire et les atives of the Canadiari Autobus CO Commissaires à les accompagner da \u003e ns une, promenade à. Woshib the Mayor and the Coffinii;,iollcrs Montreal. thern'ôn a drive through the City. Sur proposition de M. le Commissaire' McDonald, appuyée où motion 6f Commissîoner MýcDý\u003en' Par M., Ie. Commissaire Hébert, il est Commissioner Hébert, it was Résolu . . Dccepter ladite invitation, pour samedi, le ier \u003e R'esolved: Tô accept said in,-, -00 .,mai prochain, à 8 hYs p.m. ISt May next, at 8 o'clock p.m. SonHoilnçur le Maire donne instructions au Secrétaire - His Worship tfie Mayor instructed the d'inviter les -Echevins, à accompagner les Commissaires, dans vite the Alderrricii to wccomPanythe,11Çý' that occasion.- ý26 Soumis un rapport de l'Architecte de la Ville, 26--(251W Siibmîtte(f a ec ort fro Irecommmqdailt le vote d'un crédit de $3oo, pour démolir et tece, recommending that an aýppropriati0e,ý reconstruire le plancher de la chambre à fournaises etde edý to démolish and reconstruct the fl ý_la s9ûtiýý à1cliarbon, au Marché Bonsecours. réorn and of the coal shed, at Bonsecloi, -.:,.Sur proposition qe M, le Commissaire ýAiiiey; appuyée par On' motion ý of Commissioner Ain ty,.. ýe M. le Commissaire McDonald. tl est missioner M,-Ddnald, it was Pýé8o1u- -De recommander au Conseil de voter ladite : - Idontme pour-les fins ci-dessus, Resolired.ý To recommend.to Cpunýî1A iýoted- for 'the' atýùvé pùr ' s ý7«--ýZa ài1que de Montréal ayant reçu instructions. par : - r;ý 27.-The Bank of Montreal havý1ig résolution du Bureau, en date du 20 courant de demander fions, by resolutfon of the Board under ý-dé9 eoýrnieiàfis, à'u'noni de la Cité, Fur-l'achat de $6,100,006 tp éall for tenders, on befiàlf of the Cit3ý,- de bons et débentvres dont l'émission a, été \"Par ri résolution -du Conseil dé- la Ville de Montréal, lé 19. tbondi a d debentures to the amouiTt avril r - 'iéd by issue of 'Wh'ch was author courant les soumissions suivantes reçues par la BahqUe sont Council of Montréal, o ri the igth Ai)rý1 lowing tenders, réceived by the ýBanký MMý N. W. 8arris \u0026 Co.; Wood Gundy Company, , C, Messrs. X. W.' Harr:q \u0026 Co.. Wood, -Meredith Co., 1,td., - Prix: 98-83%, avec intérêt 'accm. Meredith \u0026ýCo., Ltd.,..- price; 98,8CI int-criest. William A. Reid \u0026 Co.; Leeý Higkinsori Cý1 lie Dominion Securities Corporation prix, 98.533%, Messm ý William A. Reid \u0026 Co*' The Doititiýon Securýties CO.;, av=,, intérêt -accru.ý âcerued, interesti ýKinnicut \u0026 Co., Pri, 7: q7ý713%, avec intérêt ýt \u0026 Co., Mesffl, Xisael, Kinnicu accrued iliterest. JKbuýdt'ze ]3tos.;' A. 13. Leach Co.; Spencer Trask Messrs, Kountze Brib's. X B L -W. Halsey \u0026 Co,, x 98--ffl%, avec Co. e.. W. 'lia i»t,6çét accru. accruedîtiterest, _;sui PrOPÇ\u003e\"On de Mý le Comfniuaire Hébert appuyée par 'étiét. Hi ber Off motion of çiýmàilsgl MzDonald, il ee misàioner MéDdhýlà, it wa:à ýRésýlu,:, Que ý ledit -e-ffiprunt de *100,0w soit -. tnainfenaàt. Regalved: That said ]ôan .. of 46 100 émis offre de MMýýN, WHarris \u0026,Co., Lic., Wood,, 'and thât ihe offer received froni Ný Gunî0Yý'\u0026 (ýp,, pour l'achat Wood, Gqndy \u0026 Co. and Cý M ,débentures,. au priX MMjtjOjýnj dansý leur soumis- -,b6ndg and, ýdits bons et taid ê s oir:ý e83ý7,,, avec ititéXêt ncem, soi av t.gcceptée,,ct tioËéd in ýfhËie t-endei; i wit 99 ri est, en outre,' rest, be eccepted; and it was jurther",
         "N'ýMtJNIÇIPAL DE MONTREAL M MUNICIPAL, BULLETIN OF MONTREAL ýQtýe1aýBanque de Montréal soit requise de remet d: That the Bank of Montreal be requested to Rels es to the unsuccessfui tenderers, ues1de dépôt des soumi ssi orin aires qui Worit pas 1Vfuný0lthee deposit chequ nirat et d'autoriser Son Honneur. le Maire et le and that His Wors'.hip the Mayor and -the City Treasurer ,eý la Uité à'signer, et le Contrôleur et Auditeur de be authorized to sign and the City Comptroller and Au- omiters:gn the said bonds or debentures, ,ý'COntTesigner lesdits bons cu débe 'tures dont les ditor to c the in- P ttront la signature lithographiéedu terestýcqýýpqns of which shall bear the lithographed s'_ 1. ité.or gnature 1 of the City Treasurer. YPPOsition de M. le Commissaire McDoriald, ap- 28-On motion of Commissiorier McDonald, secondied ýjAý le Commissaire Hébert, il est - by Commi-ssioner Hébert, it was '99e la séance soit ajournée à 3.oo hrs p.rn., ce Resolved: That the meeting bc adjourned -until 3 o'clock p.m. tliis day. L N. SENECAL, J. E. GAUTHIER, Secrétaire. Y.Çndu de l'assemblée du 3o avril igiS, p.m. Report of meeting beld on the 3ùth AP.ril 1915, P-111- r-lé Maire Président, MM. les Commissaires His Worshi 1 p the Mayor in the Chair, and 10 McDonalà. -lébert and McDonald, Conimissioners. 3itiOn de M. le Commissaire Hébert, appuyée 1.-On motion of Commissioner Hébert, secorided by Mniissaire Ainey, il est Commissioner Ainey,.it was corder les permis suivants et de fairer apport Resolved: - That the following perrhits be granted and n,-\u003enséquence: that a report be made to Council accordmg1y: POUr garder en place trois soûtes à char- (i) Fishel Ship, to maintain three coal shutes under le trottoir du Boulevard Saint-Laurent, en the sidewalk on St. Lawrence Boulevard, in front 'le, Nos 274, 276, 282; of Nos. 274-276-28:1; ýal Institution for the advanccment -of Learn- (2) The Royal Institution, for the Advancement of ýL1i1iversity McGill), pour garder en place deýX Learning (McG'11 University), to maintain. two à charbon, sous le trottoir de la rue Victoria, coal shutes under the sidelvalk, on Victoria gnOna de sa propriété, NO 228 rue Sherbrooke Street, opposite the gable of the:r, prernises, No. 326 Sherbrooke street WeSt; Dalbec, pour garder en place une entrée à char- (3) Alfred Dalbec, to mai \u003e ntain a coal shute under thç 'ýouS le trottoir de la rue Sainte-Catherine Est, - sidewalk on St. Catherine street Eagt in front 1ý du No ioo de ladite rue; of No. loo, said) street; Utchison. \u0026 Dickson, au nom de la sucnession Issrs. Hutchison and Dickson, on- behalf of the Fox Boxe to maintain two coal shutes toxer, pour garder en place deux entrée à (4) -Me ;t6n sou, le trottoir de la rue Bleury, en face de under the rsi= on Bleury Street, in front of riété, portant les Nos 346 et 35o de ladite rue. their property No. 68, said street; çýVÇ'rhill, pour garder en place une entr.e à (5) F. W. Caverhill, to maintain a coal shute under the Sous le trottoir de la rue Crescent, en face gidewalk on Crescent street, in front of-his.pro- PrOfitiété portant le No 68 de ladite rue; perty bearing No. 68, sa;d strect; e Robert Refort, Ltée, pour garder en place (6) Robert Reford Co., Ltd., to niaintain a hoist for \".nseur pour la cendre, une entrée à charbon ashes, a coal shute and a, vault under the side- 'ýOûte sous le trottoir de la rue Hôpital, en walk on Hospital street, ni frort of his, property sa propriété portant le No 2o de ladite rue; bearing NO. 20, said Street; InOnd Co., Ltd. , pour garder en place deux (7) The Redmond Co., Ltd., to maintaià two coal shutes à charbon, sous le trottoir de la rue des lus- under the sidewalk on Inspectors stFeet, In frànt 0 en face de sa propriété, portant le No 187 of their property bearing No. -187, sald Street;, te rue - 'P\"rd, -pour garder en place une entrée à char- (8) Joseph Picard, to maintain a coal shute undýr tht le trottoir de la rue St-jacques, en face de sidewalk on St. James Street, in front ' of pro .. - portant le No 1623 de ladite rue; perty bearing No. 1623, said Street- \u003cýtis-FeýSoM EleVýator C.O., Ltd.\" po 1 ur garder (9) The Otis-Fensorri ElevatoS- Co., Ltd - to Maýut2in lace Uue entrée à charbon sous 1 'le trottoir de a coàI shute under the sidewalk oý St. Jafnes eýýt-Jacques, en face de sa proprii'té, portant strect, in front of their property, Nb. 3ffl, said -368 dé ladite rue; Street; t 1 Lfd.\", pour garder en place une voûte ýio) The Mott Co., [,td., to maintaiti a'vault under the týrOt01r de la, rue Bleury, en face de sa pro- s'dewalk on Bleury Street, in frOht Of tÈeir pro- 'POrLtant les Nos 134 et 136 de ladite rue; perty, Nos. 134 àndý r36, Sàid Street; Dominion, succursale du Boulevard Saint- (ii) The Dominion Bank, b . ranch.on Stý Lawreùcp, Býôti- Pour \"rder en place une entrée à charbon, levard, to niaintàin.a. ccràl.shute undér.--the. side- t\"t-tdttoir de la rue Prince-Arthur Ouest, au walk, on Priuce Arthur Street West,'ýin fyÔnt Of de sa proprîétéý dont la fa de rte le No tht gable of their property, the fronta9c Of wh'ch ý1ýQu1evard Saint-Laurent; beUrs NO. 796.St,'Lawre.nce Êculevard1ý_ ie pa pour garderen place un (12) Roll 1 and Paper co to tnaint3àn a Zky4ight under ,\u0026 . rue Sairit- Ul, tteetý in frOpt of, t\"îr sôus le ttottoir, dé là the sidewalk. on Stý 'Fa s- itimiléer0olland ýf face de Sa.propriété, pýrtant le Nô 384 de property, No, 34 sa d street, 'P. Labelle; to nvaiiitain a pour prder cri P14ceurw entrée à itt SOUS' lè'.troUcir du BoÜlevý -sàint-t2,u. on -S face t le Nà 3j6 dit rty, No 336, de âa propriété, lier prope",
         "*UE t ýM M I A E M 1T E L80M ýIC P L B L E I 'F *. * *24 1 SO MS u a×r u D p t -néi u n 2 ( 58) S b itd a rp r r *hf -rn m tatc ran e si n m ns o cr atl T - E g n eta s itn eti n o ,ti ,ý cla m tio d e M . . P B l ck , te xpro ria ion d e a p op r été th cl i m o J . P . lac Te exp op r ati n * en r ppo t a ec 'éla gis eme t d Che in e l Cô e-de - i co nec ion ith the wi enin of C 'te d ee* * * Neiges Su rp sto e M e C m isie14 et p uy ep r O oi n o o m si n rH b rsc n M .~~~~~~~~~~~~ ~ le C m i s i e A n y l es i s o ê i e , i 'R é s l u : D e r a n m et r e ed i r a p o rt a u o n s il, a v e R é ol v d : T t r n s m t s i d ep o t t i C prè e d a n x r a o s e , d v n a C m i s o p c a e r q e t t a h a n c a n x d t h o du C nsel. efo e th Sp cia C o imit ee f C uncl. 3.-,265 7) oum s u ra por d u épa tem nt n L i, .-( 6517 Su mit ed re ort fro th su a d m n ed e ied o e e M i oh é et e t n t e a p i ai n f o n M .T m t é I *xmtdfo pyn et S u r r o p sit o n d M . l e o m m s s ai e A n e y a p u y é e p a r O n o ti tt o C o m i s i o n r A i e y , s e c nd* * . l o m s a r , H b r , i e tm s i n r H b r , i a Rêsouý e rfére au Dép rte ent n L i p ur appot R sol ed: Thatthe sar e b ref rre to th; s u e m r t - e l u s i n a t e n o e o t o h e i s o h *.S u p r p st o d e M e C m i s i e H b r , a p y7 4 - n m t o f C m i s o é e t ;a *. ;eC m i s i e A n y l e t o m s i n r i e , i R é o u u a s a c o t a O r é \u003e u 3 m i p o h a n e o v d h t t e m e i g b d o r l f a, hr 4.m rq Ma eT tii oco k a 44 * 4 y 7.*a",
         "N'MUNICIPAË DE MONTREAL ai MUNICIPALBULLETIN --()Fý CITY COUNCIL CONSEIL MUNICIPAL Report of monthly meeting held on the ioth May 1915. 'ýri'l1du de l'assemblée mensuelle du 10 ma7l 1915- le Maire, M. Médéric MartÀn, occupe le fau- His Worship the Mayor,, Mr. M. Martin, in the Chair. Pýésidence. MM. les échevins L. A., Lapointe, N. La- Présent: Ald. L. À. \"pointe, N. Lapointe, Ward, ard, O'Connell, Létourneau, Boyd, Bastien, May- O'Connell, Létourneau, Boyd, Bastien, Mayrand;. Tu.rcot, elt, Macdonald, Giroux, Blurnenthal, Larivière, Macdonald, Giroux, Blumenthal, Larivière, Houlé, Mé- nard, Rubenstein, Vandelac, Loranger Rubenstein, Vandelac, Loranger, Hushion, Hushion, Dubeau, Shtrrien Denis, Chartrand, Elie Rochon, Barbeau, Therrien, Denis, Chartrand, Elýe, Rochon, Barbeau, Du- il3lé, Èavergne, et MM. Aincy: Hébert et McDo- bois, PauLé, Lavergne, and Messrs. Ainey, Hébert and ssaires. McDonaid, Commissioners. ces est lu et adop- The minutes of the two last sitting weeeý'verba1 des deux dernières séan s were.read andcon- firmed. lieur le Maire ayant quitté la salle du Conseil, M. His Worship the Mayor having left the council Chani- ,e4cdoriald, Maire-Suppléant, occupe le f auteuil, ber, Ald, Macdonaldj Acting Mayor, took the Chair'. \"PORTS, )ýýréaU des Cor i.-From Board of Commisýioners, for an appropria- nmissaires, à l'effet de voter un c à 314X pour la reconstruction des'logernelits ýon of $9,314.36 to reconstruct employees' dwelling, Wa- '14 l'Aqueduc. terý.workspo)epartment. Port est retiré, vu qu'il ne porte la signature que aid re rt was withdrawn, inasmuch asthe same 0111Y bore two signatures of the Board of Commissioners. seulement du Bureaudes Commissairesý. -From, Board of Teau des Commissaires, demandant un crédit d.e Corfimissioners, for an 1LPPrOPrýa- construire un égout dans la rue Terrebotint. tIOn Of $7,6ao for the construction of a sewer in lerre- bonne street. On remi. à la demande de M. l'échevin Giroux. Considération deferred at the request of Ald. Giroux. ,-eue,2au dee Commissaires, à l'effet de voter un cré- 3.-From Boatd of Commi9giorLers, for an apPrôPr.19- Pour la pose d'un égout dans la rue Château- tion Of $1200 for the Construction of a sewer in, Châteatl- guay strelet. 'tion.de M. l'éch. L. A, LAPOINTE, appuyée par On motion of Ald, L. A. LAPOINTX, seconded by F., il est Ald, ELIE, itwas ledit rapport soit reçu et adopté. ResQlved- That said report be reccived and adopted. 'Surtau des Commissaires, à Veffet de voter un cré- 4--From Board of Commissioners, for an appropria- te conduits souterrains. tion cd $25,0w re underground conduits. ition de M. l'éch. L. A. LAPOINTE, appuyée par on motion of Ald. L. A. 4APOINTE, seconded by est A.1d. WARD, it was Que ledit rapport soit reçu et adopté. fteaolved: Th4t said report bereceived and adopted. Ibuilau des Commissaires, à l'effet de voter un, Cfé- 5.-Frorn Board of Commi9sioners, for an appropria'- Pour évaluer le matériel aérien de la \"ýNtôlaCeal tiOn Of $400 tO value aerial material of Montreal Light, Power CO.\" Heat \u0026 Power Co. 4iOn de M, l'éch. 1- A. LAPQINTF, appuyée par On motion of - Ald, L. A. LAPOIIJTE, seconded by RI), il est Ald. WARD, it was Que. ledit rapport soit reçu et adopté à la Coli- Resolvedi: That said report be received and adoptëd, Me que,. pour aucune considération, le crédit de condÎtionally however that, under no circurnstancès, shali excédé. the -ppropriation of $4oo he exceeded. au , des Cornmissaîres, à l'ef fet de voter uz 6.-From Board of Commissioners, for ark ap rôPria- pour recouvrir d'asphalte une partie de la tion of $3w to asphalt a portion of Fortification %\"ne. tcm de M. l'eh L: A. LAPOINTF, appuyée par On motion ot Ald. L A. LAPOINTE, secoftled hy il est ' 1 Ald. BOYD, 't was ledit . rapport -soit reçu et adopt\u0026 Resoived: That said report be r\"ved. and adOP\" issaires, à- l'eff - Vary a Sulla éat del) COMM et d'Opérer,ýÇ V'. 7.-From. Bi\u003eard of Commilisioners, tO tant de $4ôo, re plant de filtration. $4oo re filtration plant. dt bLi'éch. L A. LAPOINTE, appuyée par On imption of Ald. 1- A. LAPOINTE deemed by, Ux 1l'egt Ald. GIROUX, it was ledit rapport soit renvopé à la Commissim Resolved: Thatsaid repoet be -reÏatred to the se'epla e:li 19 avtil dernier en ripport avec certâiiies camülttce appeinted OÈ the jgth April ta ' st te look înt*,ýý licernant FAqueduc; certain questions concerning the Aquedott, w des Cominlo\u0026aires,ý à 1'ýffet de voter un .8 -From 13aard of ommisoioilers, foIr au àýllproptilg- s4iss Pour payer les onoraires de 14ý F.- sý tiow 0 f $3,561 3Eý t'ô pay ices qi M eý F., Mackly\" X. remise à la demande de M. l'échevin Lavergre. cGhsider1Lti,ýn deferred:4t the irequest Of Ald, t4- u certaili ,,additionnels, re crédit\u003e de Uow pour nformation, re",
         "lýMNICIPAL MONTREAIL :632 eiJLLUT--lf4 A9ý Sur proposition de M. l'éch. L. A. EAPOINTE, app-iyée par On motion of Ald. I. A. LAPOI'NTE,,ý-sc M. l'éch. GIROUX, il est Ald. GlROUX, itwas.', Résolu: Que ledit, rapport soit -amendé en remplaçant les Resolved: Trat 'gaid relyort biz am-ended\" 6Y ,-chiffres $3ý ow dans ledit rapport bar leschiffres $2,ooo et the figure $3,0ob in saïd te*Ort-by' thé.'Éàum que, ainsi amendé, ledit rapport soit reçu et adopté. that, so amended,, sa'd report Le receivedan\u0026.':\"aý Io.-Du Bureau' des Commissaires, à l'effet de voter un Io.-From Boerd.of Co'«m-rnisl,,iohers f'or\"an- crédit 'de $3,ooo pour engager des employés temporaires pour tion Of $3,000 to engage temPorary ý11eks,,_FÎr!-' ,.Ie.,Dépaàement des Finances. partment. Sur propQsition de M. l'éch. L A. LAPÔINTE,' appuyée par On motion of A . Id Iý A LAPOINTF,, ý0stÇ '%1. J'éch. Q'CONNELL, il est Ald. O'CONNELL, it was ýËéscýtu: ýýQùe ledit rapport soit rejeté, vu que ce\u003e Conseil \"Résôlcéd: That sa:dl report bê rejectqdl ge considère qu'il y a. actuellement assez d'employés dans, le consider that there are sufficient emplo'3ýees ln ]Département du TrésOrier pour faire le travail additionnel surer's Department ta perform' this additionO exigé. ýi.-Du Bureau d es Commissaires, à l'effet de voter un i i.-From, Board of Conimissioners,' for- aA creditde $2,ooo pour réparations aux pompes... tiOn Of,$2,00040t repairs ta p,ýimps. Spr p-ropositiopde M, l'éch. L. A. LAPOINTE, appuyée par Ald. L. A. LAPOINTFLî M, l'éch, OUX, ýil est Ald. GIROUX,.it was t _JýÏýôlu'-: Qàelédit rapport soit renvoyé à la Conimi\u0026sion -kesolved: Thýgt_,s1aid- report bc referred ta \u003c _Spýci 1 - - ' \" animée le ig avril dernier en rapport Committee appointed on the igth April lastsýtQ'., avq 'cqýtai1ýÇs -ques.tions, concernant I!Aclueduc. ers concerning.the Aqueduct. - 'î:ý ýýzLýý ùrÉau -dés Commissaires, demandant un crédit\"de 12i-From' -Board of,ýCOr=issiùneîrs, for a ngent de l'Assistance Municipale. t;O 'l'$40Ô POUile C mi il of $500 for Contingent Fund, Mvnicipýa1 Surprcpbsition de M. l'éch. L. A. LAPOINTE, appuyée par On motion of Ald. L. A. LAIPOINTF, \u0026qý M Yéèh. LETOURNEAU, il est Ald. LETOURNEAU, it was Résolu: Que ledit rapport soit amendé en rempiaçant les, 1 Resôlved: That saýd report be amended W çý.1iffrés $5m mentionné dans ledit rapport par les chiffres the figure.$5,oo.iri said report by the figUre, $zpo. et, qu-é, ainsi zjmendé, ledit rapport soit reçu, et, adopté. sa aMe;rý sa- e received and ad4 i3.ýDu Bureau dès Commissaires, 1 l'effet. de puyer cer- i2.-From Board of Commissiûner\u0026ý ta pAY ;tZins comptes au. montant de $2245.6o pour l'entretien- des bar-. ceunts amounting tOý$254J60 for maintenance là CompàeiC- du Grand-Tronc. Crand Trunk Railway Co. -Sur ýprý tion. de M. l'éch. 1,Aý. IýAPQ1NTE, itppuyée, par ý-,,.On motion of Ald. L. A.- LAPOINTE, sec st Ald. Lrýrq il _uPN Au, if was Ré,olu: Que 1édit rapport - soit rejeté. Resbi'ved:' \"Phat said report be rejected... id,-Du Bureau des Commissaires, répondant ýà une ques- 14., Fr( -i Board cf.\u003eCominýs'ýiàflýeýs,-r-èeyitiý5' .,tiqq, re construction d'une clôture sur la Ferme -Fletcher. tion re constructionof a-fence; Fletcher's position dr M. l\u003eéch, L. A. LAPOIN1*rý, appuyée.par 5jar pro 'On mo'iQn of Ald. 1- A. - LAPOINTE,ýt M., -l'éch. MAYRAND ' il est Ald. MAYRAND, it was re,-çtt-êt.(ille copie-,cn- 'soit bé récei-ýedýu1f transmise à M J'échevin Vandelac. copy thereof be transmitted to Ald. Vandelar. 15-ýDu Bureau des Commissaires, à l'effet d'inscrire la l5.-Frern-Eýoard rue- Marsan au r,égistre des rues publiques. street as a.,public Areet. 'liélii;ératioii.'re'm'ise à la demande de M.-l'échevi Chýr-1 Cons'derai,'ori defer'ýe4, at n, the request ai ýAld_ i6ýDu .13ureau des Commissaires, à l'effet de s'adres seT , oiri' Board of Commiss-onérs, ta RpPlYý , térË-fConseil Pour obtenir ÉUtoÈi- Lieutenant-Goyernor in. 'Council _re O1peýn g it9tion d'ouvrir, là tue, Drolet.. Pélibers reinise à la demande de. M. l'échevin Lý, X, ýcohsidëratioii d' eques f poiiifé. dës- 'B6âd -of, CdàM,1-SÉtoilcri,: te à\u0026 'off re dé M. li. Pelletîem, de céder parties des ýrvè§, of Me. Er. PellÉtier to cede ortons oeVýîv1 . . - - . - - 1 .. = _ller, ý : i -P etc1ý-' Sur propositicfý4e M. Vêch. L A. LAPOINTE, appuyée par- ifilb L6 0 I_ se 1 t n. f AIdý, 'LA-POINT.E4ý 3\u0026 ý,1'éch.':MEIýARD,.\" il-, est Ald.ý MENARD, it was é,ledit rýapport soit reç -Qu -u -et le %rè\u0026u des Cômmissaire§, à' Pef fet de peîméttre r 'rd of édiùiliisilo'ners, to anW F am' oa \":la co gniý \u0026 t - - iiý,z de Moqtréal. de cpnstruVeý e tre;tl.,Traýmwayq: C07,t _. a, sý iternent Ae, Vbfe Mrï si 1 àtreet. Sur PtQDÇ)Eltlon.-dr M. l'éth..L. A. LAFOINTZ 4PeYýý par On motiop, f,.,All. L.-A. -LAPOINTeý 'CRAXI ýR«i5,, Ald. CHARWAND 'Wývas soit rceu,\u003eÉt adopté Ned\" 1\"hài'ý- 'ýàýrëe sa ôrf té, tuè1ve, cotýnm l'effet deý permettre -,19. _V,ýemBoaýâof d'\u0026iéét dés:pý. treût Publi 'Se CcrPo,ýati0n ý ; .1. . c rv ce _ýteauX d'am, cýýaklëg rues. ro ' Vèc' tÀ 1701NTE, ufPý h. L A Ald. L. A. -LAPOINTE, ROCHON ý il 1. , , ý . z.ý, est Ald. ROCHON, it was tý 'S'oit reýu ýt adapté, T4at, eaid rçp«t 20.-DU- Bureau -des Cýeffirni3miffl Boîrd -ô à' l'bf f et de perjùei\u0026e f téninlis3lone -à la ','Lake -oitbe Wood's Milling ýCoý\" de maintenir en P14ce of the Wubds ul -dés ý0ù-te4, _,sur, ýr0P=ti0P jk Nýf-ëc1t. L:ýX,4AP01»TE, uWyk par Cin niot of Àld.,L, ' A., LÀ.P fflle Te - Q.\u003e !,\u003eÙBÈNSTEIN, il est 0 ui Que ledÀi, rapp.Qrt- soit xm Adoptii: q",
         "ý.MUN1ClP-A-L DE MONTIRAL -Jàr.;,an apprOer'a- saires à l'ef fet de vç),ter un 2iýFron1 Boa-rd of ýCommissOýÇr6; e ýe3,T76. ls adam. asphalté dans tion of $403-,176.55 for asphalt màcadam. in çettaill' strëéU. 55 Pour poser du mac rues. 4 'Bureau des Commissaires, à J'effet de voter un -227-ýFrom-Bôard ýof ria- :$64,032 Pour paver la rue Church. t'on of $64032 to pave Church street. 'ýiQn remise à la demandé de M. l'échevin O'Cori- Çonsidýeration deferred at the reqù1e9tof-ýý1d» O'Con- nell. Bureau des Commissaires, à l'effet de 'Vôter un 23-Frotn Board of Comrriissionçrs, dr ýan - appropria- ,! 0 or f fi tý450 P tiý le Département de lAssistànce 1ýfÜnici- ýti0n:ý)f $I,450:f the Munýcý' al AssIS a ce'D\" t ation remise à la demande de M. l'échevin L. A. Consderat'on deferred at the rcqýcsi: of A'd. L -A.: La- pdifite. PELLATIONS. QUESTIONS. eýâîmes questions' sont posées au Bureau des- Corn- 24-Certa'n questions v;ere put t, 'ýhý Èââýd loi- avec Prière d'y répondre à la prochaine assemblée missioners w:th a request thnt thely repry-, Éhéreto'for the Çouneil by- (-à)' Ald,,Ï4ityratid,, t1P il'.Par -(a) M. l'échevin Mayrand., re épr.ýýuves de nextmeeting of the 1 re tests M. l'échevin Rubenstein. re maça(fai-nÏsage du 61, aspÉà (b)- AIdý Rubýe11ste.nf r,ýý \"èadaiiýizi ' Ôte la Côte-des-Neiges; (c) M . ý l'échevin Pa\u003euzé,' re des Neiges Road; (c) Ald, Pài$ié;'r 'Iîý\u003erâc;lôkation of Boulevard Stc-Marie; (dj Ald, Létogr11c*1Lbýýe.e ýDpving of ation du Boulevard Ste-Marie; (d) M. I'ýche.yin e 1 ti, re Pavaize'de la rue Saint-Antoine, à, Id idurnée; St. Anto'ne street :by d'àv l'échevin O'Connell, re emploi des camions automo- employment -of auto -truçks for plu yyoTý.sý,,fflAId. itt,,-tràyatlk muckipaux; (fý M.- l'écIýéTin Larfvièrej -Lar'vière, » re p av', n g an4 Sdkwa,.kk beeùn, Igsi earý es et trottoirs commencés 'l'an dernier. 4S MOTIONS. prôposition de M. l'éch. LARIVIERÉ aPPuyée 2ý.-On motýiDn of AM. LARIVIERE, ýççoqded by -Ald.. It LAVÉPGNE, il est lAVERGNE, it waà sàires soit prié d'étu- Resolved: That the Board of CoinmissioP-ers Que le 'Bureau des Com mis bc .-le\u0026 estiort de savoir si les ventes de prop*riétés par le quested to consider the possibil\"ty tirraient être remises à year , Cf propr les., l'an prochain. the galt fi* Pr'àPosition de M. l'éch. N. LAPOINTE, aP- 26.-Ori niof*,oný ofý-Aldi N. Mý Vëch. MENARD, il est Qu'un mo i s Il d . e 1 congé soit Ald. MENARIY,:, accordé à MM. les Resolved: That- orte fhonth's le ' a-v4ý *dýë'5é g\u002býntl- St-Pierre et Weldon. ed to Ald. St-reérre and- Weld5n. MOTION. NOTICES OF MO'ÉIONS. l'éch. Létourneau, re règlement concernant -By ý,ýId. IÀtourneau,. re copcerning- dwpil- d'habitation. Iïig houses. e Boyd, à l'effet d'amender le r«'glemen*t 28j-By Ald. Boyd, to amend. By-1 a,ýv Nb. 1ýq-Te, auto- 'trucks. ýfe camions-autoinobiles. 17 ])TJ JOUR. ORDER OF TIIE DAY. lit là I'drdre du jour pour la nomination, de -29.-The order of the day being read for-'thé,9ýPqJ» Î'i\u003elèànts pour les deux termes qui vont ment of Act'.ng Ma-yo.r5ýfer the two On motion, of Ald. MENARD, Position de M. l'éch. MENARD, appùýée par d lîî 1ý- A. LAPÇ)ýNTE, il est -LAP,0 INTE, it wias ý'Que MM le' échevins 4ýanger etSt-Pie ryneli -,tÀbger, illa .,st * s rré ' kesýived-,' TÉat Alde âô eWili » . .11, Il: Més Maires-Suppléants pour les deux termes appointed Actine Mayors for 'the twO iýýWWida9' M. l'éch. 4rangrr, pour le prochain term,ýï et Ald. Loraner-. for the -next: first, -ttwpte4?ý0 t-Pierrê pour 1 terme suivant. for the f6llowing tertn. d xijème et tr isième item de l'ordre' an\u0026ý3rdJ orders ôf tee'dâ nt JUS, sitiotit de M. l'éch. L.A. LAPOINTE, appuyée par: On motion of Ald. L. A OYD, ir-est.- -Ald. B0YDý'ft was 'A i Que .1esdite itëM ýsaienf Wffès et que - ledit rapr- R 1- d That s a iteilis be 'Né , té b Cà,. 'w wq ý'ýlàéPosé sur le bùreauipour-ereýp.rîs en,\u003e c erne temps que les rapp of the Citv..Treasçiýi, c0mptrQIIerý-etc\" c6cý orts du TrésQrieÈ de, 011 Contrôleur, etc., au sujet des fininces, de. la', t lü'-1ýoMre d u jour p ôîirrýpeý\"dre. ek c 'ht'or er of. the day belni réâà to ro-pports du Bureau des -ComMîslsaîreru-ý 'it-om: ttiè Bïý)atd 01 'J'effet dé v, . c (a\u003e Forý eu ,ier- un dcý-.eSo,.poùr Ptetý'hèr1s: Field. on dt M. Véch. L X iv'IERr,: il, est Aldý LARIVIERE, it W,410; ResolvedI 'The sait! Xe k', Queudit",
         "MUN«IÊAL-1 1JE MOII'r:kÉAL -A l'effet d\"aétepter, une offre des sucées,%ions Mc- (b) To accept an aller from McVey Vey. et Quinti, tates. ý,propoàition de M. l'éch. L. A. LAPOINTE, appuyée par On motion al\u003e Ald. L. A. LAPOINTE, A LARIVIERE, il est Ald. LARIVIERE, it was -izéioiu:'ý,-Que ledit rapport soit adopté. Resolved: That said , report be adopted. A Yeffet de voter un créd - It de $2,5oo pour pierre i(c) For an appropriation Of $2,500 for brOkerel\"\" concassée, pour lé Pare Mont-Royal, for Mount Royal Park. Stir -proositfûtl:de M. l'éch. L. A. LÀPOINTE, appuyée pur On motion of Ald. L. A.. LAPOINTE, seco M, l'éch. BOYD, il est Ald. BOYD, it was 'Résolu: Que ledit rapport soit adopté. RcEolved: That said report be adopted. (d) A l'effâ de voter un crédit de $2,425 pour 1'lle (d) For an appropriation Of $2,425 for Ste-Hélène, ý5ur Jp'ropô'É-itibn dé-.«Kf. .1'khý È'X LAPOINlF,, apptrîée par On 'motioli of Ald. L. A. LAPOINTE, M. fléch. LORANGER', il est Ald.: LORANGF-R, it %ivas 'è p so 1 d. Qu ledit rap . orýt adapti Résolved: That said report be adopte (e) lýépqndaýi à une question re Système de compta- (e) Replying. to a questioe re book-keepitig bilité, if ëst was Résolu: Que ledit rapport soit déposé sur le bureau-au Resolved: That said report be laid on the tablý' pied de l'ordre du jour. foot, of the order of the day. -3,2,-Les item gème, ioème et iième étant lus, lesdits 32.-The 9th, ioth and iith orders of tbe rapports sont: renvoyés à la Comim''\"ision Spéciale nommée read, said reportg'were referred ta the Special, le ig avril dernier pour étudier certaines questions - con- appointed on the igth April laist ' , to look inio'ce cernant lýAý,queduc. ters conceming the Aqueduct., 33-Etant lu l'ordre du jour pdtir'ýeretidre en considé- 3j.-The orderof the dav being reaà to cý\"* fation un, -rappôrt du Bureau des Commissaires à l'effet de port from the Board of Commissioners for al, 'a voter un crédit de $2,500 pour le nivellernetit de la Ferme tion of $2,5oo to level Fletcher's Field. Fletcher, etç,,. Sur proposition de NI. l'Ach. L. A. LAPOINTE, appuyée par On motion of Ald. L. A. LAPOINTE, M, l\"éch. BOYD, il est Ald. BOYD, it was Résolu. Que ledit rapport soit adopté. Resolved: That said report be adopted. 13è1ne, 1,4èrne et 15èrne item de l'ordre 34.-The 13th, 4th and t5th orders of thé 42e jour, il est read, it was Réeolu., Que ledit rapport soit renvoyé à la Coinniis- Reeolved: Thàt said report be referred to' sion Sp-éciale nommée le ig avril dernier pour étudier Committee appointed on, the igth April _Jast, to certaLints, questions concernant l'Aqueduc. bettain matt\u0026s concerning the Aquéduct. 3 -£tant, Ip lýùr\u0026e du jonr pour prendre en considéra- F- , j5ýThe order of the, day being read to co til(ra Üri rappett du Bureau des Cotnmiý,saires à l'effet dé port-from the Board of Commissioners for Côns- tiori Of e2,,ýù0 re i tructiop.: ddfi Pret rnlnarv wark, \u003erubercuio 'wtzi Pour tuberculeux, Sur proposition de M. l'éch. DUBEAU, appuyée yar, On motion of Ald, DLt8EAIU, sécotided bY -J',àcb,. LETOLrRNEAU, il est TOVRXEAtT, It was Réj4\u003eliý 'Que tédit rapport Moit refiVùyéý pour eimmen Resôlted.- Thàt ïaid ieport bê referred, fm et faeport à- Commission Spéciale corâposée de MM. ation and report ýCý à Spécial Committee ÉO Dubcia, Denis, Bastien, Mayrand, Weldon, du Ald. Duboie% Dénie, Bastien, Mayrand, dû wecondeur.- mover and seconder. 31 lù lordre dà idur pour preedre en tonsidi- à6 -Thé order of the day being réad ta f4tion M, on du Bureau des ComÏaigsaires à l'efrêt de' port from the -Board ci aV $ý2,Cý0 pour là construction d'IÀne fosse tipn oi $2,ow for the, construction. t\u003ei an J01h«fý Sýw1prQpetàËM de M l'éch. L. A. LAIIOINTE,. tpptM\u0026pk ônîýno tf,5â -ý5f Ald. A. LAFOINT . B, sec llëçh. MÈýpm 1:1 est MýL MENARD, it was uë, leýt ri, toit ad té p(Mrm -toutefois, Resolved: 11iýt said. report be adopted 'da qpe soient observées len nditic\u003enà7e la lettre de lIni6- 1, pro tei\"p. dudéprttftlgnt des,Égçbt», hOw\"tl' th'4t flle 'COtd't'Otls Ôf the- ttidr ý01t aunexte audit raWrt eu-date du 14 ayril y 9 1$, tending Engincer \"pro intlexèd to said n 1-âc dàtê- report and begii.g\u003e APril 1915, bý adhered to. l'échevin Madonald, (Ald. Uittdoft0t# diË$«tl£Mk)",
         "114'MUMICIPAL DE MONTREAL :8-85, MUNICIPAL BULIFTIN'OF'-, ?à,014-ýtpEÀï_ '1ýtant lu l'ordre du jour pour prendre en considé- 37.-The order of the day being rcaà to consideratrelport 1\",rPOrt du Bureau des Commissaires à l'effet de from the Board of Commis,5ioners for'an appropr a Ïon of crédit de $iooo pour les maisons en -quarantaine. $iooo for bouses under quarantiiic. PrOpOsiti., de M. l'éch. L. A. LAPOINTE, appuyée par On motion of Ald. L. A. LAFOINTE, ýsccor1dcd by LETOURNEAU, il est Ald. LETOURNEAU, it was Que ledit rapport soit renvoyé à la Commission Resolved: That 5aid report be referred to the Special re HÔpital des Tuberculeux. Committec, re Tuberculosis Hospital. jý-tant lu l'ordre du jour pour prendre en considé- 38.-The order of the day being read to consider reports le, rapports du Bureau des Commissaires à l'effet from the Board of Commissioners to vote approPriations for r des'crédits pour les parcs suivants: the following parks: Parc..Baldwin; lal 11,21,, B2,llwiii Park; 7865, Pare LaFontaine (b) $2,865, LaFontaine Park; ýlie ste-iiéièti.e; (C) $2,700, St. Helen's Island; 1080, Parc LaFontaine (terrains de, jeux); (d) $i,98o, LaFontainc P;trk (playgrounds) 875, Ile Ste-Hélène (drainagedes chalets de né- (e) $1,875, St. Helen's Island (to drain public lavatoriesi; ý550, rue St-Ferdinand (terrains de jeux); M $1,550, St, Ferdinand strect (Pleygrotwds) ý,QÇQ..Parc Monahau; $i»o, Mona4an Park; \u003eJ Pare Dufferin (terrains de jeux); (h) $8,o, Dufferin Park (playgrounds) Parc Notre-Dame de Grâces, (i) $75o, Notre Dame de Grâées Varkl- ý,Uarché à fýin (terrains de jeux); (j) $6o5, Hay Market Square (playgroti;lds) Square Papineau (terrains de jeux); ffl' $58o, Flapineau Square (PlaygroUud$) \u003e- ..Square Richmond (terrains de jeux); (1) $49o, Richmond Square (playàrounds) 'P, Pare G âléry (terrains de jeuk); (M) $41o, Gallery Park (DUYgroUhdg); Parc Monk; (n) $175, Monk. Park; 1 Pare Thibaudeau; (0) $165, Thili audeau Park; ý#c Mont-RoyaL (entretien). (p): $»0,. Mount Royal park (maintenance), \"'Position de M. Véch. L. A. LAFÔINTE, a'ppuyée pfiý On . motion of AU L. A. LAPOINTEý sec onde _bY Lo Ald, LORANGER, it was RANGER, il est Que, 4edit \"rapport soit -adý, Resolved: That said report be adopted. nt lu Il rdre du jour potîr- prendre, en considé- 39.-Thé order ýQf the day béing read'ti6 consider à, _Xepott rapport du'Bureau d s Commissaires à l'eff et de -f rom the Board of Commissioners to allow the 'Harris Abat- e à la Harris Abattoir Co. d'ériger une plate- toir Co., to ercct a platform. pû9ition de M. l'éch. L, A. LAMINTE. appuyée par On motion of AU L. A. LAPOINTE, LAPOINTE, il est Ald. N. LAPOINTE, it *as adoptê\u0026 Que ledit rapport soi Resolved.,- That said report be zkfý: 1i5ýheVîns qiroux et Mayrýnd, dissidents'y (Ald. Giroux fand Mâyrand 40.--Th ordýr of the dzy ýei0gý rta Ut lit-l'ordre du jour pour prendre - en Consitii- 'd W 0144 appcrt du Bureait des ComMisaMfe$ à l'effet de port' frèrn the Board p 1 eýprùpriàtion de certaine lisière de terrain, the ation of a strip of laiïd belopýsiffig:te Yf à Mme E.-Il. Martin, _âd, Il 1, échý L. A. LAPOI NTE, appuyée -pir on Moti»n of Ald. L. A, LAFÔINlr ,ýY 4ARIVIERE\",il est net,04ved. 'Irhg:.ggd:. report be",
         "14 UN ýGI PAL DE Our pouu-r prendre 41,ý-The- ordér of 4he da3ý.'bein\u0026 read, to; oop ï3dreau des Commissaires à l'effet reports froin tJie, Board of Comm ' issioners to Y e vôti M Ùi 2ëtises de Soli Honneur le Maire, du for' expenses - _. - - 1 p -the. MayQr,:the. _of His: ýWýorshý Trésorieri du Cofitr,51eüi et du Greffier-adjoint de la Cité, surer, Co - ptroller and Asst.-city Clerk for Ihe rtgpotteèè lg.,Éjgtlaiure, dç débentures, of bondsni SÜý Orbýb'sitiori de M, l'éch. L A. LAPOINTE, appuyée p al 'On iýiotion pf Ald. L. A. LAPOINTt, 9ýéw il est AldBAS-TIFNi it wîaS Résolu: Qùýc- leidifs rapports soient adoptés. Resolved: That said report bc adopted.- (MM. les _Girqux ýet Chartran\u0026 dissidents.)ý Gi' o- a d'ChartnÏiid dissenting (Ald; r ux- n 42.ýF-tânt lu l' d -e du jour pour pr en d re en considé- 42.-The order of the day beng read to cç ýnýýd ý1u'!3ureau des- Commissaires à'l'tffetý de port from the Board of Commissioners to vO -Voter $ý'âe pour le Département des Parcs. the Parks Department. Msur PrPosifion de M. l'éch. L. A. -LAPOINTE, appuyée par On motion of Ald. L. A. LAP,01,,WTE, Vécý DENTS, il est Ald. DENIS; it was kèsbiti. Qiëeltdit rapport sôit adopté.' Pesof-,éd- -'ýrh'at 'said report be adopted. 43i-Étgài là Vordre du jour pour prendre en considé.. 43.-The order of the day beîng read tô cib04\"',' tatibn.iln rapport du Bureau des Commissaires à l'effet de port froin the Board of Commissioners, _,to 'Vote.' des pa' th e , adm in \"s tra t ion of res, -parks. Sur propomition de M. l'éch, L.ý A. -LAPÔIN-ft, appu_ýyée par On motion of Ald. L. A. LAPOINTE\" X l'éch. THERR IEN, il est. AldL THERRIENit was_ Réso, ht Que lédit rapyicif t soit adopté. Resolved: That said report bc adopted. *ýËtaïif 1ý'1'0rdre du jour- pour préndre en considé- 44 1 .-The ordet 'of-thè dây bein'g read Il tý Co raýîôii uti rapport du Bureau des Commissaires à l'effet de port from the Board of Commissioners to Vcýt I irôter $64p po=,I'exécutioil de travaux. -pérnïane-nfs dans permanent\"works in d'fferent parks. dertains parcs, r petiiiôfi de M. l'éch. LýA. LAPOINTE, appuyée par On motion of Ald. L. A- LAPOINTZ IkUBÉNSTF-IN, il -est Ald. RUBENSTEIN -it was Xéjplu; Out ledit rapport soit adopté. Resoived: That said report bc adopiéd. 4\u00261--ýrààîit tu 1*ordre du j'Our, pour prendre en'conýsîdéra- 45ýThc order of the day. béing read to, coP îWB un MPD*tt.du rt Coffimisiairesi à-l'effe-t au- of Cemmissioners 1 t a from the B oar r ù e t dit liureau à abolir des pstes de cochers rue, St- oard to abolish cab-stanýds en St. Matth and' S ô sWondç U'Yée. L A. LAFOINTF,. agpuýYéé.par On motion of-Al\u0026,L,ý,A LAPOINTZ -est' -it Ald.. O'CONNELt, m* rq eM lZe eJ.ý That report \u0026M b è reÎectéýd- ý46 .-Etant lu l'ordre du joùr pour prendre' en corfsidérà- e order of thé day being read tà titii uft avis de motion de M. l'échevin.. Dubeau, en rapport' tice of mot'on by AU Dubéau re stonefer lib jýeèkqý la,,pier pqgr la, construction 'clé la bî4liothèque, tion de M. léch. DUBEAU, appuyée -par M. on motio re1t, n of Ald, DUBEAU, second d: RANGER, it wai Que le, Bureâo- des Conixnissaire\u0026,ýýtJrié ý11étu-? 'of c RegoTv\"ed:ý T-hat the BGird-ý ý1il ne serait Pas opportun dere 'lacer a\" du granit deý quested to consider the advisability of subîtita -PPüvL11eýe de'Qýnébee, la pierre.de ýt1ieen2wn e par de la; importée 01 the Pràvinqe of Québec for QuéenstoWn 9t0t1tý-ý e la le , prýç)ffl.pe- la brique, 101Z àf i-àid PiýOvÎnce for Wicý44ue publique.' la Librà.ryý' _sur ý Preq,-44ion de 'M. Pèà. LORANGE1ý,lippuyWpàr 47,Oýn ffiotiori ci, Ald. LORAI,4GER, \u0026ec01n4é 0ý -was késolli Que In \"Pbro di- cff coyiseil -imlt, à re 1 pris, . et e Resolv . èd: That the mcmbý ýs Of t hi 5 1 colin ci 1 I\u003eo#,eur l'acte de crugug uw nom commis p£r Je le-: crue s AI ' * th hotroe-ýoi the-shuncfal ae of cruelty umpds en torP;1laaý le ie'à pa$A#geri \"'Lusitania,,, et cti :gèrn-iaiis by ýforpedoeiylg the passenger steUafÙ «Uîýant par là la mprt dý'4-u-delà de lSm passagerq' hommes\" già)o and thezeby c,%usinK the death f, o-vtr, . et enfants; 'il 'M vers, men, ývoj»eq atd",
         "637 MUNICIPAL BTLLETIN 01F MONTRA N MNICIPAL DEMNTREAL .emns, en adoptan des méathoe tde représail prtth Germans, by adopting such bab au ethod eý t u acvilisation et le christianisme n'existent christiandomn no longer, exist for te * -7 le ombreuses victimes se trouvent plusieutrs That among the nt erousd bitsaesvral membes '--\u003cnsiiýcointdeoi xprier à Ces faml ses Ci beg to extend to these families te r lost sincer Cn- p leaPu sincères dans le indlheur qui les frappe, dolence in their bad bereavementad a ad exurnsino tuOgaede symnpathie, ce Conseil s'ajourne. deep sympathy, that this Counci do now A un L. 0. DAVID , L. 0. DAVID, Greffier de la Cité. City Clerk, RENE BAUSET, .ý'r-dont de la Cité Assistant City Clerk, 7,; ? ** \" 'q* *î",
         "* . ..... *.."
      ],
